THE HAUNTED MERCHANT.
CHAPTER I.
CONTAINS MATTER INTENDED FOR THE SOLE PROFIT OF
THE READER, BUT NOT BEING ESSENTIAL TO A
DEVELOPMENT
OF THE EVENTS CONTAINED IN THIS HISTORY, IT
MAY BE SKIPPED BY THOSE WHO CAN AFFORD TO LOSE AN
OPPORTUNITY OF INSTRUCTION.
THE most obvious facts are usually the most sturdily
disputed
.
If this were not so the world would be freed from all
abuses at sight. It has always been a principle amongst
mankind
to resist every attempt, by any one of their species, to
better the condition of humanity, and hence every fact in
science, religion and morals, as soon as it has been discovered
has been fought against until the strength of the opposers has
been exhausted and they have been compelled from necessity
and not choice, to let the fact stand and shed its blessings upon
them in spite of their gnashing their teeth against it. But it is
impossible to fight long against so hard headed a monster as a
Fact. Once in the world there it stands, and every one that
has made its appearance remains as immoveable as the fixed
stars. Your Fact rarely makes war, although his air of serene
confidence generally provokes attack from the bully
Falsehood
who, with a strange fatality, always runs his soft head
against a foe which he never conquered, and leaves his own
kind, whom he might demolish, to swagger at will. What
fact is more obvious than that which, with us, it has become
a proverb of absurdity to question: namely that every man
has a right to his own soul. And yet what fact has ever been
so sturdily disputed. The whole world, from the day of the
first transgression, has fought against it; Turk and Christian,
Jew and Pagan have alike disputed it, even we, American
democrats, do not fully acknowledge it. And yet we wonder
at the English who acknowledge it less than ourselves; the
English wonder at the French; the French wonder at the
Germans; the Germans wonder at the Russians; the
Russians
wonder at the Turks; and the Turks wonder at the
Chinese, who can wonder at nobody, unless they wonder at
the absurdity of allowing man a soul at all. We are at this
moment making a precious exhibition to the world of our
unwillingness
to acknowledge the existence of this simple fact.
Last year, in a fit of foolhardiness, or in a moment of drunken
generosity, we made a slight concession in regard to this thing,
for we cannot admit the whole truth at once, but must do it
by piece meal, as a miser would dole out a dollar in pennies;
we enacted a law which guaranteed to our citizens the
privilege
of calling their souls their own, even though they should
be indebted to one or more of their neighbors, but hardly was
the deed done when the greatness of it terrified us beyond
measure, and although we took oath at the time, that we
believed
the thing to be just and proper, in conformity with the
law of God and the rights of humanity, we now own with
fear and trembling that we did falsely and we hasten to undo
all that we then did in confessing that a man had a right to his
own soul even though he chanced to be in debt. And now the
man who owes his neighbor can no more say that his soul is his
own than the Russian serf, or the Virginia slave whose soul
belongs to his master. The law, which was entirely passive
while the man was getting into debt, no sooner finds him in
that unhappy condition than in seizes upon him and winds its
terrible folds around him, like the horrible serpent around the
limbs of the son of Hecuba and his offspring, until he is
crushed
and mangled and disabled forever from standing erect
among his companions upon the earth. The law justly
forbids
that a man should steal, and justly punishes the
transgressor
;
but the law nowhere, nor no how, forbids that a
man should become indebted to his neighbour, and when, with
his neighbours free consent, he has done so, it may well leave
him and his neighbour to arrange the matter between them as
they may be able. But that would be allowing the man too
great a privilege; it would be too near an approach to giving
him the freedom of his soul.
But these are not the facts of which we intended to make
mention, in the beginning of our chapter; yet we will let
them stand since they have obtruded themselves upon our
notice. A Fact more to our present purpose, but scarcely less
obvious
,
although as sturdily disputed, is the superiority of Fiction
to History. In regard to this matter, we have seen the whole
world from all time in their professions continually giving
the lie to their actions. It is a resolved point with all manner
of grave men to speak lightly of fiction; even lawyers who
deal in hardly anything else affect to decry it; and
theologians
and metaphysicians make a trade of abusing it even
while they are fattening upon it. Asses prefer thistles to
clover, and there are certain philosophers of assinine
sympathies
who would prefer reading a last year's almanac to
Paradise
Lost or Tom Jones. But such persons are exceedingly
few, although there is a melancholy multitude who prefer as
much. The majority of grave people read the most
outrageous
romances, but compromise with their prejudices by
calling
them histories; and historians knowing very well that
they can hope for no readers, unless they make their histories
to resemble fiction, conform to the will of the world; while
novelists, to gain the same result adopt an opposite course,
and with mock solemnity which savors not a little of irony,
call their productions histories. Many a poor soul has no
doubt been beguiled into a perusal of the history of a
foundling
,
who would have shrunk with pious horror from the
book if it had been called a romance, just as back gammon
boards are smuggled into pious families with Brown's
Concordence
labelled upon their backs. It is reported that a
grave doctor, after having dallied with Gulliver's Travels,
boldly confessed that the thing appeared to him too strange to be
true; but Saint Augustine, after having read with infinite
satisfaction, as he could not fail to do, the golden Ass of
Apuleius, to satisfy his conscience for having perused the most
monstrous fiction that was ever penned, declared with great
solemnity that he believed it to be a veritable history. But
with due veneration for so great a saint we are compelled to
think that he conceded to a bad prejudice more than his
conscience
should have required. Fictions are generally called
light reading, as they well may be since they are almost the
only works that keep afloat on the stream of time; the weighty
truths contained in other writings it is charitable to believe
cause them to sink to the bottom from whence they never
rise again. Long winded divers may occasionally bring up to
the surface a relic from them, but like old hulks at the bottom
of the ocean they lie undisturbed until they mingle, in the
course of time, with their original elements. An
astronomical
essay or a treatise upon crocodiles written in the time of
Cheops would have but little more interest at this day than an
extract from doctor Lardner's Encyclopedia, but a love story
or a ballad written by a magazine author of that remote period
would set the whole world agape if discovered now.
No man ever understood better the whims of the world
than the great master of modern fiction, who gained a vast
multitude of readers amongst the grown portion of mankind
by calling his fiction historical novels, thus making a
combination
which satisfied the two great classes of readers, the
lovers of fiction and the lovers of fact; and by making a
liberal use of historical names in his romances he satisfied the
sentiment and the scruple of his reader at the same time.
And so well did he know how to adapt himself to the way of
the world that it would be an extremely nice point to
determine
whether his fictions most resembled history, or his
histories
fiction.
The purest minds and the keenest intellects have delighted
in fictitious narrative, and have given their testimony in its
favour not only in direct terms, but by implication in studying
it themselves and furnishing it for the study of others. Lord
Bacon, whom it is the fashion to rely upon in questions of
morals, was himself a sturdy advocate for Fiction, and he has
very pointedly set forth her superiority to History.
As the active mind is inferior to the rational soul, says
this great philosopher, so fiction gives to mankind what
history
denies, and, in some manner, satisfies the mind with
shadows
when it cannot enjoy the substance: upon a close
inspection Fiction plainly shows that a greater variety of
things, a more perfect order, a more beautiful variety, than can
anywhere be found in nature is pleasing to the mind. As
real history disgusts us with a familiar and constant similitude
of things, fiction relieves us by unexampled turns and changes
and thus not only delights, but inculcates morality and
nobleness
of soul. It raises the mind by accomodating the images
of things to our desires, and not like history and reason
subjecting
the mind to things.
And Sir Walter Raleigh advises the writer of history
even, not to follow too close after Truth, lest he should get a
kick from her heels.
Perhaps our readers will think that we take an infinite deal
of pains to prove what no one is disposed to deny, and least of
all themselves. But we do not string words together without
an aim, and as our reader was advised in the beginning that
he might skip this entire chapter, if he had any misgivings as
to its contents, without prejudice to our story, we do not feel
called upon to explain our motives in writing it.
In regard to the work which we are now about to begin
we are at a loss whether to call it a history or a fiction, since
we might, by calling it either, thereby lose a reader, which we
cannot well afford to do, and we cannot call it a historical
fiction
because the names introduced in the narrative are as yet
unknown to fame. But as truth must be supposed to have a
certain weight even with the lovers of romance, perhaps our
better course will be to make a free confession that the stories
contain some facts and some fictions, and leave to the
discrimination
of the reader to pick out such parts as may best please
him, and to exclaim on his own instinct that is a fact or that
is fiction as he runs along. And perhaps after all it may fall
to another age to discern the true character of the work as it
took two or three centuries to find out the real meaning of the
golden legend Apuleius.
CHAPTER II.
WILL INTRODUCE THE PRINCIPAL PERSONAGE OF THE
HISTORY.
TREMLETT & TUCK were among the oldest and richest
merchants in the good city of New York; we have no
positive
information as to the exact amount of their wealth, but
it is well known that they were looked upon by their
cotemporaries
as the most respectable firm in the city. And to be so
distinguished in a city of merchants implied an eminence
in the commercial world which very few firms can ever hope
to reach; for mercantile greatness, unlike all other kinds of
greatness, can never be the effect of accident. A chance shot
may place the commander of an army, or the captain of a fleet
upon the very apex of Fame's pyramid, as a whirlwind may
bear the denizen of a barn yard into the regions of the bald
eagle; but it is only by great industry, self-denial, and
integrity
of conduct that a merchant can become renowned.
And his renown, more hardly earned than the fame of a poet
or a warrior, rarely survives the payment of his last acceptance.
The world guards with tender solicitude the fame of the poor
author whom it lets starve, but it never wastes a thought upon
the great merchant whom it had pampered with wealth, when
his accounts with mankind are closed.
Mr. Hubbard Crocker Tremlett and Mr. Griswold Bacon
Tuck were old men. They had formed their copartnership
when they were both young and poor, with the prudent
determination
of getting rich by doing a safe business; and they
resolved in the beginning not to get married until they could
provide for a family without infringing upon their capital, a
time which, in their cautious estimation, had never arrived.
And we find them at the beginning of our history with large
fortunes and whitened locks, but without a being to cheer their
firesides or to care for their griefs or their pleasures, excepting
only a few relations on the part of Mr. Tuck, who watched
his declining years and his increasing wealth with lively
interest
,
as they hoped at his death to seize upon the property
which they had never lifted a finger towards heaping together.
This was a sad condition for old men, who need, like children,
the attentions which money cannot purchase. But their
solitary
condition never disturbed the junior partner. He
wanted
no surer or more affectionate friends than his certificate of
deposite, his bank scrip and his private ledger. Time gave
his warnings in vain to Mr. Tuck; he thought no more about
leaving the world than he did at twenty. The admonition of
death he would not heed. He knew, indeed, that other men
died for he had made several bad debts in consequence of the
untimely departure from this world of some of his debtors, and
his parents and his brothers and sisters had also been removed
by death; but he never seriously thought that
He
should
die; it was something so far removed from a regular business
transaction that the fact that he must die had never once
occurred
to him. It was true that he insured his life, as he did
his ships and his houses, but in so doing he only conformed
to an established rule of his firm; never to let a risk remain
twenty-four hours uncovered. Therefore Mr. Tuck
continued
to make close bargains and to extend his operations more
in the spirit of a man just entering upon life than like one just
about to leave it. In fact Mr. Tuck had found his residence
upon the earth in every respect so exactly conformable to his
notions of the agreeable that he had not the slightest wish to
change for a better one; he was one of those prudent
conservatives
who make it a principle to let well enough alone.
But notwithstanding that Mr. Tuck was every way so well
satisfied with the world, nothing annoyed him more than to be
reminded of the length of time that he had been in it, it
grieved
his generous nature to be told of his blessings, and he
destroyed
the family record which bore the precise date of his
entrance
into the world, lest he should be reminded at
unseasonable
moments of the liberal number of years which had been
allotted to him. And to such an extent did he carry this
amiable feeling that he disguised his venerable iron locks with
an auburn wig, which imparted a most juvenile aspect to his
head which was unequivocally and plumply disputed by his
double chin and an irrepressible protruberance of the lower
part of his waistcoat.
Mr. Tremlett differed materially from his partner; as much
in his appearance as in his feelings; the consciousness of a
mis-spent life, in spite of the wealth he had accumulated,
oppressed
him sorely at times. He felt the want of a comforter.
Though early influence and long habit had caused him to
look with a certain satisfaction upon the mere acquisition of
money, yet he had a continual longing for something better;
he scarcely knew what. He could penetrate the sinister
motives
of those who treated him with deferential respect and
their hollow hearted and loveless attentions were a thousand
times more disagreeable to him than an open and expressed
hatred would have been. He had applied himself so closely
to business that he had indulged no opportunities for
increasing
the number of his friends, and although his name and
even his hand writing were familiarly known at the remote
ends of the earth, yet there was not one solitary being to whom
he could lay open his heart, nor one who looked up to him for
consolation and support. He had often confessed to himself
with a bitterness of feeling, that he might have been happier
if he had gained more friends and fewer dollars.
As he was pacing the flagged walk of the Battery one
sultry
afternoon in midsummer, gazing listlessly upon the opposite
shores of the bay, and musing on his solitary condition, he
felt something dragging at his coat-tail, and turning his head
quickly he perceived a little boy in the act of picking his
pocket of a new bandanna. He caught the young thief by the
arm, but as he struggled to escape he looked up into the old
gentleman's face with such a bright and merry countenance
that his captor felt more like clasping him in his arms than
punishing him for his depravity. The little rogue was not
more than ten years old and his countenance bespoke
anything
but a wicked disposition. He was ragged and
bare-footed
;
but young and poverty stricken as he appeared, he
was already engaged in trade. He had a roll of penny papers
under his arm and a bundle of comic almanacs in his hand;
had he been an older or an ugly brat it is probable that Mr.
Tremlett would have let him escape to practise his thievish
propensities until some less kindly hand should have arrested
him, but his extreme youth and his childish beauty, made such
an impression upon the old merchant's feelings that he felt
unwilling to release him until he had done something for his
benefit. He therefore dragged the little fellow along, in spite
of his kicks and his cries, until he reached his own door,
which was in the immediate neighborhood, where he gave
him in charge to his housekeeper, with strict injunctions to
her not to let him escape; and then he returned to his
counting
room to make arrangements for his next day's payments,
a practice which he had not neglected for more than thirty
years.
Mrs. Swazey, the old merchant's housekeeper, took the
young culprit, and after washing his face, gave him a
monstrous
slice of bread and butter and locked him up in the back
parlor, where, as soon as he had devoured the unknown luxury,
he stretched his limbs upon the hearth-rug and fell into a
profound
sleep. And there we will leave him to enjoy his
innocent
slumbers, while we make an explanation to our reader to
prevent his falling into an error, to which his former readings
may have rendered him liable.
CHAPTER III.
SHOWS HOW INNOCENT PEOPLE MAY DO EVIL INNOCENTLY.
IN the little vagabond whom we left asleep in Mr. Tremlett's
back parlour, you behold the hero of our narrative. Look
at him again. It is not every day that you can look upon a
hero in his youthful slumbers. How sweetly he sleeps; like
a flower in its bud; there are no signs of care or grief upon
his fair brow; these are to come; neither idleness nor luxury
have decayed his perfect system and made life itself, which
should be always joyous, a burden to him; he breathes as
gently and as freely as the wind blows; his pulsations are
regular
,
and a beautiful tinge of healthful red streaks his plump
cheeks and colours his pouting lips; his golden locks cling
to his neck as if they were enamored of his lovely skin. You
have never seen any thing so fine in the antique, although you
may have been to the Vatican, for the antique hath neither
colour, nor warmth, nor motion. You who have watched over
your own little ones in their slumber, know how sweetly he
appeared
,
and that even his quiet breathing was eloquent of
joyousness and hope. But be not deceived by this bright
vision; the little sleeper is nothing more than what he seems;
he is not the son of anybody of whom the reader will ever
hear again, neither will it turn up in the end that he is in the
slighest manner related to any of the personages hereinafter to
be mentioned in this history, for the truth is, his mother was
an Irish chambermaid, who came to an untimely end in
consequence
of a fall, when returning from a little party held in
honour of Saint Patrick, in Orange Street, when her little
darlint was only a twelvemonth old; and he was taken from
her cold breast and removed to an Orphan Asylum, where
he had been kept until a few days before the time at which
our history begins. He had contrived to make his escape into
the world, where he had become so enamored of its various
shows, that he had felt no desire to return to the only home
that he had ever known; and he had contrived to earn his
food by selling penny papers at half profits, for an older dealer
who furnished the capital with which they were purchased.
This much we can afford to disclose in regard to our hero,
but we will not in cruel kindness give any hints as to
the final winding up of his pilgrimage, but will let the
catastrophe
of his history develope itself, according to the
established
rules of both nature and art. Whether he would have
ended his days at Sing-sing or on the gallows, had he not been
arrested by the senior partner of the firm of Tremlett & Tuck,
cannot be satisfactorily determined, since it is a difficult
matter
to guess at the complexion of events which never took
place. Historians do sometimes indulge in long-winded
speculations
as to the probable results of improbable events, but
as the materials of our history are abundant to furnish a
narrative
of reasonable length, we shall leave to the reader the
privilege of making such surmises as may seem proper to him,
and confine our own labour to the simple task of recording
facts.
When Mr. Tremlett reached his counting room, he
dispatched
his business in a few minutes, and instead of
remaining
at his desk to discuss the question of a national currency
with his partner and his book-keeper, for an hour or two, as
had been his habit for some years, he hastily shut up his
portfolio
and hurried back to his house, to the great astonishment
of Mr. Tuck, and Mr. Bates the head book-keeper, who
was so much puzzled to account for the circumstance, that he
made two or three mistakes in posting, and was at last obliged
to shut up his ledger and go home, and ask his wife what she
thought of it.
The thought of there being some one at home who required
his attention, gave the old merchant an excitement that he
had not known since he was first elected a bank director.
When he reached his house, he found his prisoner still asleep
upon the hearth-rug, and notwithstanding that he had fully
determined
to send the boy to the house of correction, when he
looked upon the cherub-like face before him, his heart softened
and his determination faltered. He almost blushed at the
thoughts which obtruded themselves upon him. He sighed
as he gazed upon the sleeping child; an invisible influence
seemed to radiate from the half covered limbs of the youngster,
which held the kind old gentleman in a charmed spell.
Perhaps
he was thinking of the time when he himself was as
young, as innocent and as beautiful; or he might have been
casting up in his mind what portion of his property he would
be willing to give if he could call the boy his own. He
looked
around the room to see if he was observed and then sunk
upon his knees by the urchin's side, but whether to put up a
prayer in his behalf or to kiss his ruddy cheek, we do not
know. A tear glistened in the old man's eyes, a fountain of
his heart had been unsealed and was running over; a drop
fell upon the boy's face and awoke him, and as he fixed his
blue eyes upon the figure beside him, he appeared suddenly
struck with awe, for his hitherto smiling features assumed a
grave and serious aspect. Mr. Tremlett jumped upon his
feet very hastily, and after walking across the room two or
three times, sat down in his arm chair, and putting on an air
as much like a session's judge as he could, he called the boy to
him. The little fellow approached his chair with as much
confidence as a child would have gone to a parent.
What is your name? said the merchant.
John, replied the boy.
Ah! very well, John what? continued Mr. Tremlett.
John, again repeated the boy.
Well, and what beside John?
John, again replied the culprit, looking up into the
merchant's
face and laughing merrily.
Do you laugh at me, you rogue? said Mr. Tremlett.
I can't help it, replied the boy, you talk so funny.
What an impudent little wretch! exclaimed Mrs.
Swazey
,
who had just opened the door; do you know to
whom you are talking? No, was the reply.
Well, if I ever heard such astonishing impudence!
exlaimed
the housekeeper.
Do you not know what your name is? said Mr.
Tremlett
.
John, again replied the boy; upon which Mrs. Swazey
held up her hands as though she were endeavouring with all
her might to personify amazement.
What then is your father's name? continued Mr.
Tremlett
,
smiling at his housekeeper's consternation.
I don't know what you mean, answered the boy.
What, have you got no father?
I don't know.
Have you got no mother?
The boy shook his head and looked grave.
Who took care of you?
The old devil, replied the boy.
What an awful wretch! exclaimed the housekeeper.
Who was the old devil? enquired the merchant.
The old woman who used to feed us with mush and
molasses
,
replied the boy.
Oh! a greater villain I never saw! again exclaimed the
astonished housekeeper.
And where did she live? asked Mr. Tremlett.
Out to the Asylum, replied the child.
At the Asylum! shrieked Mrs. Swazey, well, if he hasn't
called the matron, Mrs. Ellkins, which is my most intimate
acquaintance, and the widow of captain Timothy Ellkins an
India ship captain, by these awful names. Take that for
your impudence, and with these words she gave him a cuff
on the side of his head which sent him reeling against Mr.
Tremlett's chair.
But the youngster soon recovered himself, and without the
slightest hesitation caught hold of her apron and administered
two or three such smart kicks about her shins that she fairly
screamed with the pain. Mr. Tremlett covered his face with
his pocket handkerchief, and came near strangling in trying
to suppress a fit of laughter; and the housekeeper hobbled
out of the room filled with indignation and mortified vanity.
But the boy preserved a wonderful composure of countenance.
This spirited feat did more towards establishing him in
the affections of Mr. Tremlett than a whole year of servile
obedience would have done. The truth was, the
housekeeper
had held her situation so long that she exercised an
authority
over her employer which annoyed him not a little, and yet
he did not know how to mend it, he had so gradually yielded
to it; and he was glad to see her so summarily punished for
her impertinent interference.
Do you know said Mr. Tremlett to the boy, as soon as
he had recovered his gravity of countenance, that I could
send you to prison for stealing my pocket hankerchief?
Could you? said the little culprit looking up good
humouredly
into the old man's face.
Yes, I could, and I must; he replied, for you are a very
bad fellow I see.
But a man told me to take it, replied the boy, and
promised
me a sixpence if I would.
Ah! he was a vile rascal, said Mr. Tremlett, but you
are a rogue yourself, and I shall be obliged to have you
punished
and kept in a place where you will be instructed to do
justly.
I can say my prayers and the commandments now,
replied
the boy.
I percieve that you have been taught the names of good
and evil things, replied the merchant, but you must be taught
to distinguish them in your actions. I will keep you here
to night, but in the morning I must send you back to the
asylum where you came from.
O, no, no, said the boy, I like you. I would rather
live in this asylum with you, than with the old devil out
there.
What do you like me for? said Mr. Tremlett, while a
a keen thrill of delight made his heart beat quick in his
bosom
.
I don't know, but I do like you; replied the boy looking
up fondly into his face.
At that moment a loud knock was heard at the door, and
the servant admitted two strangers who had called upon Mr.
Tremlett with letters of introduction; so he delivered the
boy into the hands of Mrs. Swazey with instructions to have
him well taken care of for the night. It was an unnecessary
charge to the housekeeper, for although she heaped upon his
head an undue amount of wordy severity as soon as she got
him under her exclusive jurisdiction, and declared that she
could hardly keep her hands from beating him, yet she
manifested
all a woman's tenderness in providing for his comfort;
and before she retired at night she stole quietly into the room
where he was sleeping and gently drew the coverlid over him
lest he should take cold. She stood for a moment to look
upon his beautiful face, and she would have kissed his rosy
lips, but for fear of waking him. And he slept on,
unconscious
that a gentle being was watching over him, and
regarding
him with looks of tenderness and pity. And thus we
move through the world, all unawares that the good angels
of God are watching over us, and shielding us from the
thousand
evils which continually threaten us.
CHAPTER IV
RELATES IN WHAT MANNER OUR HERO WAS RECEIVED BY
THE MEMBERS OF MR. TREMLETT'S HOUSEHOLD.
WHEN Mr. Tremlett came down to breakfast, he
discovered
that something had occured to ruffle the temper of
his house-keeper, for that respectable old lady made a
display
of some of the most dignified airs that were probably ever
seen in a republican country. And she did not allow him to
remain long in ignorance of the cause of her unusual
stateliness
of demeanor.
That little scamp, said Mrs. Swazey, as she filled up Mr.
Tremlett's cup, is the greatest villian; the greatest villain,
she repeated again, giving the coffee urn an emphatic shake,
in the individual world.
I am afraid he is a rogue, said Mr. Tremlett.
I can dispel all your fears on that subject, said the
dignified
lady; I
know
he is.
Has he made his escape? inquired Mr. Tremlett.
No Sir, he has not, but I reckon he will; replied the lady,
for this house is not big enough to hold him and me, big as
it is.
Mr. Tremlett thought to himself, as he swallowed his
coffee
,
that he had some right to be heard in the matter; and he
determined that the boy should remain, if it were only to
convince
his housekeeper that he would do as he pleased in his
own house.
What has the boy done? asked Mr. Tremlett.
Every thing, replied the lady; he abused me in the
shamefulest manner.
But you must make allowance for the poor child's
education
,
said Mr. Tremlett; consider that he has not had the
advantages of other children.
I can consider nothing as an excuse for unnatural
conduct
,
replied the lady; for that shows a natural wickedness
of heart; and I never heard any minister say that we must
forgive unnaturalness, particular in beggars.
It is very true, replied Mr. Tremlett, that unnatural
conduct, particularly in a child, shows a native wickedness of
heart, that we can hardly hope to correct by education.
Very much so indeed, said Mrs. Swazey, approvingly.
But I do not understand why the accident of a bad man's
being a beggar, should place him out of the pale of
forgiveness
.
It is a high time of day, to be sure, said the lady, if
beggars are to be choosers. As Mr. Tremlett made no reply
to this conclusive answer, the lady concluded the day was her
own, and proceeded to relate her grievances in a more subdued
tone.
I was always very partial to children, she continued,
particularly boys, although I never had any of my own;
that is, I never
have
had any, she said, as if she wished him
to understand that she might have had, if she had been so
disposed
.
I always liked boys much better than little girls,
they are so interesting; and when I was president of the Good
Samaritan Society, there is no end to the jackets and trowers
I used to make for them, the little darlings!
Ah! I dare say, said Mr. Tremlett.
Yes, that I did, continued Mrs. Swazey; and there is
no knowing what I would have done for this little villain, if
he had behaved himself with the least similitude of respect
toward
me.
Pray in what manner did he abuse you? asked Mr.
Tremlett.
I declare I am afraid to tell you for fear you will throw
him into the street.
O, no, I will not use any violence toward him, I promise
you.
Then I will tell; said Mrs. Swazey, let the consequences
be what they may. After Bridget had combed his hair and
washed his face, he looked so fresh and so beautiful, and
reminded
me so much of my sister's eldest boy, who died
three-and-twenty
years ago, that I could not help wanting to kiss
him; and when I made known my wishes to him, instead of
holding up his lips to be kissed, he ran away, and said he
didn't love to kiss old women!
O! O! said Mr. Tremlett, I shall certainly pull his
ears.
I gave them a good smart box, myself, said Mrs. Swazey;
but not so much for his imperdence to me, as for calling you
by the most awful name.
Oh! indeed! and pray what did he call me? inquired Mr.
Tremlett, while a slight blush covered his cheek.
He called you the old covy, said Mrs. Swazy, speaking
in as solemn a tone as she could.
The old covy, exclaimed Mr. Tremlett; and pray how
did it happen that he called me so?
Bridget is a silly, ignorant creature, replied Mrs. Swazy,
and she is so wain that she is always fishing after
compliments
from every body. She don't care who they come from
if she only gets them. So, while she was washing the boy's
face, she asked him who he loved?expecting of course, that
he would say her; but he said the old covey up stairs,
meaning you; but I gave him such a box on the ears, that he
will not say so again in a hurry, I'll warrant.
Although Mrs. Swazy had never seen the merchant
manifest
any very angry feelings, yet judging from her own
passions
,
as some foolish persons will do, she expected to see him
fly into a great rage, and throw the young outcast into the
street, at the very least; her astonishment, therefore, may well
be conceived to have been very great, when Mr. Tremlett rose
up from table, as soon as he had swallowed his coffee, and
going into the kitchen, patted the head of the little
vagabond
,
with a look in which love and compassion seemed to vie
with each other.
I declare he is a pretty creature, said Bridget, who felt
herself at liberty to be as loquacious as she pleased in the
kitchen, although she could not have been prevailed upon to
open her lips before her employer in any other place.
The boy looked up with a confident good-natured smile
into
the face of the merchant, but it soon subsided, and gave
place to an expression of awe, as if he was astonished at
finding
himself an object of kindly regard; and then a tear
dropped
upon his cheek, as the old gentleman continued to stroke
his glossy hair.
So, then your name is John, and you have got no other
name?
Isn't one name enough? replied the boy.
Law, now, was there ever! said Bridget, who stood
looking
upon him as fondly as though she had been his mother.
No, no; one name is not enough, my little fellow; said
Mr. Tremlett, and you shall have another.
And then the boy looked very seriously, first at the old
merchant, and then at Bridget, as if wondering in his little
mind what it could all mean. And well he might wonder
for such treatment was strangely unlike any he had ever
experienced
before. Kicks and cuffs he would have taken quite
as a matter of course, but kind words and caresses were to him
a new species of human treatment. Mr. Tremlett had already
overstayed his usual breakfast hour, but before he went down
to his counting room, he gave Bridget and Mrs. Swazy strict
orders to treat the boy well, and not allow him to escape.
The last injunction was quite unnecessary, for the youngster
evinced the most perfect satisfaction with his present quarters
and had made himself quite at home in the kitchen.
But Mr. Tremlett had no sooner closed the door behind
him, than Mrs. Swazy bounced into the kitchen, to relieve
herself of a few choice expressions, which having been coined
in her imagination, might have produced very serious
consequences
if she had not let them escape by the proper outlet.
So some youthful poet, having written a string of the most
original verses, would infallibly fall into the worst state of
that melancholy disorder which manifests itself by a turn
over shirt collar, and a fondness for gin, were it not for the
relief he is sure to find, by sending them off to some ogre of
the public press, who will take no more notice of them than
the most swinish porker would of an orient pearl.
Well, I wonder what is going to happen next!
exclaimed
Mrs. Swazy. I do wonder if the world is coming to an
end, or if the millenium is going to happen! Of all the
goings on that ever I
did
hear of, this beats the Dutch! I
wonder if some people thinks that some folks has nothing to
do but to take care of Irish brats. If some people has a mind
to be unginteel, I know of some folks that wont be. The
goodnees
be praised, I am no matron yet! I desire to be thankful I
come from as ginteel a family as some folks, if I aint quite as
rich; for my part, the goodness knows I don't care for any
body's money. My grandfather, which was a merchant in the
revolution, was almost as rich as King George himself; but
the way some folks takes on about a little money, is enough
to make some people sick. For my part, the goodness knows
if there is any thing I hate and detest, it's airs.
Mrs. Swazy delivered herself of a good many more remarks
about `some folks,' and `some people' receiving not a few
sympathetic exclamations from Bridget, who listened to the
outbreak of the good house-keeper with as much eagerness as
though it had been a confidential communication of the very
choicest scandal. At length the good lady's mind being
partially
relieved, she sought farther ease by cuffing the ears of
our hero, who having taken off the keen edge off his appetite
5
with a plate of buttered toast, was now striving to satisfy
himself
with some crusts of bread, and a saucer full of molasses.
The little fellow, having been all his life used to such
compliments
as kicks and cuffs, instead of setting up a piteous
howl, as some children who had been more tenderly reared
would have done, applied an epithet to the house-keeper which
it is hoped he did not fully understand, although the fact
of his immediately taking to his heels would seem to
imply
that he did. Mrs. Swazey did not stop to ask for an
explanation
,
but taking hold of a mop-stick, she gave chase,
followed
by Bridget with no other instrument of destruction than
the two broad hands with which Nature had generously
endowed
her. The youngster made good use of his legs, for
he knew by actual observation that the expression he had
used was fitted above every other epithet in the language to
rouse the feminine ire of even a less susceptible person than
Mrs. Swazey; and to one of her genteel pretensions, he
rightly supposed, it would be particularly wrath-provoking.
And fortunate was it, both for him and you, gentle reader,
that his heels were light and his limbs supple, for if she had
overtaken him in the first effusion of her wrath, it is probable
that his career and consequent history, would have been
brought to a sudden conclusion.
It happened, unfortunately, that there was but one
stair-case
to Mr. Tremlett's house, it being fashionably built, up
which the boy flew with the ease and swiftness of a squirrel
leaping from branch to branch of a tree, without stopping
to reflect that his retreat would inevitably be cut off, but up
he mounted until he reached the attic, where he looked about
him with a fluttering heart, and found that there was no
possible
chance for escape unless he leaped through one of the
loop-holes in the cornice. Mrs. Swazey was soon within
striking
distance of the culprit, but many pursuers before herhave
missed the object of their pursuit, when it has been within
their reach from a too great eagerness to grasp it. Such was
her eager haste to seize the offender that as the ran towards
him her foot slipped and she prostrated herself in a manner
quite unbecoming in a person of her genteel pretensions. But
the boy scorned to take any other advantage of her
accident
than what was necessary for his own preservation; so
regaining the stair-case he ran down with as much celerity
as he had ascended it: but Bridget being stationed at the
bottom
of the stairs caught hin in her brawny arms, and in spite
of his kicking and pinching held him fast until Mrs. Swazey
came down.
It was not many minutes before the exasperated lady, with
the aid of Bridget, had placed our hero across her knee,
preparatory
to the infliction of a punishment which may justly
be called the martyrdom of childhood, and which is as
hurtful
to the tender flesh, as it is mortifying to the feelings, at
that period of our existence, when the door opened and
Mr. Tremlett made his appearance just in time to save the
youngster from an indignity which, though it has doubtless
been inflicted upon the majority of the human species, and
even kings and conquerors have tasted of it, is, nevertheless,
not one of those calamities common to the hero of a romance.
Tut, tut, tut, exclaimed Mr. Tremlett with an unusual
warmth of expression, what's all this?
Bridget covered her face with her apron, at the sight of her
employer, and fled to the kitchen; and Mrs. Swazey being too
much excited to enter into an explanation, rushed into the
nearest closet and left Mr. Tremlett and the boy together. The
young gentleman was a good deal flustered and somewhat
shamefaced from having been found in such a degrading
position
,
but he soon regained his composure, and again looked up
into the face of the merchant with that winning look of
confident
innocence which had at first made an impression upon
his heart.
I am afraid that you are a very bad boy, said Mr.
Tremlett
,
looking seriously upon him.
I will try not to be, replied the boy, while a tear glistened
in his eye.
You must not only try, but you
must not be
, or I shall
not allow you to live with me. replied Mr. Tremlett.
And will you let me live with you if I am good? O, I
will be good.
Perhaps I may. But I certainly will not if you are bad.
But come, get into my carriage; I am going to take you back
to the asylum, and then I will see whether I will let you live
with me or not.
Just at that moment a barouche drove up to the door,
into which Mr. Tremlett got, taking the youngster with him,
apparently very much against his will, for he did not by
any means relish the thought of returning to his old
quarters
at the Asylum.
CHAPTER V.
WILL AFFORD A FURTHER INSIGHT INTO THE
HISTORY
OF MR. TREMLETT.
IT very rarely happens that a rich man is destitute of poor
relations, for Fortune generally bestows her favors in such
a manner, that where one succeeds in scraping together a
competence there are fifty others who have no possible claim
to it, but who would nevertheless look upon themselves as
outraged individuals if he should so dispose of it at his death
as to place it entirely beyond their reach. The laws of
consanguinity
we never could fully comprehend, even with the
aid of Blackstone; for as a man cannot compel his relations
by force of law to aid him in his distress, we cannot clearly
perceive why the law should give a man's possession, which
are the fruits of his own labour, to his relations when he dies.
But notwithstanding that Mr. Tremlett was notorious for his
wealth, he stood alone in the world; not a solitary cousin had
ever claimed kindred to him. Although he was descended
from a family which came over to New England soon after
the landing of the pilgrims, and had had brothers and sisters
in his younger days, he did not know of a living soul who
stood to him in a nearer relation, than that of a common
descent
from an original ancestor. He felt very keenly the want
of sympathetic friends, but he had passed the age when he
could hope to gain them by marriage, and he was too wise, or
perhaps too timid, to venture upon the speculation of
matrimony
.
He had long nursed a determination to adopt an
orphan
boy and he would probably have done so many years
before if one had been presented to his notice. Chance threw
our hero in his way at a fortunate moment, and his
unconstrained
and spirited actions, joined to his healthy appearance
and beautiful face, made an instant impression upon the
lonely
merchant's heart, as we have already seen, and his kindly
feelings manifested themselves so plainly in his looks and
actions
that they immediately begot a kindred love in the boy.
And never did a young maiden experience a truer emotion of
delight on finding herself the object of some brave youth's
regard
,
than did the old merchant at discovering that the ragged
little urchin who, a few hours before, had endeavoured to pick
his pocket, looked up to him with feelings of love and reverence.
Although unaccustomed to act without due caution and
deliberation
,
he was not long in making up his mind to adopt
and educate the boy as his son. To the unreflecting this may
appear like a very hasty determination on the part of Mr.
Tremlett, but when the head and the heart are engaged in a
negotiation it requires but a marvelous short time to come to
terms.
The fond old merchant went to his counting room, after he
left the boy, with more pleasureable sensations leaping up in
his heart than if a change in the markets had doubled the
amount of his wealth. Mr. Tuck perceived an unusual
sprightliness in the manner of his partner, and his
corresponding
clerk, who enjoyed the distinguished honor of writing
letters
at a mahogany desk within whispering distance of his
principals
,
ventured to hint to a correspondent that he had reasons
for believing that there was a favorable change in the money
markets; for, that anything short of a change in the markets
could affect one of the firm of Tremlett & Tuck, had never
popped into the imagination of either the junior partner or his
corresponding clerk.
Mr. Tremlett did not remain long enough at his desk to read
even one half of the letters that were placed there for his perusal
but hurried back to his new charge where he arrived at a
most opportune moment as has been already narrated in the last
chapter, and he had no sooner left the house with the boy in
his barouche than Mrs. Swazey thanked her stars very
devoutly
and expressed a world of gratitude at having got rid of the
little wretch. And Bridget honestly declared that she could
not help loving him, to save her soul, although she was
willing
to allow that he was too impudent to exactly suit her, but
she would allow that he was the cunningest dog that ever
lived; and then the housekeeper relented a little and
confessed
that he was the most beautiful complexioned child she
had ever seen; and that his skin to be sure was as soft as
velvet, and that he
did
know enough. Law now, said
Bridget, I do wish that I had cut off a lock of his hair; it
would look so beautiful in a broach.
Then Mrs. Swazey desired again to be thankful that she
had plenty of relations who had as beautiful children as the
best of folks. And when Bridget ventured to make a reply
she was desired by the housekeeper to hold her tongue, and
she desired again to be thankful that she had got more
important
matter to think of than brats. Indeed, Mrs. Swazey
was one of those extremely grateful persons who are
continually
desiring to be thankful for the very smallest favours,
but who are, nevertheless, little disposed to take a
disappointment
coolly, as less grateful people. These two ladies
continued
to talk some time longer about the boy, differing in
some non-essential points, as ladies often will, both agreeing
that they were extremely fortunate in being rid of him so
easily, when to their utter consternation and dismay, Mr.
Tremlett returned in his barouche, bringing the subject of
their conversation with him, but entirely divested of his rags
and clothed in a new suit of the very latest fashion, which
Mr. Tremlett had procured at a boy's clothing emporium in
Broadway. For the first time in her life, Mrs. Swazey was
struck dumb with amazement, and when Mr. Tremlett told
her that he had determined to adopt the boy and educate him
as his son, her tongue refused to do its natural duty, and all
her organs of loquaciousness with which she was well
endowed
by Nature, were suddenly paralyzed and rendered
powerless. But her employer did not choose to notice her
eloquent
silence, and he told her to prepare a suitable apartment
for the lad and always to treat him kindly and with respect.
And then he patted the boy upon the head, and having
charged him not to venture out of doors he returned to his
business, more conscious of having done something than if he
had purchased a dozen cargoes of sugar.
One of the last things that a woman ever thinks of doing, is
to acknowledge herself outgeneralled by a man, whether he
be her lord and master, or her master only; and, therefore, as
soon as Mrs. Swazey could collect her wits together, which
had been almost irretrievably scattered, she began to set
them to work to thrust our hero from the affection and
the premises of her employer. As to his living in the
same house with herself, she had determined he should not,
and she had no thought of quitting Mr. Tremlett's roof if it
were possible for her to remain beneath it. She saw that he
had set his heart upon the youngster and she saw the
necessity
of immediate action to prevent his affection from taking
deep root; and thinking that the fond old man would, beyond
a doubt, prefer the offshot of some genteel family to the stray
lamb of an eleemosynary institute, she came to the
determination
of endeavouring to counteract the influence of the boy,
by interposing the fascination of some half dozen of her own
nephews before the eyes of the merchant. Women are
proverbially
quick witted, and prompt in action, and Mrs.
Swazey
was epitome of her sex.
When Mr. Tremlett came home to his tea he was more
surprized than delighted to find three middle aged ladies and
seven young gentlemen, whose ages ranged from five to
fifteen
all honoring him with their company to tea. Children
are always objects of interest when they are not in the
presence
of their anxious mothers, and then, as one of the ladies on
this occasion facetiously observed, they behave as bad as they
can, on purpose to mortify those who care any thing about
them. Now the adopted son of Mr. Tremlett having no
anxious
mother to torment, and being perfectly conscious that no
body present cared a straw about him, shone out like a star of
the first magnitude among this constellation of juveniles who
were clustered together for the express purpose of putting him
in the condition of a total eclipse. This the partial eyes of
the three ladies prevented them from seeing; in fact they had
looked so long and so steadily upon their own particular stars
that they had become blind to all others, and each one felt
certain that the choice of the rich merchant would fall upon
her own cynosure, for Mrs. Swazey had explained to them in
full the cause of their being summoned together. But Mr.
Tremlett was left entirely in the dark in regard to this
unusual
display of youth and innocence, and not being influenced
by any of the potent fellings which affected the visions of the
ladies, he could not fail to perceive at the first glance, the
great superiority of his newly adopted son over the whole
assemblage
of prodigies.
As soon as Mr. Tremlett made his appearance, there was
an immense sensation among the ladies, and each little
innocent
immediately flew to his own natural protector. The
fortunate
lady who happened to be nearest the door and who
had the first chance of the merchant, was Mrs. Muzzy, a very
genteel personage in a blue turban, whose only hope, a young
gentleman nearly four feet in height, stood at her side.
Augustus, my love, said Mrs. Muzzy, make a bow to
the gentleman.
But the young Augustus put his forefinger in his mouth
and resolutely refused to move either head, hand, or foot, all of
which it was necessary to do in complying with his mother's
request.
Gustus, darling, did you hear? said the lady
affectionately
.
But Augustus made no response.
6
Come Gussy, that's a dear, continued the mother. But
still the young gentleman stood erect and refused to move.
Augustus Muzzy, do as I bid you in an instant, or I will
skin you. Bow this instant, said the excited mother.
But from some unaccountable reason, Augustus Muzzy
appeared
to have conceived the idea that a statuesque appearance
was best suited to the occasion. Bow he wouldnot.
Never mind, let him stand, said Mr. Tremlett, good
humouredly
,
the little fellow will come to by and by, I dare
say.
He
shall
make a bow, if I have to skin him alive,
exclaimed
the mortified Mrs. Muzzy, her face turning very red.
But her threat had not the least possible influence upon the
immoveable
young gentleman; whereupon the excited lady lost all
command of her better feelings, and catching hold of her
darling's
arm she dragged him into the adjoining apartment, from
which arose such a terrible sound that the company feared that
the affectionate mother was putting her dreadful menace into
execution.
The next lady who got an opportunity to show off was
Mrs. Stimson; she told her youngest boy to make a bow to
the gentleman, and quick as thought the obedient child
stepped
into the middle of the floor, and rubbing up his little pug
nose with the palm of his left hand, and thrusting his right
foot behind him, he bent his body nearly double.
The other lady, Mrs. Smickels, was almost suffocated with
envy, while the happy mother of the boy smiled with ineffable
delight, and Mrs. Swazey looked upon the triumph as complete.
Well done my little fellow, said Mr. Tremlett, and now
tell me your name.
Marquith de Lafayette Stithmson, replied the talented
young gentleman, without the least hesitation.
And how old are you, Marquis? asked Mr. Tremlett.
Eight years, replied the miracle.
Is it possible! said Mr. Tremlett.
He is not another day, said the delighted mother; he was
eight years old the twenty-first of last April, but I don't know
how many people have said they could not believe it.
He is a precious darling, said the housekeeper; wouldn't
he love to come and live with the gentleman?
No I don't want to; replied the youth.
And why not? asked Mr. Tremlett.
Coth mother says you are a nathy old bachelor, replied
the forward child.
This reply had a very sensible effect upon every person in
the room excepting the one who uttered it, and he looked
around him with the self-complacency of a man who has said
in his own opinion, one of the very best things that could be
spoken. Little did the satisfied child know the anguish
of his mother's feelings, the mortification of his aunt Swazey,
the exultation of his aunt Smickles, or the chagrin of Mr.
Tremlett, who did not like to receive such a home thrust even
from a gentleman of the dimensions of the young Marquis.
Now was Mrs. Smickles' time. She looked upon her three
darlings with the most intense delight that a mother's heart
is capable of feeling; she considered their fortunes as made,
for she had not the slightest doubt that he would adopt all
three. Her ample bosom heaved with emotion, and she could
scarcely keep the tears from her eyes. But, poor woman, she
did not reflect that as she had always allowed her children the
privilege of doing as the pleased, the chances were ten to one
that their pleasure would not coincide with her own.
Now my dear, said Mrs. Smickles, addressing her
youngest boy speak to the gentleman.
`I wont, replied the boy.
Do, darling; said the indulgent mother giving the young
monster a kiss.
I wont, I wont, I wont, was the only reply to this
kindness
.
David, dear, you speak to the gentleman, she said,
speaking
to the next oldest; and to ensure compliance she slipped
a sixpence into his hand.
I aint agoing to for that! replied the boy, scorning the
smallness of the bribe.
Do dear, said Mrs. Smickles.
You are always trying to make me do something that I
don't want to, replied the child, and without more ado he set
up a dismal howl.
Don't cry dear, said the indulgent mother; and
addressing
her other darling, who was amusing himself with a
backgammon
board under one of the tables, she said Lucius, my
love, get up and speak to the gentleman.
What shall I say? inquired the youngster.
Ask him how he does, that's a sweet; said the mother.
Why don't you ask him yourself? inquired the young
philosopher.
Was there ever such torments! exclaimed the amiable
Mrs. Smickles in a whisper to her sister Swazey.
I shall go off the stage, replied the agitated housekeeper,
for she perceived that all her deep-laid plans were coming to
naught.
Just at this moment tea was announced, and a scene of great
confusion followed, during which our hero behaved himself
with such perfect propriety, that he even won upon the good
will of Mrs. Swazey herself, and Mr. Tremlett was still more
favourably inclined towards him than before. Such are the
pleasing effects of contrast. If Mrs, Swazey had been
religiously
bent upon advancing the interests of the little stranger
whom she meant to annihilate, she could not have hit upon a
plan for doing it more effectually than by showing him off in
contrast with such a troop of pampered young republicans as
she had summoned together for a contrary purpose.
The sight of the dainties upon the tea table dispelled all
thoughts of anything but present enjoyment from the minds
of mothers and children, and all grievances were forgotten.
Boys, said the indulgent Mrs. Smickle, in a hurried
whisper to her offspring, kill yourselves, eating for it's all
you will ever get out of
this
house, darlings.
As the occurrences at the tea table had no particular
influence
on the fortunes of the principal personage of this
history
,
we will draw an oblivious veil across them, and with the
reader's permission we will here close the fifth chapter of
our history.
CHAPTER VI.
RELATES, AMONG OTHER THINGS, HOW MR. TREMLETT WAS
RELIEVED FROM A GREAT EMBARRASSMENT BY
THE ASSISTANCE OF TWO BENEVOLENT LADIES.
MR. Tremlett took the young vagabond to the Asylum from
whence he had escaped, but he heard nothing in relation
to him which the reader has not already been made acquainted
with; indeed all that he cared to know was that the boy was
destitute, beyond dispute, of either father or mother, and that
there was not the slightest probability of any relation ever
appearing
to claim him, or to interfere with his education. The
managers of the institution very cheerfully acceded to Mr.
Tremlett's proposal to adopt the youngster and he was
accordingly
bound over in due form. The Matron, Mrs. Swazey's
particular friend, did, indeed, express an infinite deal of
sorrow
at parting with him, and protested that she loved him as
if he were her own flesh and blood; a declaration which the
subject of her admiration seemed to regard as quite figurative
and highly poetical, as he had often had occasion to remark
a wide difference between her manner of treating him and
herself
,
not only in regard to the outward but the inward
treatment
of her flesh and blood.
Upon inspecting the books of the institution it was found
that the boy really had a surname, although he did not know
it himself, as he had never been called by any other name
than John. But Mr. Tremlett meant to bestow his own family
name upon him, and hereafter he will be distinguished as
John Tremlett, for by that name alone was he thenceforth
called and known.
It was a long time after Mr. Tremlett had adopted the boy
before the fact became known to the world in general, and to
Mr. Tuck in particular. All the clerks in the counting room
of Tremlett & Tuck, from the head book-keeper down to the
porter had noticed a change in the senior partner, which had
not escaped the observation of Mr. Tuck, who began to have
suspicions that his partner was engaged in some private stock
operations. He stayed longer at his dinner and left his desk
at an earlier hour than he had ever been in the habit of doing;
and several times he had been seen to rub his hands together
and smile, apparently with great internal satisfaction; but
nobody
could guess at the cause of his manifest delight, although
there were a good many shrewd wits set to work to find it
out. Two or three times when a drum of figs, or a frail of
dates had been opened in the sample room he had been seen
to take a handful and wrap them up in a news-paper and put
them slyly into his pocket. As a matter of course all such
unheard of doings were duly noted and fully discussed. The
younger clerks said he was going to get married, while the
head book-keeper surmised that he had `got religion,' and the
head salesman guessed that he was going to dissolve the firm
and form a special partnership, which was very agreeably
received
by the cash-keeper and the head book-keeper in whose
minds it awakened brilliant ideas, that one, or both, might be
taken into the new concern. Although there was a great
variety of opinions on the subject, as must of necessity be the
case when nothing positive is known, there was but one
as to the fact that something very wonderful had happened,
or would happen to the senior partner.
The truth was that Mr. Tremlett felt like a man who
indulges
himself in forbidden pleasures, for although he had
been guilty of nothing which his conscience could not approve,
yet he could not muster fortitude enough to impart his secret
to Mr. Tuck; he had several times made the attempt when they
were alone together, but his heart always failed him, and the
longer he delayed, the more embarrassed he felt. At last he
determined to leave to chance to reveal what he was so
desirous
and yet so afraid of doing, and it was not long before the
fond old merchant was relieved from his embarrassment in a
most unexpected manner.
One pleasant morning just before bank hours, a very dashy
carriage, of an indescribable colour, drawn by two very gay
black horses and set off by a coachman and footman in most
uncomfortable looking drab coats with a wicked superfluity
of capes, stopped at the door of Messers. Tremlett & Tuck's
counting room and discharged two beautiful ladies, or if they
were not beautiful, there is no truth in the adage that, fine
feathers make fine birds, who immediately tripped into the
office of that respectable firm with an air, as though they
came on business which would insure them a hearty reception.
Their appearance created an immense fluttering among the
clerks, to whom such apparitions were extremely rare during
office hours.
Is the head of the firm in? asked one of the ladies in a
very sweet voice.
Very much, that is, quite so, I think; replied Mr. Bates,
the head book-keeper, who was quite bewildered at the sight
of such unusual visiters.
Yes ladies, he is in his office; promptly replied one of
the younger clerks.
Can I see him? asked the lady.
Certainly madam, responded the young clerk, and
skipping
from his high stool, and giving a very sly wink to his
companions, he showed the two ladies into the private office,
and as he closed the door he put his hand to his breast, made
a mock theatrical bow and exclaimed damme. Upon which
every body laughed excepting Mr. Bates, who made it a point
of conscience never to laugh at a junior's jokes, although he
took it very hard if the juniors did not laugh at his.
The two partners were both busily engaged at their desks
when the ladies entered the private office, but Mr. Tremlett
sat in a small recess behind a green silk curtain, so that they
could only see Mr. Tuck, who looked at them with very
suspicious
glances.
You are the head of the establishment, I believe? said one
of the ladies enquiringly.
Yes madam, replied Mr. Tuck, at the same time doing
his best towards a bow. Please be seated.
There was a prodigious rustling of silks as the ladies sat
down, and after a moment's pause the one who had thus far
done all the talking, drew a little lemon-coloured pamphlet
from her reticule, and advancing to Mr. Tuck's desk put it
very gracefully into his hand.
What, what, what is this? exclaimed Mr. Tuck.
It is our annual report, replied the spokeswoman, smiling
sweetly, and displaying a set of teeth so very white and
beautiful
that Mr. Tuck could not help wondering in his mind
how much they cost.
Report of what? asked Mr. Tuck, who began to have a
lively presentiment of the object of the lady's visit, as he had
been honoured by similar calls before.
The report of our transactions for the last year; replied
the lady.
O, yes, I see, replied Tuck; transactions in picking up
children; I suppose madam you have got none of your own,
or your would have no time to look after the public's?
O, yes, I have five of my own, replied the lady, smiling
as sweetly as before, and that is the very reason why I take
so great an interest in the poor little creatures who have
nobody
to care for them.
It is better for them, replied Mr. Tuck; I never knew
what it was to be taken care of, except by myself, and I have
never found any difficulty in getting along in the world; I
find it is a mighty selfish world that we live in, and my
motto
is, let every body take care of themselves and then every
body will be taken care of. Mr. Tuck hoped by this original
7
piece of philosophy to convince his visiters of the absurdity
of benevolence that they might leave his office without asking
him for anything. But ladies who go a begging for the
benefit
of charitable institutions make up their minds before-hand
not to accept of sentiments in the place of shillings.
Now I am sure, said the lady, that is one of the very
best arguments that you could have made in our favour; is
it not? she said, turning to her companion, who also smiled
very sweetly behind her veil; and she thought so, decidedly.
We are trying to collect a small sum of fifteen hundred
dollars
,
continued the fair solicitor, and we shall be very
grateful
for the merest trifle. Your neighbors, Messrs. Dribletts and
Pickings gave us their check for fifty dollars; see, here it is;
they are very liberal, gentlemanly, kind hearted and Christian
merchants. We always publish the names of all our patrons
in the annual report of our transactions.
But Mr. Tuck felt no ambitious promptings to be called
either kind-hearted or gentleman like, particularly at so high
a cost as fifty dollars. So, instead of drawing his check for
that magnificent sum he felt in his pantaloons pockets and
very graciously reached the lady a shilling; at the same time
he looked very hard at a dazzling cross which was
suspended
upon her forehead by a fillet of pure gold, from which he
glanced to a very large and beautiful cameo locket with which
her satin cloak was fastened; and his eyes rested upon her
cobweb pocket handkerchief which was trimmed with costly
lace; and his cold glances seemed to say, `why was not all
this finery sold and the cost of it given to the poor for whom
you are begging?' And so the ladies probably interpreted his
looks. for the spokeswoman blushed deeply and the other lady
held her fan to her face and laughed genteelly. They
whispered
together a few moments and the one who had before
remained silent approached Mr. Tuck's desk and said,
We thought as you had evinced a compassionate
disposition
in adopting one of our little reclained rogues that you
would be glad to be numbered among the patrons of our
institution
,
or we would not have applied to you.
Me, madam! exclaimed Mr. Tuck, I never heard of the
operation before.
Are you not Mr. Tremlett, then? inquired the lady.
No, replied Mr. Tuck, with increased astonishment.
Then replied the ladies, speaking together with a
wonderful
coincidence of thought, you are not the gentleman we
thought you were, and making two very low courtesies, the
two benevolent ladies suddenly vanished, leaving behind them
a strong smell of Eau de Cologne.
What on earth did them two female individuals mean?
said Mr. Tuck, as he thrust his astonished countenance behind
the green curtain that screened his partner's desk.
Mr. Tremlett was trying very hard to look quite abstracted
and unconcerned, but Mr. Tuck saw at a glance that he was
guilty.
I suppose their remark about the boy was intended for me,
said Mr. Tremlett looking very meekly upon a sheet of blank
letter paper which lay before him.
Mr. Tuck, made no verbal comment upon this confession,
but he looked a very eloquent look at his partner.
I met the boy by accident, continued Mr. Tremlett and I
thought I might do a worse thing than to adopt him and
give him a home and an education.
Is it possible said Mr. Tuck, and have you really done
it?
Yes, replied Mr. Tremlett, I have taken him into my
house and I hope to make something of him.
Well, all I can say is, said Mr. Tuck, it is a strange world
we live in. And having delivered himself of this original
remark, he left the office to go on Change where he related the
astounding events of the morning to several merchants of his
acquaintance, who made their own particular comments
accompanied by a good many mysterious winks. But
it was a little singular that not one of them had the charity to
give Mr. Tremlett credit for the smallest scrap of benevolence
in adopting the boy, but on the contrary almost all of them
made remarks which the usages of society will not allow
us to put into print.
But the good old merchant felt very happy in his reflections
although he knew that his motives in adopting the boy would
be misrepresented, and his fame aspersed, yet he never once
repented of the act, but on the contrary felt a keen regret that
he should have been self-deprived of so great a pleasure so long.
He felt very strangely while the ladies were talking to his
partner, and as he foresaw at first that his secret must come
out, he had ample time to fortify himself against its
development
.
And now he felt more at his ease than he had done for
along time. A great load appeared to have been removed
from his breast, and he experienced a degree of satisfaction
and self contentment, that he had never known before. As
soon as Mr. Tuck had left the office he called in Mr. Bates, the
head book-keeper, to consult with him about a school for his
young charge, for Mr. Bates was the only married man, who
had children, in the employ of Tremlett and Tuck, and of
course he was the most fitting person to consult with on such
an occasion. Mr. Bates was completely thunderstruck and
entirely overcome at the nature of his employer's
communication
.
The secret was out. But he reserved all his notes of
exclamation for another occasion when it would be more
proper to indulge in them. As to a school he could not
impart
any very satisfactory information, as his own children went
to the district school, but he would ask the opinion of
Professor
Dobbins, his wife's brother, who was quite familiar with
every department of human knowledge, but particularly so
with education, as he had delivered lectures upon that subject.
Mr. Bates returned to his ledger considerably elevated in his
feelings at the signal mark of confidence which he had
received
from his employer; and when one of the younger
clerks asked him what the old fellow wanted, he intimated to
him in a fond style that such familiarities were quite offensive
and unbecoming. He always tried very hard to check anything
like freedom in any body, in any manner beneath him, whether
in age orstation; but somehow or other it so happened that all
his efforts had an effect directly opposite to what he intended
they should have, and nobody ever manifested any particular
dread in his presence excepting very small boys. Mr. Bates
rarely paid any attention to anybody who was either poorer
or younger than himself, but there was one person, who was
both, to whose judgment he submitted and whose commands
he obeyed with the meekest grace possible. This was no other
than his wife who was not only his better, but his larger half.
He was short and round-faced with two little sneaking black
whiskers on his face, which always seemed to have a retiring
look as though they were ashamed of themselves, and she was
tall and thin with long sandy coloured ringlets dangling down
her cheeks, and continually bobbing about as though they
cared for nothing and nobody. Mrs. Bates had the tact to
discern
when she was first married, and perhaps sooner, that
unless
she tyranized over her husband, he would certainly lord
it over her; and, of course, she followed the line of conduct
which spirited women do in such cases.
Mr. Bates very soon closed his ledger and hurried home to
tell his wife the news and ask her opinion about it.
What do I think about it? said Mrs. Bates, when her
husband had imparted the facts to her, why I think he is a
wicked old wretch and I only wish I had the will of him.
Why the fact is, said Mr. Bates, I thought that
something
must be wrong myself, I must confess.
And here we are grieved to confess that Mr. Bates in this
assertion departed very widely from the truth, for he though
no such thing; he had known Mr. Tremlett too long an
too well to believe, for a moment, that there was anything
wrong about the matter. And so he should have told Mrs.
Bates and have reproved her for her unworthy suspicions. But
this is the way with little minds; they will sooner join in
aspersing
an absent friend than offend a present one by opposing
him. And these are the kind of people who pass through the
world as very good-natured souls. But it is a comfortable
reflection
that such people will get their deserts in the next
world, if they do not in this.
Men deserve hanging! exclaimed Mrs. Bates, who seemed
to be apprehensive that her husband might think that she was
inclined to be too tender towards the rough sex, and was
positively anxious to counteract any such delusion. They
are all wrong, and all bad.
Well I do believe dear, said Mr. Bates in a conciliatory
tone, that he is a very sly old fellow, after all; but I must
say, that is, I never knew anything to the contrary before,
but I have said, you know, dear, that he was a very nice sort
of an old gentleman.
And pray who is the mother of the boy? what is the
creature's name? asked Mrs. Bates.
I declare, dear, that is something I never inquired about;
and in fact he never said a word to me on the subject; and
it wouldn't have appeared well in me to speak of it first, you
know.
Just like you, said Mrs. Bates, you always do things
by the halves, you never was good for any thing.
Why the fact is, dear, said Mr. Bates in a deprecating
tone, It wouldn't have did for me to say anything about
that.
I know, said the lady, men are all alike.
Not all dear, said Mr. Bates, there's me you know.
Now don't provoke me, said the lady, don't.
Of course, said Mr. Bates, I didn't mean to provoke you,
dear. Get out of my sight, said Mrs. Bates, you
bald-headed
old thing and attend to your business, if you have got
any to attend to. For my part I must go and make some calls.
But stop, don't go until you have given me some money. I
must buy myself a shawl.
Mr. Bates was almost determined to refuse the money, out
of revenge to his wife for calling him a bald-headed old thing.
If there had been any truth in the epithet he wouldn't have
cared so much about it. But to be called a bald-headed old
thing when there was only a small place on the crown of his
head not bigger than a dollar which was bare, was a little too
severe even for Mrs. Bates; and he had no sooner reached
her his pocket book than he repented of it and was almost
determined to snatch it back again. But he didn't; neither
did he make any audible or otherwise manifest expression of
his feelings, but for the sake of peace, as he persuaded himself,
he put on his hat and gloves and walked quietly back to his
duties; whilst Mrs. Bates put on hers and hastened with all
possible speed to Mr. Tremlett's house, where she inquired for
Mrs. Swazey, and that excellent housekeeper being at home,
the two ladies, after despatching a few unimportant matters,
such as the rise in calicoes and the qualities of Irish
servants, drew their chairs close together, and went to work
with a regular business-like manner, as though they were old
hands and understood perfectly well what they were about,
and began to tear the characters of the good Mr. Tremlett and
his innocent little protege into the veriest rags and tatters.
And were it not that a man must carry his character about
with him, to take its hue from the actions with which he
brings it in contact, the old merchant would have been in a
most pitiable condition indeed. For it would be a lesser
crime to take a man's coat than his character, although the
latter
offence, the law, which is always on the wrong side of a
question, winks at, but punishes the thief with becoming
severity.
When the two ladies had entirely exhausted their subject
they took an affectionate leave of each other, with a
comforting
and mutual congratulation that some folks were not
quite
so deep as they thought for; and that some people could
see
quite
as far in the dark as some other people.
It does not often happen that when two ladies meet
together
for the express purpose of scandalizing a third person,
that the result of their labours is beneficial to anybody, but
it so happened in this instance. For Mrs. Bates having
convinced
Mrs. Swazey that Mr. Tremlett was moved by a stronger
principle than mere benevolence in adopting the boy, the
feelings
of that discreet lady towards him underwent a complete
revolution, for she very naturally concluded that the surest
way of ingratiating herself into the good graces of her
employer
would be to treat his favorite with kindness. And to do
the good lady justice, she was in reality glad of an excuse for
treating him with consideration; for he was every day
winning
on her affections in spite of her animosity to him. And
Bridget, seeing that her superior in station, had changed her
mode of treatment, gave a loose rein to her feelings and
whenever
the youngster came in her way she almost devoured him
with caresses.
CHAPTER VII.
WILL INTRODUCE THE LEARNED PROFESSOR DOBBINS TO
THE READER, AND MAKE HIM ACQUAINTED WITH
THE LEARNED PROFESSOR'S IDEAS ON EDUCATION.
MR. Tremlett had delayed sending his adopted son to
school from day to day, until he had become so
accustomed
to the lively prattle and affectionate ways of the child
that he could not bring himself to think of even a temporary
separation. Every day he discovered some new trait in the
boy's character to excite his admiration and strengthen his
affection. He slept in a chamber adjoining to Mr. Tremlett's
and the old gentleman never retired to his bed without taking
a look at him, and remembering him in his bed-side prayer.
Mrs. Swazey treasured up all his smart sayings and surprising
actions, which she never failed to retail to her employer
when he came home to his dinner, and if she had ever any
reason to fear his displeasure, she was sure to remember some
marvellous and bright saying of Johnny's to tell him. Even
David the coachman, whenver he went down to the
counting-room
,
always had something to whisper in the old
gentleman's
ear about master John, which never failed to give him
immense satisfaction. So that, had not Mr. Tremlett come to the
conclusion, from his own observation, that his adoptedson was
the most remarkable child in the world, the reports of others
must have led him to do so. It is a great thing indeed, to
be the favorite of one who has it in his power to grant favors,
for then you are the favorite of all the rest of the world. But
8
little Johnny had merits enough of his own to entitle him to
to the favor of the world without regard to the favouritism
of his sole protector; yet let us not be disappointed if he
should meet with disfavour bye and bye, for merit does not
always win its way, as our reader doubtless knows.
But Mr. Tremlett knew that however good the natural
talents of his son might be, and however great his genius, that
they would be worthless to him in an age where men act
according to prescribed rules, and live not out of themselves
but out of books, without book-learning; and as he knew not
what better course to take, he resolved at last to procure a
private tutor for the boy, but as he doubted his own fitness to
select a competent person for the high trust, he determined to
ask the advice of professor Dobbins, the learned
brother-in-law
of Mr. Bates, who could not, as a matter of course, be
otherwise than competent to advise in such an emergency,
because he was a professor.
It fortunately happened that the professor was staying at
the house of Mr. Bates for a few days; and when Mr.
Tremlett
signified to the book-keeper that he wished to consult with
his brother-in-law on such an important occasion, that
gentleman
extolled the learning and accomplishments of his relation
to such a degree, that the kind-hearted old gentleman resolved
to see him that very night, and insisted on accompanying Mr.
Bates, when he went home to his tea. The book-keeper
could not refuse such an honor, of course; but he would have
been very glad to have had an opportunity of getting his wife's
consent first; but as the time would not admit of it, he made
a very desperate resolution not to care for any thing that she
might say or do.
When they entered the house, Mr. Bates left his employer
in the parlor, and went into the kitchen to acquaint his wife
with what he had done.
The fact is, dear, said Mr. Bates, he wants to consult
with the professor, about a tutor for the young gentleman.
He shall do no such thing! said the lady, and do you
go and turn the old sinner out of my house: my brother shall
not keep company with such people; if
you
see fit to do so
you may; but
my
family shall not disgrace themselves!
Why, the fact is, dear, we must treat him respectfully,
you know, because I expect one of these days to be taken into
the firm. And besides, every body is liable to do wrong,
sometimes
,
added Mr. Bates.
Now don't provoke me, don't! said the lady; the Lord
knows I have trials enough already. But what do you stand
there for? Why don't you go and talk to him, till the
professor
comes home? Do go and leave me or I shall fly out
of my skin.
Mr. Bates returned to the parlor to entertain his employer;
and Mrs. Bates immediately began to wash the children's faces
and to give the most imperative orders to her servant about
setting the tea-table. It was surprising to see with what
earnestness and dexterity she set herself to work to snug up
the tea-room; and with what a lavish hand she dished out
preserved plumbs and quinces from earthen pots, which were
tied up and labelled in the most careful manner. Such racing
up and down the back stairs, and such a commotion in the
kitchen, had not been known before. One would have thought
that the lady was making preparations to entertain a very
distinguished
guest instead of one whom she held in such utter
abhorrence. But if the exertions of Mrs. Bates, in her
preparations
for tea, were calculated to excite surprise, after the
scene between her and Mr. Bates, what will the reader think
when he is informed that that virtuous lady not only dressed
her person in her most elegant dress, but that she clothed her
face in the sweetest smiles of which it was capable, as she
entered the parlor, and requested Mr. Tremlett and her
husband
to walk out to tea; and as she took her seat at the table
she apologised for every thing upon it, and declared that there
was nothing fit to eat, but that if she had only known that Mr.
Tremlett was going to honor her and the professor with his
company, she would have tried to get
something
for him.
Mr. Tremlett thought the supper very abundant and very
good; but Mrs. Bates would not believe those were his real
sentiments; indeed she was sure from his not eating anything
that they could not be. Upon which the kind hearted old
gentleman helped himself very extravagantly to every thing,
because he would not hurt the lady's pride by not partaking
of her luxuries. But the two children looked at him and
seemed to think, `never fear, he'll eat enough, particularly of
the quinces.' Mrs. Bates, however, continued to insist that he
did'nt eat anything, and kept prompting `my love,' which was
her dress phrase for Mr. Bates, to hand the cake, until the old
gentleman felt very glad to escape from her attentions. It so
happened that the professor did not come home until they had
left the table, but as he was engaged to deliver a lecture the
same evening on the early settlement of Byefield, he did not
take tea.
The professor was a tall thin young man, with high cheek
bones, a pointed chin and waxy complexion, his eyes were
light, his hair of no particular colour, and but very little of it.
Mr. Tremlett could not remember that he had ever seen a
professor before, but professor Dobbins exactly realized his
ideal, excepting that he should have worn a white cambric
neck-cloth instead of a bombazine stock. As soon as he was
informed of the object of Mr. Tremlett's visit, he broke out in a
discourse on education, and particularly self-education in
which he made a display of the most thrilling eloquence.
Both Mr. and Mrs. Bates listened with profound admiration,
and Mr. Tremlett appeared to be very much puzzled if he
was not very much pleased.
Education, sir, said the professor, rising from his seat
and resting his left hand on the back of a chair, while he
elevated his right arm; education is like a river; and
then after a sufficient pause to give his great idea time to sink,
as it were, into the very depths of his auditors' understanding
he proceeded; Education is a river, which made up of
many insignificant little springs and rills, yet flows on, a
mighty current, majestic in its grandeur, irresistible in its
might, self-acting, fertilizing in its course, and bearing upon
its bosom the meanest and the mightiest things; increasing
in majesty and might as it flows, just as it has attained to
its greatest depth and magnitude, it is suddenly swallowed
up in the occean and its end is as obscure as its rise.
So with the human mind, or what we call education; at
first it is but a little rivulet of reason, but every day the
springs of life rush in and swell its volume and its capacity,
until it increases in might so that it begins to weigh the stars
and grasp at the hidden things of Nature; when suddenly just
as its flood is at the strongest, it is swallowed up in the occean
of death, and we see it nor hear of it more. But the places
through which it has flowed, will bear witness of its presence;
and the banks and meadows it has fertilized will yield a full
harvest of rich fruits and bright flowers. But sir, the river
will never be lost; it only seems to be. Does it not keep
flowing
on? It goes into the ocean, the ocean yields it to the
clouds, the clouds, which you think are bound on aimless
errands
,
bear it back again to the mountain top, the hill side
and the little lake, and these again return it to its wonted
course, and thus the river flows on forever and forever. So
with education. Do you think that the scholar's learning, or
the merchant's experience, or the statesman's eloquence, are
buried with them when they lie down in the grave? No! It
is a poor thought. The laws which govern mind, govern
matter
.
But if matter never dies, how much more shall thought
live. You know not how many lessons you have given
yourself
,
sir, and you would be startled if all those could be placed
before you who have been taught by you, and who will
themselves
teach others the lessons they learned of you when you
little dreamed that you were teaching. But we are all
teachers as we are all learners. I once knew a gentleman
who had several sons, but his income would only allow him
to give but one of them the advantages of a collegiate
education
,
so he selected out the feeblest one among them and sent
him to college. The young man, to show his gratitude for
the partiality of his father, studied hard and ruined his health;
the year that he graduated he died, and the whole burden of
his father's grief was the loss of the money which he had
expended
,
as he thought, to no purpose. O, if I had only
educated
one of my other sons he would say. But the poor
foolish
man did not perceive that his money had been laid out to
good purpose in educating a soul for eternity, and that his son
imparted as much learning to others as he gained himself.
From these remarks you will perceive the nature of my views
on education.
It is all very correct, no doubt; observed Mr. Tremlett,
but is there no particular system of education that you would
recommend?
The system that I would recommend, said the professor,
is the system of Nature. Follow Nature.
But it is not a very easy matter to determine what Nature
is, where all is the effect of Art, replied Mr. Tremlett.
Nature is every where, she is every thing, said the
professor
;
listen to her; she speaks to you in the cataract; in
the noiseless dews; the stars, the sun, the moon, all speak to
you.
Very true, I grant it, replied the merchant, but they do
not speak an intelligible language, to me at least; they
require
an interpreter; and I have generally found that those
who associate most with Nature have the least knowledge of
her.
Then study the works of men's hands, replied professor
Dobbins, a noble cathedral speaks a sublimer language than
any poem, satire or painting; it stands out of doors and all
men may read it.
But we have no cathedrals, said Mr. Tremlett.
Then build them; replied the professor, giving the back
of the chair an emphatic blow, as much as to say there's a
clincher.
But that would be an expensive mode of educating my
boy, professor, said Mr. Tremlett, to say nothing of the
time it would require. Your cathedrals are not constructed
in a day like your shingle meeting houses. Pray, do you not
consider books essential in education?
Books are well enough, replied the professor, perhaps
very well; Hesiod, Homer, Horace and Heraclitus; Plato,
Plutarch
,
Pliny and Polybius; Socrates, Sophocles; Simonides
andandSmollet; all contain something. The languages
too it is perhaps well enough to know something about.
Study Greek, Hebrew, Latin, Syriac, Persian, and Coptic;
read all the English classics; in short read everything; the
German is a very good language, read plenty of that; read
Spanish, French, Italian and Portuguese authors, even Dutch;
several of their authors have written on dykes and tulips.
Don't neglect the Dutch. They give an excellent idea of
squareness, something which does not exist in Nature. But
don't neglect Nature. Play on the organ and the German
flute, and cultivate the soil; deliver lectures and mingle with
your fellow beings. Your fellow beings are very well for
society.
The fact is, said Mr. Bates interposing, the professor
has got so much learning himself that he
I hope my love, you are not going to pretend to instruct
the professor! said Mrs. Bates interrupting him.
I was only going to observe, dear, that
Then I desire that you just won't, said the lady, with
an air; for she began to be tired of the subordinate part of a
listener.
The professor, thinking, no doubt, that he had succeeded
in giving Mr. Tremlett a high idea of his abilities as a teacher,
generously offered to resign his situation as Professor of
Penmanship
and belles letters in the Bye-field Academy, and
undertake
the education of the boy, himself, for a moderate
salary.
I will give you a specimen of my manner of teaching, he
said, Peter step out and answer a few questions.
This was addressed to Mr. Bates' eldest son, who
immediately
stepped out in front of his mother and made a bow.
The fact is, said Mr. Bates, it is only three days since
the professor took Peter in hand, and I think he has learned
astonishing.
You
think! said Mrs. Bates in an under tone, meant to
reach her husband's ear alone; as though it was a pretty joke
for Mr. Bates to pretend to exercise his thoughts.
Now Peter, said the professor, what is existence?
Existence is a word, said Peter.
Very good, said the professor, what idea does the word
convey to the mental perception?
It is a word signifying to be, to do, and to suffer; replied
the pupil.
Peter! said the professor sternly, consider what you are
saying.
The fact is the child is a little confused; said Mr. Bates
turning to his employer, and looking in an opposite direction
to his wife.
O, now I know, said Peter, and his father's eyes
glistened
with delight, and the professor stood very erect and looked
very professional. Existence is a troglodyte.
Merciful powers! exclaimed the professor.
The child is only in his tenth year, said Mr. Bates.
But never mind existence, said the professor, let us
ascend
to the higher branches. Now Peter, speak up; what is
man?
A man, a mana man is a brute, replied Peter.
How exceedingly annoying, said the agitated professor.
What are all men, my nephew, what is their
distinguishing
peculiarities? It was but yesterday that you told me.
Now.
All men are brutes, replied Peter.
Oh, oh! groaned the dissappointed professor.
Well, said Peter, that's what mother says.
To be sure I say so, added the lady, and why do you
not learn him brother to say that men are wicked
hypocritical
creatures?
Because, sister, replied the professor, with forced
calmness
,
that is my definition of woman.
At this the lady burst into tears, and catching her son in her
arms, rushed out of the room, leaving the professor and Mr.
Tremlett overwhelmed with astonishment. But Mr. Bates
was not in the least astonished as he had been expecting such
a
finale
, ever since the examination of Peter commenced, but
he was very much frightened for he knew on whose head the
full blast of the storm would descend.
As the hour had arrived for the professor to go to the
Lyceum
where he was to deliver his lecture, he and Mr.
Tremlett
took their hats and left the house together.
Although it might gratify the scandal-loving part of our
readers to know what transpired between Mr. and Mrs. Bates
after Mr. Tremlett left the house, it would be a wide
departure
from our design in writing this history, to relate it; and
we shall, therefore, even at the risk of displeasing some of our
readers, close this chapter, and in the next return to the
subject
of this memoir, whom we do not mean to keep long out
of sight.
9
CHAPTER VIII.
RELATES AN ACCIDENT WHICH ALMOST BRINGS THIS
HISTORY
TO A CONCLUSION.
ALTHOUGH Mr. Tuck loved money for its own sake,
and hoarded it up for no other purpose than to see how
much he could die possessed of, and was of course extremely
parsimonious, yet he was not entirely destitute of human
feelings
;
and if he was never generous he was always very exact
in performing a promise. His younger brother had died a few
years before the commencement of this history and having
left but slender means for the support of his widow and three
children, Mr. Tuck had, perhaps in an unguarded moment
when the sluices of his heart were forced open by a flood of
grief, promised to educate the children at his own expense,
and he had continued to do so, but by way of a set off, perhaps
to check any undue expectations in their mother, he
manifested
not the least regard for them in any other manner.
When Mr. Tremlett related to him the terrific meeting at
the house of Mr. Bates, and told him of the embarrassment he
laboured under in respect to a tutor for his son, Mr. Tuck
advised him to send the boy to the same school where he had
placed his nephews; and it being in the immediate
neighborhood
of Mr. Tremlett's house, he determined to do so, and the
boy was accordingly put under the charge of the Rev. Doctor
Hodges who found him quick to learn, extremely docile, and
although not wanting in spirit, yet gentle and affectionate in
his manners. Being beautiful in his person and presumptive
heir to a large fortune, it will not be thought a strange thing
that the school-master conceived a great liking for his new
pupil, and that he took great pains in teaching him, and great
pride in his advancement. Under the tutelage of the good
doctor, the boy soon learned a good deal of Latin and something
about fluxions and decimal fractions; but under the tutelage
of the two young Tucks he learned a good many things which
boys generally learn at school, but for which no extra charge
is made in the bill, although they have to be paid for at a dear
rate in some other shape. In those days young ladies'
seminaries
and female colleges were not as common as they are at
the present enlightened period of the world, and little girls
generally received the rudiments of their education under the
same roofs with little boys; it was the case in the present
instance
and little Julia Tuck was always accompanied to school
by one or both of her brothers. She was about the same age
as John Tremlett, but her brothers were both older, and the
first time that she saw him she showed a decided preference
for him, and she would persist in calling him her
beau
,
notwithstanding
her mother punished her for it. And although
he joined in all her hilarious frolics, yet he did not
manifest
that liking for her that she did for him. But they were
only children and the attachments of children are seldom
lasting
:
they easily accommodate themselves to the company of
whatever companions chance throws in their way, and as
easily forget them when separated; they are seldom capricious
in their tastes, and rarely show decided preferences. But
sometimes attachments formed in early childhood continue
through life, because the same sympathies would have
attracted
the same individuals at any period of their existence.
Julia Tuck was by no means a beautiful child: she had a
dark complexion, and regular features; her hair was black
and luxuriant, but her forehead was low, and her figure
slight; there was a peculiar charm in her voice, and she
always
appeared joyous and happy, and was somewhat of a
romp. But she was very passionate, and when her
inclinations
were opposed, she showed a stubborness of purpose
uncommon
in a girl of her years. Her brothers, Tom and Fred
could both boast of more personal beauty than their sister.
Tom Tuck was a forward boy; he was a favorite both with
his mother and teacher, and indeed with all elderly people
who knew him; and although he was known among the boys
to be the greatest rogue in the school, he always contrived to
escape punishment, and was very rarely found out in any of
his misdoings. Fred Tuck was the youngest of the brothers,
and although not a whit more virtuous than Tom, yet he had
such an innocent manner, that nobody ever believed him to
be intentionally guilty whenever he was detected in any
mischief
that he undertook, and he was always sure to be found
out, let him do what he would. He was forever poring
over a book, but it never happened to be the one that
contained his lesson. If Robinson Crusoe and Rinaldo
Rinaldini
had been elementary works in the Rev. Mr. Hodges'
school, there can be no doubt that Fred Tuck would have
been the best scholar in it; but as they were not, he was
perhaps
the very worst. He was very fond of history; that is,
the history of impossible personages and improbable events;
and he would sit in his mother's kitchen, of a winter's
evening
,
and listen to the tales of rebellions and fairies, related by
an old Irish servant, until the purring of the cat would make
him start with fear, and he would not have looked behind him
for all the world. He was a comely boy; he had a fair round
face and a clear complexion, light blue eyes, and soft curly
hair. These two boys took young Tremlett under their
protection
as soon as he made his appearance at school. Whether
it was that they took compassion on his lone condition, or
that they discovered he had more money to spend than
themselves
,
does not appear; but they would not allow anybody
else to be intimate with him; and whenever there was a fight
which was once a day at least, the three boys were sure to be
found ranged on one side. But for some cause or other, the
mother of these children declared hostilities against him as
soon as she heard of him. She not only would not allow
him to enter her house, but she commanded her children not
to speak to him. Perhaps it was some excuse for Mrs. Tuck,
that she came from a very good family, and like all
descendants
of good families, she held in utter scorn everybody that
was base-born or vulgar, unless they were rich; the genuine
aristocratic principle being, that wealth can atone for the want
of birth and talents, or that birth can atone for both, but that
talents cannot atone for the want of either. Children,
however
,
are not apt to be aristocratic in their ideas; and as the
young Tucks coud not enter into their mother's feelings, they
did not pay the least regard to her commands, but continued
to cultivate a very good understanding with their companion.
It was almost a year since he had been at school; he had
made great improvement, and all effects of his early
associations
had disappeared. He was the pet and the darling of a
little circle, where there was no one to contend with him for
empire in the hearts of those who loved him. Mrs. Swazey,
from at first appearing to love him, had got to loving him in
reality, and Mr. Tremlett every day discovered some fresh
cause for admiration. He had become essential to the old
man's happiness, and he began to feel that life would be a
burden without him. But an event soon occurred which for
a time threatened to sever all those ties which had become so
closely drawn together, and to deprive the fond old merchant
of his chief solace and source of pleasure, and to drive his son
into the world again, to encounter all its trials and privations.
It was on the occason of some great gathering on the
Battery
,
when all the idle people of the great city of New York
appeared to have been attracted by a common sympathy to
that beautiful spot, that the two Tucks, in company with their
companion, made their appearance among the crowd, and by
their shouts helped to increase the hubbub and confusion.
Of course there were many personages present, of greater
importance
than these three young gentlemen, and who
probably
attracted more attention at the time; but as we believe
there were none there for whom the reader will feel a greater
interest.
Whether it was the arrival of some great man, or the
execution
of some great rogue, that caused the gathering, is not
material to the right understanding of this history; but it was
a gay and exhilarating scene. The day was warm, yet not
oppressive; and a timely shower in the morning had washed
the dust from the trees, and given to the grass on the Battery,
and the opposite shores of New-Jersey and Governor's Island,
an appearance of verdant beauty. The bay was covered
with boats, which were moving about in all directions, with
gay pennons flying, and from some strains of martial music
proceeded, and from others, the reports of fire-arms. On shore
crowds of elegantly-dressed women were jostled by crowds
of badly-dressed men; and nurses were out-screaming the
interesting
little creatures placed under their protection; while
numerous companies of citizen soldiery were performing
evolutions
that Napoleon never dreamed of, to the immense delight
of innumerable little black boys, who were perched on the over
hanging branches of the elms and sycamores; and sentinels,
as fierce as regimentals could render them, were repelling the
invasion of any stray cow or old apple-woman that might
chance to encroach upon the district placed for the time under
martial law. Bands of music were playing, and guns were
popping off in every direction. Every body seemed
resolutely
bent upon making a noise, and our three young gentlemen
had every disposition to increase the tumult, by letting off a
few squibs and crackers; but on examining their pockets,
they discovered that they could not muster a sixpence between
them. It chanced unluckily, that Mr. Tremlett was out of
town, and John could think of no way to procure some
money. Tom Tuck tried to persuade him to pawn his watch
but that he resolutely refused to do, because his father (for so he
called Mr. Tremlett,) had given it to him but a few days
before
.
He said he would not part with it to procure himself
bread, much less squibs. While they were trying to hit upon
some plan for raising the necessary funds for a frolic, their
mortification was increased, and their desires were excited, by
a party of youngsters of their acquaintance, who rowed past
in a boat, with a horse pistol and a flask of powder. At last
Fred Tuck said he knew where his mother kept her purse,
and he promised, if the two would wait for him, to go and
bring it. Accordingly he started off, and his brother Tom
and his companion indulged themselves during his absence
with a couple of hard boiled eggs, and a bottle of ginger-beer,
meaning to pay for them as soon as the adventurer returned
But that enterprizing young gentleman soon came back, quite
out of breath, and as destitute of money as when he left.
His mother had caught him in the very act of breaking open her
bureau, and he had to fight hard to escape. They were now
placed in a very disagreeable situation. They had before
them a practical illustration of the evils of the credit system.
They had contracted a debt, with the expectation of paying
it out of the proceeds of an uncertain adventure, and being
dissappointed in its issue, they were involved in great distress
which was very much heightened by a boatman coming up
to them, and offering to row them about the bay for a dollar.
It was such a gay exciting scene upon the water; the boat
lay rocking so temptingly, with a white awning stretched
fore and aft; what should they do? The Tucks knew
nothing
about restraining their desires; it was a part of their
education that had been neglected. Their mother was
always
fearful of spoiling their dispositions by crossing their
inclinations; and so she always let them have their own way
when it did not interfere very much with her own.
Here I would willingly pause, and either bring this history
to a close, or blot out from it the transactions of this gala-day;
but as we have already promised to record all the controlling
events of our hero's life, we feel ourselves bound to do so,
however
prejudicial it may prove to his reputation, or repugnant
to our feelings.
After many idle suggestions on the part of the Tucks, Tom
at last hit upon one that promised to afford the required
funds.
I know how I could get some money, and our own money
too, said Tom Tuck.
How? how? eagerly inquired the other two.
I know exactly where my uncle Gris. keeps his
pocket-book
,
in his desk, and I could very easily get it, said Tom;
and it would only be taking it a little in advance, you know,
Fred, because mother says he will leave all his money to us
when he dies; and he can't live much longer, so what
difference
does it make, whether we take it now, or after he is
dead?
That is prime! said Fred; that is first rateisn't it
Johnny? That is capital! That is equal to Rinaldo
Rinaldini
.
Come, let us have it right off, Tom.
Whether it was because Johnny thought he had no right to
interfere in family arrangements, we cannot determine, but he
remained perfectly silent, and neither opposed nor approved
the proposition of the brothers to rob their uncle. It was
finally arranged between them that Tom and Fred should
proceed to their uncle's counting-room, and that while one of
them called the old gentlemen away, the other should riffle
his desk. Their companion in the mean time, was to remain
as a hostage with the dealer in hard-boiled eggs and
ginger-beer
.
But just as the two adventurers were about starting on
their perilous expedition, Tom Tuck said: I tell you how
it is Johnny, you are putting all the work upon us, while you
are not going to do any thing. At this imputation, young
Tremlett blushed, and held dawn his head.
Don't be a sneak, now, said Tom.
I have done all I can do, replied the boy.
Well then, if you don't do something, you shall not have
anything, said the wily Thomas, tauntingly.
What can I do, said the youngster.
You can go with me, and let Fred remain here, replied
Tom.
But I won't steal, if I do, replied our hero.
Nobody is going to steal; it's our own money; mother
has said so fifty times; hasn't she Fred?
Yes, fifty thousand times, said Fred.
John could think of no argument to oppose to the specious
reasoning of the young lawyers; and although he felt it was
wrong yet as he had been accustomed to look upon them as
his superiors, he thought they must be better judges than
himself
of what was right and proper. Besides, he could not bear
the idea of sharing in their money, while he incurred no part
of the risk of obtaining it; although he always shared his own
allowance with the two brothers, without expecting any thing
in return. And so he allowed himself to be led by them to
do what he knew was wrong, lest they should reproach him
with a want of courage.
All the clerks in the employ of Tremlett & Tuck had left
their desks, and gone down to see the parade upon the
Battery
,
with the exception of Mr. Bates, who remained in the
counting-room to post his books: but the unusual silence and
stillness of the office had such a soothing influence upon the
book-keeper's nerves, that he fell fast asleep while in the very
act of footing up a long column of figures; his head dropped
down upon his opened ledger, and being quite unconscious of
what he was doing, as all sleepy people are, with the
exception
of professed somnambulists, he had contrived to overturn
a bottle of red ink, and the contents of it were running down in
streams across the ledger, and along the side of his face;
giving him very much the appearance of a man with his
throat cut from ear to ear. Mr. Tuck was alone in the
private
office, apparently engaged in some absorbing calculations
10
at his desk, when his nephew Tom walked in, though a
private
entrance which led directly into the street.
Ah! Thomas, is that you? said Mr. Tuck, laying down
his pen.
How do you do, Uncle;are you pretty well? inquired
the young gentleman, affectionately.
Yes, pretty well; or rather, I am not very well; I took a
slight cold yesterday at an auction, replied the uncle.
I hope you are not going to be sick, uncle, said his
nephew.
I hope not, I hope not, said the uncle, coughing
slightly
;
but what, what brought you here just now?
I wanted you to see the soldiers, said Tom; they are
just marching along at the foot of the street.
What! soldiers? What a foolish boy! Do you think I
want to look at a regiment of counter-jumpers with bob-tail
coats on? I have got more profitable business than that to
attend to, Thomas.
Ah, but you never saw any thing so handsome! said
the boy; these are real soldiers, with great long swords
and guns: hark! hear the drums! You don't know how
fine they look; you can see them without going off the
stoop, too.
Well, well, said Mr. Tuck, since you have taken so
much trouble on my account, I will just step down to the foot
of the stairs to gratify you; but I would as soon look at a
drove of sheep with their fleeces painted red, as at a parcel of
men dressed up in regimentals, and marching through the
streets, without any object in view. I tell you it's a poor
way of making money, Thomas; there is no profit in it; it is
a most ridiculous waste of time; because, Thomas, it
requires
but a few hours to make a soldier of an able-bodied
man, when there is any real occasion for his services; and to
compel a poor white-livered denizen of a counting-room, or
one of the human fixtures in a cobbler's stall, or a tailor's shop
to shoulder a musket for a part of two days in the year, with
the idea of preparing him the better to defend his country, if
he should ever be called upon to do it, is too nonsensical.
By the time that Mr. Tuck had delivered himself of these
remarks, they had reached the bottom of the stairs that led to
the street door, and on looking out, there was not a soldier to
be seen.
But where are the soldiers, Thomas? inquired the old
gentleman.
They will soon be along, uncle; only wait a moment,'
replied Tom. I hear the drums now.
And then, Thomas, the thing is unjust, as well as absurd,'
continued Mr. Tuck; because the burden has to be borne
by those who are least able to bear it; but that is always the
case in public affairs. You see, Thomas, if it be actually
necessary for the safety of the country that men should learn
to be soldiers, a trifling fine of a few dollars ought not to be
considered a sufficient punishment for neglecting so important
a duty, because the rich can easily discharge the penalty,
while the poor cannot; and consequently they are compelled
to fight for their country, not because they have property at
stake, to protect which armies are raised, but because they
have not. You see the unreasonableness of it, Thomas.
Yes, uncle, said Thomas, but I don't see the soldiers
yet; I am afraid they have gone up the next street.
And if I had my way, Thomas, I would make the women
train, too, said Mr. Tuck.
That would be funny! said Tom; my! how I should
laugh to see a regiment of women go a-soldiering!
You see, Thomas, said the gallant old bachelor, the
women are eternally talking about their rights; they want to
vote, confound them! and if they will vote, they ought to
fight!
O, I have seen women fight, many a time, said the
youngster
:
only yesterday morning, I saw two great fat women
fighting, down in Fulton market: one of them took up a
weak-fish
,
and struck the other right in the face with it; my! didn't
they call each other names!
Just then John Tremlett was seen to pass the corner of the
street and although he must have heard Mr. Tuck and his
affectionate nephew talking together, yet he never turned his
head but walked quickly along.
I am afraid, uncle, you will take cold, standing here,
said Tom; you had better step back into the office, while I
run down the next street, and if I see the soldiers coming, I
will call you.
So saying, the youngster ran down the street, and Mr. Tuck
returned to his office, saying to himself, as he went: `What
an affectionate boy that Thomas is!most remarkable child;
always so considerate and respectful to old people! I shouldn't
wonder if I gave that boy something one of these days: if I
was sure of having just such a boy as that, I do n't know but
I might get married after a while, when the times get better:
plenty of women that would have me, I dare say; it wouldn't
cost much to bring up a boy like that; he never asks for
money, like some children.
I wonder, thought Mr. Tuck, what Mr. Bates is doing
I don't hear him stirring; and so, to satisfy his curiosity, he
lifted up a corner of the green curtain that hung before a little
window that looked into the outer office; but he suddenly let
it drop again, and came very near dropping himself; and if
he did not scream murder, it was because fright had deprived
him of utterance. Such a spectacle as met his eyes, would
have frightened a butcher. It requires but a very short space
of time to jump at a conclusion; and Mr. Tuck was not so
terrified
as to prevent his drawing an inference. Seeing, as he
supposed, his book-keeper lying with his throat cut, his first
thought was, that somebody had robbed him, and then murdered
his clerk; and going to his desk he discovered that his
pocket-book
it was gone, which confirmed his suspicion, and
quickened
his senses as much as the first glance at Mr. Bates had
stunned them; and running out into the street, he shouted,
Murder! murder! with all his might. The noise awoke the
book-keeper, who perceived at a glance the mischief he had
done; and he jumped at a conclusion and jumped off his stool
at the same moment. His first thought was, what his wife
would say to him, and his next to run to the nearest bath and
wash himself, before any body should see him. So he shut
up his ledger, and hurried down stairs in an opposite direction
to Mr. Tuck, for the store was on a corner, and as we have
already stated, there were two entrances to the counting-room.
A murder is a matter of interest to every body, and
therefore
Mr. Tuck was soon surrounded by a multitude of men
anxiously inquiring for particulars. But he was too much
excited to give any details: but told them to follow him,
and see for themselves; upon which a great number
crowded
up the narrow stairs, all anxious to have the first sight
of the horrid spectacle.
There he lies! said Mr. Tuck, turning away his head,
but pointing with his out-stretched arm to the door of the outer
office; and here is the place from which the murderer took
the pocket book.
Where is he? where is he? exclaimed half a dozen
voices; we don't see him.
Not see him! exclaimed Mr. Tuck with astonishment
as he elbowed his way into the outer office.
I see nothing that looks like a murdered man, but this
bottle of red ink that is spilled here, said one of the crowd.
Mr. Tuck was a second time rendered speechless with
astonishment
;
so he said nothing; but he looked as blank as a
new ledger.
Some of the men tittered, and some winked very
knowingly
,
but none of them indulged in outright laughter, because
they all knew that Mr. Tuck was very rich, and it would not
have been genteel to make light of a rich man's mishaps.
All I can say is, gentlemen, said Mr. Tuck, at last, it
is a very strange world that we live in. I know I have been
robbed of my pocket-book, and I am very certain that my
head book-keeper lay here a moment ago, with his throat
cut; but what has become of him, is more than I can say.
As Mr. Bates' house was but a few steps from the
counting-room
,
some humane individual, who had heard an
exaggerated
account of the disaster, had run there in great haste, and
informed Mrs. Bates that her husband had been murdered by
his employer, Mr. Tuck.
As the book-keeper's wife had promised herself the
prolonged
gratification of harrassing her husband to death by
piecemeal
,
she was not disposed to view the summary process of
Mr. Tuck in a very favorable light; but she hesitated a
moment
,
on first hearing the awful news, between going into
hysterics
,
and going down to the counting-room, to make a
display
of her outraged feelings: she determined, however, on
the latter course, as she would there have the greatest number
of spectators. So, without stopping to put on her bonnet, she
threw a shawl over her head, and ran with all speed to the
office of Tremlett & Tuck, where she arrived before all the
men had dispersed, who had been collected together by the
outcries of the junior partner. As she ran up the stairs with
great agility, the first intimation that Mr. Tuck had of
her presence, was a piercing shriek that went to his very
soul.
You sanguinary wretch! you old hoary-headed,
brown-wigged
murderer! You villain! you have made my poor
children fatherless, and me a widow! Where is his body!
let me see him! exclaimed Mrs. Bates in the first agony of
her lacerated feelings.
Woman, be still! exclaimed Mr. Tuck.
I won't be still! replied the imaginary widow; give
me my husband! O where is he!where is his murdered
body!
Poor creature! said one of the by-standers; it is a very
hard case; very hard case indeed.
Nothing feeds grief like sympathy, and these few words
had such an effect on Mrs. Bates, that she redoubled her
shrieks, and gave vent to her feelings in such piercing tones,
that Mr. Tuck was compelled to put his hands to his ears.
Don't let that woman come near me! he exclaimed;
take her away, take her away!
Give me my dear husband!give me back my husband!
still shrieked the lady, when in walked Mr. Bates, with his
face washed clean, and his coat buttoned up to his chin, to
hide the stains of the red ink on his shirt-bosom.
Here I am, dear, said Mr. Bates, in his most placid
manner
;
what is the matter dear?
People should be very cautious how they work themselves
up into a high passion, as it is one of the most difficult things
in the world to descend again to an ordinary level with ease
and credit to themselves. Mrs. Bates felt the full force of this
truth, when her husband made his appearance; and thinking
probably, that the most unnatural conduct would be the most
becoming on the occasion, she uttered another piercing scream,
and fell senseless into the arms of Mr. Tuck, who being quite
unprepared for her reception, fell with her, to the great danger
of both their necks; but fortunately, neither was much hurt,
although the merchant was very much frightened. The lady
obstinately refused to be brought to her senses, and she was
conveyed home in an omnibus, where the book-keeper learned
for the first time, the cause of all the confusion.
As soon as Mr. Tuck had collected his scattered senses, he
began to think about his pocket-book; and when he
remembered
that it must have been taken by some one who entered
his office through the room in which Mr. Bates sat writing at
his desk, he began to have suspicions of him.
A man with such a wife as that would do any thing!
said Mr. Tuck to himself; confound her! she called me a
brown-wigged old villain, and I'll have revenge of her!
Just as he had come to the determination of sending
for a police-officer to arrest him, Mr. Tremlett returned
to the counting-room, and on hearing Mr. Tuck's suspicions
of his book-keeper, he put them all at rest, by reminding his
partner that Mr. Bates had it in his power to rob them of any
amount he pleased, without any risk to himself, by false
entries
in their books; and it was not at all likely that he would
do so foolish a thing as to steal his pocket-book, when he must
know that suspicion would immediately attach to him.
But Mr. Tuck was unwilling to relinquish the idea that
there had been a conspiracy to rob him, and that Mrs. Bates
was at the bottom of it.
And while the two partners were arguing about the most
prudent means to be taken for the recovery of the pocket-book,
a messenger came in great haste to inform Mr. Tremlett that
his adopted son had been upset in a boat, and that he had been
taken from the water, as was supposed, lifeless. The old
merchant turned ghastly pale at the intelligence, and sank
back in his chair, quite overcome. But he revived again
immediately
,
and took his hat and cane, and hurried to his house,
where he found the boy, who had just begun to show signs
of life. A physician had been summoned, and all the means
that could be made use of, had been put in requisition for his
recovery. The old gentleman fell on his knees by the side of
the boy, and kissed his wet cheeks. Poor, dear child! he
exclaimed, I did not know that I loved you half so well. May
God in his mercy, spare you to me a little longer! Mrs.
Swazey was busily engaged rubbing him with hot flannels,
while Bridget was wringing her hands, and crying piteously.
After a while, the color returned to his cheeks, and he opened
his eyes and stared wildly around for a moment, and then
relapsed
into a lethargy again. But the physician pronounced
him out of danger, and he was put to bed, where Mr.
Tremlett
watched by him until morning.
`Ah! my poor boy!' said he, you shall never stir so far
from me again, until you are better able to take care of
yourself
.
He was anxious to learn all about the accident which
had so nearly proved fatal to the boy, but the physicians
having
advised him not to ask him any questions that would be
likely to excite him, he refrained from doing so. But as soon as
it was light, he despatched his coachman to find out the
boatman
who had rescued him, as he wished to reward him, as
well as learn from him all the particulars of the accident. In
about an hour the man returned, bringing the boatman with
him, whose name was Bill Van Tyne.
Brave fellow! said Mr. Tremlett, in the warmth of his
gratitude, you shall be rewarded for your exertions.
Well, I always like to save a gentlemen's son from
drowning
when I kin, said Mr. Van Tyne, because then I know
I shall get well paid for it; and I don't mind it if I do get
hurted a little. I have had a good many dollars given me for
saving people's lives sence I have first followed the water for
a living.
And how did this accident happen? inquired Mr.
Tremlett
.
Why you see, said Mr. Van Tyne, it was all the same
as if you was sitting here, and I was sitting there, and this
here table was a bar'l of 'ysters: then up gets one of the boys
on top, and begins to say how he will fling the pocket-book
overboard, because he said if he didn't 'twould be found out
arter he got hum.
The pocket-book! said Mr. Tremlett.
Yes, a yellow sheep-skin pocket-book, tied up with a piece
of red tape, said Mr. Van Tyne. Then little John, the littlest
boy, which almost got drownded, got up and swore he
should'nt do no such thing.
Did he swear? asked Mr. Tremlett.
Well, I can't rightly say whether he did or not, said the
boatman, but he said to the other, I believe he called him
Tom, that he shouldn't throw it overboard, because he was
11
going to carry it back again. Then all three on'em had a
clinch, and I jumped in between 'em, and fust I perceived, I'm
blest if I don't wish I may never see another 'yster, if the boat
didn't capsize; and before I know'd what I was doing, I was
ten foot under water. So says I to myself, Fanny you are
done for this heat, any how you can fix it!
What, was there a woman on board? asked Mr.
Tremlett
.
No, not exactly a woman, replied Mr. Van Tyne, only
Fanny Kemble, that's the boat's name.
Ah, said Mr. Tremlett; then what became of little
Johnny, as you call him?
Well, when I come up and blowed, he said I looked
round and there was two of the youngsters clinging to the
boat, but the littlest one I couldn't see; so I looked down in
the water, and there I seen him. He looked green enough, I
tell you, and all crinkling like; so says I, it won't do to let a
gentleman's son go off in that way, no how; so I fetched a
good long breath, and down I div, and just caught him by
the hair of his head. And so another boat picked us up; and
that was the way of it.
And this pocket-book, said Mr. Tremlett; what did
the boys say about it?
Well, perhaps I shouldn't like to tell, said the boatman.
Why not, Sir? asked Mr. Tremlett.
Well I don't know; perhaps I might, if I had any thing
giv to me to make it a consideration, replied Mr. Van Tyne.
We shall see about that another time, said Mr. Tremlett;
call here again at three o'clock, and I will then pay you.
So Mr. Van Tyne left the house, and Mr. Tremlett returned
to his son's bed-side, with sad misgivings in his mind. As
the youngster was quite recovered, he asked him about the
pocket book, how it came into his possession, and what it
contained
.
At first he was going to deny any knowledge of it;
but Mr. Tremlett told him if he detected him in a falsehood,
he would send him back to the Asylum from whence he had
taken him, and that he would never see him again. And
thereupon, the boy made a full confession of how Tom Tuck
called his uncle out of the office, while he slipped in at the
other door, and finding Mr. Bates asleep, softly opened the
door of the private office, and took the pocket-book out of Mr.
Tuck's desk, and then slipped out again by the same way he
had entered, without waking Mr. Bates.
Although he made a full confession of the manner in which
he had stolen the pocket-book, yet he did not attempt to
criminate
the Tucks by relating the specious arguments by which
they had overcome his aversion to the act, but on the
contrary
,
he rather strove to shield them from any blame. But
Mr. Tremlett could not fail to perceive that Tom Tuck was
the principal instigator in the business; and therefore he
resolved
that the two brothers should bear their full share of
the blame; for although he would have gladly hushed the
matter up, yet it was of too serious a nature to be passed lightly
over. The pocket-book was still missing, and John could not
tell what had become of it. Tom Tuck had it in his
possession
when the boat upset, but whether it had been lost, or
whether he still had it, could not be known. Mr. Tremlett
was too much agitated by the discovery he had made, to
attend
to any business. He sent a note, therefore, to his
partner
,
stating that he had some important information to impart
to him, which brought him immediately to his house.
Mr. Tuck was overwhelmed with astonishment and
indignation
,
when he heard how his pocket-book had been stolen;
he sent for his two nephews and their mother, who soon made
their appearance; the lady looking very grand, and the two
boys very demure and innocent. Their sister also came with
them, and she contrived to seat herself in a chair by the side
of her favorite, which Mrs. Tuck no sooner perceived, than she
made her remove her seat to the opposite side of the room.
On hearing the accusation against her two boys, the lady
burst into tears, while the youngsters themselves swore it was
a lie from beginning to end; and that they had never seen the
pocket-book, nor heard a syllable about it before. Their
mother called little Johnny a thieving, lying brat, and said
she always knew some harm would come to her children, by
their associating with such a creature. Just then Bill Van
Tyne, the boatman, made his appearance, and not only
confirmed
all that young Tremlett had disclosed, but also related
the conversation which passed between the boys, while they
were proving so clearly that they had a perfect right to the
property of their uncle. This the two brothers also denied;
and their mother bestowed some very choice expressions not
only upon the boatman, but upon Mr. Tremlett and his son,
whom she called by a name that it is not necessary to repeat.
Well, exclaimed Mr. Van Tyne, if that don't beat all my
wife's relations! I never seen taller lying than that at a ward
meeting! Face it out, young fellers; you'll make first rate
lawyers, when you grow up!
Mr. Tuck was beginning to think that there was in
reality a conspiracy to injure his two nephews, when the
door opened, and in ran little Julia Tuck, who had stolen
out of the room unperceived, at the commencement of the
dispute, and put the lost pocket-book into the hands of her
uncle.
They shan't lie about little Johnny! said the little girl
exultingly. Mrs. Swazey and Bridget had been listening at
the key hole, in a state of great excitement, during the whole
examination; but they now broke through all restraints, and
rushed into the room. The latter caught young Tremlett
round the neck, and almost stifled him with kisses, while
the house-keeper threw herself into a chair, and burst into
tears.
As it would be quite impossible accurately to describe the
scene which ensued, we will not make the attempt, but leave
it to the imagination of the reader to form such a tableau
out of the materials which we have furnished him, as will
best agree with his feelings.
CHAPTER IX.
WILL INTRODUCE A NEW PERSONAGE TO THE READER'S
NOTICE.
THIS life is called a chequered state of existence, and with
the majority of human beings it doubtless is so. But
there are instances in which it would appear that one long
black shadow has rested upon a man's destiny, from the time
he first opened his eyes upon the world, until he has closed
them in death. Unhappy wretches there have been, across
whose path no bright gleams of sunshine have ever darted;
in whose ear no gentle tones of love and affection have ever
been breathed; doomed mortals, whose misfortunes were
hoarded for them by their ancestors; whose chains were forged
by those whose duty it was to smoothe their pillows, and
strew flowers in their way. There are some to whom a
seeming
affliction brings a counteracting benefit, while there are
others whose apparent turns of good fortune are always
accompanied
by a more than over-balancing evil.
Of this class of unfortunate beings, was Jeremiah Jernegan.
He was a clerk in the counting-room of Tremlett & Tuck;
and in addition to the ordinary duties of the office, he was
made, through his own gentle and obliging nature, to perform
the duty of a butt for the whole establishment. His keen
sensibilities and lively apprehensions, added to a very weak
frame, and forgiving disposition, rendered him a very suitable
person for fools and cowards to exercise their talents upon;
and scarce a day was allowed to pass, without his being made
to feel the misery of his uncomfortable situation. Even Mr.
Bates used to domineer over him, by way of revenge for the
indignities that his wife put upon him.
The retrospective pleasures, which to some are a source of
happiness, under afflicting circumstances, were wholly denied
to him. His infancy and childhood had been the most
wretched part of his existence. A brutal father, and a
weak-minded
mother, whom he more than suspected of crimes that
chilled his heart to think of, embittered his earliest
recollections
.
His parents were both dead, but he was denied the
satisfaction of thinking of them as divinized existences, with
whom he could hope to mingle hereafter; for neither their
lives nor the manner of their death, afforded cause for such
a belief. He had a brother, but he was brutal in his temper
and dissipated in his habits; and instead of proving a
consolation
to him, he was a continual source of mortification and grief
Jeremiah was possessed of none of those nameless little
graces, that are so worthless in themselves, and yet so powerful
in winning the esteem of others; but, on the contrary, there
was an expression in his emaciated face, and a hesitation in
his manner, which rendered him almost personally
disagreeable
,
even to them who really esteemed him for his good
qualities. He had but few relations, and they were all in the
humblest walks of life, and were withal extremely poor; so
that whatever his earnings or savings might have been, his
generous feelings would not allow him to keep what he knew
those who were closely related to him stood in need of. He
was accordingly not only very poor, but there was every
prospect
of his always remaining so. But even the happiness
which springs from contented poverty, was denied to him.
He was very proud and very ambitious; but his pride was
not of that kind which feeds upon riches, neither was his
ambition of that nature which aims at mercantile greatness;
and although he was forced to make the humiliating
confession
to himself, that he did not possess the qualifications
requisite
to give him a claim to the world's notice, yet that did
not abate in the least his desire for distinction, or make him
more contented with his humble position in society. He had
not received even the poorest education that the poorest school
could afford in his younger days; but having, by some chance,
acquired a knowledge of the alphabet, he had learned just
enough of books by employing his leisure hours, and stealing
from his body the moments it might justly claim for
refreshment
and sleep, to devote them to reading, for the benefit of
his mind, to make him more sensible of his ignorance than he
would have been, if even this slight glimmer of knowledge
had been denied him: like some poor wretch, the light of
whose dungeon is but just sufficient to reveal to him the
narrow
bounds of his prison walls. Jeremiah never had a friend
to whom he could impart his secret griefs, or upon whom he
could rely for reciprocal consolation and assistance; while
he saw every body around him paired off with a mate or a
companion, he wondered why it was that he had never met
with a congenial spirit. He was too honorable to flatter, and
too proud to solicit. As he never frequented places of public
amusement, nor wore fine clothes, he was, of course, not a
suitable companion for the other clerks in the counting-room
of Tremlett & Tuck. But he had begun to possess his soul
in patience; his thoughts had been directed to the meek
sufferer
of Nazareth; and looking up to the cross on which he
expired, the poor clerk discovered a bright star, whose light
gave a holy calm to his soul; but its rays were sometimes
obscured by clouds of darkness and distrust.
Jeremiah had become greatly attached to young Tremlett,
for the youngster had been in the habit of making frequent
visits to the counting-room, where he was an universal
favorite
.
Mr. Bates treated him with the most profound respect,
and never disputed or denied him any thing, because he was
his employer's pet; and he gained the good-will of the other
clerks, by his good nature, and the smart replies he made to
their teasing questions: but Jeremiah loved him because he
was an orphan, like himself; and instead of feeling envious of
the boy's handsome person, and flattering prospects, he
exulted
in the thought that there was happiness in store for at least
one outcast, and that the world was full of gentleness, and
beauty, and love, even though they were all denied to him.
And when it was made known that his favorite was the thief
who had stolen Mr. Tuck's pocket-book, while all the clerks
agreed in saying that they always thought he had a thievish
look, Jeremiah wiped a tear from his eye, and said, Poor boy!
I cannot condemn him, for I might have done the same thing
myself, if I had been tempted like him.
Yes, I dare say you would, Mr. Jernegan, said the
cash-keeper
and I shall keep a sharp look-out for you in future.
Why, the fact is, said Mr. Bates, they do say, that is, I
have heard the remark often, that birds of a feather will fly
together; and I shouldn't be suprised if Jeremiah did feather
his nest one of these days.
It is very hard, said Jeremiah, if one cannot express
sympathy for an unfortunate boy, without being subjected to
such cruel suspicions.
I think Jerry, said another of the clerks, you are just
fit for a black guard missionary.
Ah! replied Jeremiah, I wish I were.
Well, I will give you a certificate, if you wish, said the
clerk; my father is one of the directors of the Board of
Missions, and I heard him say at breakfast this morning, that
they wanted a nice young man to act as chaplain in the Grand
Turk's harem.
This was such an exquisite joke, that every body laughed
of course, except Jeremiah, who continued writing at his
desk. Many more jokes would have been uttered at his
expense
,
but the entrance of Mr. Tremlett caused an immediate
silence, and every body caught up a pen, and began to write
very fiercely.
Mr. Tremlett looked very serious; and after giving some
directions to the cash-keeper, he told Jeremiah he wished to
see him in private. The poor clerk trembled with
apprehension
,
being fearful that he had been guilty of some
indiscretion
that would cause him to be discharged; as he followed
his employer into his private office, his kness almost sank
under him.
CHAPTER X.
CONTAINS SEVERAL SURPRISING ADVENTURES, WHICH
WILL PROBABLY BE QUITE NEW TO THE READER.
THE immediate consequences of the recovery of Mr.
Tuck's pocket-book, and the discovery of the thief, were,
the disgrace of the two brothers, and their high-spirited
mother
,
in the estimation of their uncle, who swore he would
neither spend another copper for their benefit while living,
nor leave them a dollar at his death; and the
determination
,
on the part of Mr. Tremlett, to abandon his adopted son
to his fate, and never see him again.
As it may appear somewhat unaccountable to the reader
that Julia Tuck should have got possession of the pocket-book
we will explain that circumstance. When the two brothers
were taken home to their mother, after they had been picked
up in the river, she found the pocket-book in Tom's cap; and
on being accused of stealing it, his brother Fred made a full
confession, while the other justified himself on the ground
that she had herself taught them to look upon their uncle's
property as their own. Upon which the lady read them a
lecture upon the enormity of their guilt, and endeavored to
explain to them the difference between taking possession of
their uncle's money before and after his death; a distinction
which Tom Tuck still persisted in saying he could not
clearly comprehend. His mother, in examining the
pocket-book
,
found that it contained but little money, and that the
other papers, which she supposed to be valuable, were but
little injured by the water. She intended to inclose it in a
wrapper, and drop it into the post office, directed to her
brother-in-law
,
as soon as it should be dry; but the unexpected
summons to appear at the house of Mr. Tremlett, had
prevented
her from doing so. Little Julia heard all the
conversation
between her mother and her brothers; and when she
heard her favorite accused of the crime that she knew they
were guilty of, she ran home and took the pocket-book from
her mother's bureau, and returned it to her uncle, as has been
already related. And in doing this, the young lady was not
influenced solely by a love of justice; she had conceived a
great fondness for young Tremlett which she evinced on all
occasions, without much reserve; and her brothers not
having
always treated her with becoming kindness, she was glad
of an opportunity to do them an injury, at the same time that
she gave her favorite a proof of her regard for him. The
mortification and anger of her mother was intense. They
almost
converted her maternal love into hatred to her own
off-spring
;
and she returned to her home with her heart full of
revengeful feelings, which she burned for an opportunity to
gratify.
Although Mr. Tremlett determined, in the first excitement
of his feelings, to turn his adopted son into the street, and to
steel his heart forevermore against all kindly feelings toward
the human race, and particularly orphan boys, yet when he
reviewed the whole affair in his mind, and considered the
youth of the boy, his temptations, the examples that bad been
set him in his earlier years, and his own culpability in not
teaching him more pointedly than he had done, to do no evil,
the guilt of the youngster did not appear so enormous, nor his
nature so depraved as at first. And then the gratitude of the
lad in refusing to pawn his watch, because it had been given
to him by his father, was a proof that he was not destitute of
generous qualities. In truth, Mr. Tremlett did not reason
with himself long, before he was astonished that he should
ever have thought of parting with his son; and on visiting
the boy in his chamber, as he lay asleep, all his fond feelings
were revived, and he felt that he loved him more tenderly
than ever. If the good and pious only were entitled to our
love, thought Mr. Tremlett, how many would go through
the world unfriended and desolate!
On consulting with Dr. Hodges the boy's teacher, that
discreet
gentleman, against his own interest, advised Mr.
Tremlett
to send the boy to a private school in the country, where
he would be free from the influence of such companions as
the Tucks, and not exposed to the thousand temptations that
surround him in the city. This advice Mr. Tremlett could
not but acknowledge was very just and proper; and although
he would gladly have kept the boy with him at home, yet
professing to have the child's permanent good at heart, he
agreed to be governed by it; and Mr. Hodges having
recommended
a school kept by a clergyman of his acquaintance in
one of the pleasant towns in the interior of Massachusetts, it
was resolved that the boy should be sent there without delay.
As he was too young to travel alone, and his father's
engagements
being such that he could not accompany him, Jeremiah
Jernegan was selected, as being the most suitable person in
the employment of Tremlett & Tuck, to take charge of the
young gentleman, and deliver him at his place of destination;
and it was on this important business that Mr. Tremlett
wanted to speak with Jeremiah, when he called him into his
private office. The poor clerk was overjoyed at this proof of
his employer's confidence, as well as delighted at the thought
of travelling in company with the boy, although this pleasure
was not without its draw-back; as he would be deprived, on
his return, of the gratification of seeing the lad for a very long
period, if not for ever.
The next day young Tremlett left his happy home, in
company
with Jeremiah. They were accompanied to the
steamboat
by Mr. Tremlett, who had reserved some very solemn
advice to be imparted to his son just before they parted,
thinking
it might make a more lasting impression upon his mind,
if delivered at such an impressive moment. But when the
time arrived, the old gentleman was so full of grief, that he
found it impossible to utter a word; so he pressed the boy's
hand, and silently invoking the blessing of heaven upon his
head, he turned from the boat and left him.
Now, although Jeremiah was a very suitable person, in one
respect, for the charge entrusted to him, yet he was in another
quite the opposite, seeing that he had never been but a short
distance from home, and that he was totally unacquainted
with the ways of the world, as well as the ways of stage-drivers
and steam-boat agents. It was almost night when the
steamboat
left the dock, and as it soon grew dark, our travellers
went up on the promenade-deck to look at the stars, and to
enjoy the novelty of being afloat in the night. While they
were leaning over the railing, making their remarks on every
thing that struck them as novel, a stranger approached them
with a segar in his mouth, and after listening to their
conversation
a few moments, he ventured to address them.
Charming evening, gentlemen, said the stranger.
Yes, Sir, it is, very lovely, replied Jeremiah; I was just
remarking to my young friend here, that the solemn grandeur
of the scene was very impressive.
Upon my soul, said the stranger, I was just thinking
that very thing myself; what a liquid appearance the water
has!
Very, replied Jeremiah; It is a pleasant thing to travel;
there is such a constant succession of new and surprising
scenes, that one has hardly time to dwell upon his own sad
feelings.
Yes, replied the stranger; but dn it! I have got
sick of it, and I am now going home to settle down quietly
on my own farm, where I can eat my own eggs, and drink
my own cider.
Ah! there's a pleasure in that, too, said Jeremiah.
Pray have you travelled much?
Not much, said the stranger; I have been as fur as
Rome, and once, I was as fur from hum as Batavia. I have
got a sister married in Vienna, which I go to see once a year;
and once in a great while, I go to see my uncle, in Pekin.
You must have been a very great traveller, said
Jeremiah
.
I don't call that nothing at all, said the stranger; I
mean to go to Niagara next fall.
How long since you were in Batavia? asked Jeremiah.
Only last spring, replied the stranger.
Our house has some correspondents in Batavia, said
Jeremiah; we received a large consignment from them last
week. I suppose you know the firm of Gluttstiver &
Gruntwitchel
?
No, I can't say I do, said the stranger. I thought I
knowd all the merchants in that place, too. Have they been
long in business?
Oh, it is a very old house, replied Jeremiah; our firm
have been in correspondence with them for a great many
years. And pray what is the quality of the coffee there?
asked Jeremiah.
The dst stuff I ever swallowed in my life!nothing
like as good as you get at the Eagle, in Palmyra. I would
as soon drink the water out of the Grand Canawl, replied
the stranger, with some warmth.
Your account does not agree with my impressions at all,
said Jeremiah; I thought the coffee was very fine.
All humbug! said the stranger snapping his fingers;
it was not worth that!
Palmyra must be a very interesting spot, said Jeremiah.
So-so, said the stranger; the fact is it was built up too
suddenly. Folks said 't was a very flourishing place, and so
't was; but 't was
all
flourish; and now it's going down hill
fast enough.
Perhaps its rise
was
too sudden, replied Jeremiah; but
it was always a matter of wonder to me, how such a city ever
sprung up in such a place.
It is no wonder at all to me, said the stranger; it was
all done by speculators.
Not unlikely, replied Jeremiah; human nature has
doubtless been the same in all ages; and I suppose there were
speculators even among the Palmyrenes.
The stranger now perceived that his segar had gone out
while he had been talking to our travellers, and he left them
to get a light.
That is a very remarkable man! said Jeremiah. Only
think of it, John; he says his sister lives in Vienna, and his
uncle in Pekin; and that he has been in Batavia, and Palmyra
and Rome! Perhaps he has kissed the Pope's toe.
The bell now rang for supper, and our travellers went
down into the cabin, where they sat opposite to the
communicative
stranger; but as they were all very hungry, Jeremiah
asked no farther questions about Palmyra, neither did the
great traveller appear at all disposed to communicate any
farther intelligence respecting the famous places where his
aunts and uncles resided. But when they landed the next
morning, another agreeable gentleman addressed Jeremiah, and
asked him if he had much luggage.
Not much, replied Jeremiah, but what I have, is of
some consequence; and I am very anxious about it, because
the most of it belongs to this young gentleman, who is placed
in my charge.
I suppose there is nothing of much value in it? said the
stranger.
Yes, it is rather valuable, said Jeremiah; and for the
greater safety, I have put my purse into my valise, as I have
heard of a good many robberies on board of steam-boats.
You did right, said the stranger; I always keep a bright
look-out myself; which is your luggage?
Those two trunks, said Jeremiah pointing to them.
Where did you say you were going to? inquired the
stranger.
We are going to Willow-mead Academy, said Jeremiah,
in Berkshire Massachusetts.
Ah! it's the very place I am going to myself! said the
stranger; my youngest brother is there at school. But I
forget the name of the principal?
The Reverend Doctor Whippy, said Jeremiah.
Yes, that is it, said the stranger; and a most
appropriate
name, too, for my brother writes me he is a devil of a
fellow
for whipping.
This piece of intelligence was rather unpleasant to John,
who seemed to have taken a dislike to the stranger. When
their trunks were taken up to the stage-office, the stranger
very kindly offered to take charge of them, upon which
Jeremiah
thanked him for his politeness, and told him, as they
were not much used to travelling, he would be obliged if he
would keep them with his own luggage until they got to
Willow-mead
;
all of which the stranger very obligingly promised
to do. They rode all day, and about eight o'clock in the
evening
,
at the place where they stopped to change horses, they
met the returning coach. It was a cloudy night, the wind
blew strong from the east, and it was very dark. When
Jeremah
and his fellow travellers got into the stage again, they did
not observe that one of their number was missing, and being
fatigued with riding, they soon fell asleep, and did not wake
again until it was midnight, when they stopped at an out-of
the-way tavern to change horses. The wind had increased
and it rained very hard and our travellers were stiff and cold;
their legs were cramped, and they felt very wretched. It was
a long time before the tavern-keeper opened his door; and
when he did, his bar-room presented a most cheerless and
dreary appearance. There was no fire, and only one small
fallow candle burning in a huge tin candle-stick. The tavern
13
keeper himself was very tall and thin; his hair was long, and
so was his face, and in fact every thing else about him, except
his answers, which were very short and crusty. And indeed
his ill-humor was not to be wondered at: to be roused out of
a pleasant sleep, in the middle of a cold, rainy night, to admit
half a dozen temperance customers, could not have been very
soothing to the feelings of a publican.
As it was necessary to pay for the next stage at this house,
Jeremiah put his hand into his pocket to take out his purse,
and to his great horror discovered it was not there. He
procured
a lantern from the landlord, and searched the coach,
without finding it; and then he remembered that he had
put it into his valise for safe-keeping. Jeremiah now began
to make inquiries for the obliging stranger and was terrified
beyond expression, when he was told how that kind
gentleman
had pretended to have left one of his trunks behind him
and had taken a seat in the returning coach, which they met
at eight o'clock. On inspecting the boot of the stage, it was
farther discovered that he had taken with him the boy's trunk
and Jeremiah's valise.
Our travellers were now in a most uncomfortable situation
for the driver of the coach not only refused to take them a
mile farther, unless their fare was first paid, but the
tavern-keeper
refused to give them a bed, although he consented to
their remaining in the bar room until it was day-light.
Jeremiah
begged hard for a little fire, as the night was cold, and
their clothes were damp; but this the host also refused; and
indeed he would not even allow them the light of the
miserable
tallow candle; but, having first locked all the doors, and
taken a five cent piece and two rusty coppers out of the till
he retired to bed, and the left our two travellers in darkness.
They were too cold to sleep, and so they sat close together
on a wooden bench, without any back to it, and tried to divert
their thoughts from their uncomfortable situation, by relating
the many unpleasant dilemmas in which they had both been
placed before. Once, said Jeremiah, I should have
considered
it a great happiness to have obtained such a shelter as
this cheerless bar room affords, on a night like this. Then
why should I repine at what I should once have felt myself
called upon to give thanks for? I will not; but let us rather
John, kneel down, and thank the Giver of all good things,
that we are not exposed to the piercing wind, and the cold,
driving rain.
I have no objection, said the boy; and so they knelt
down, and Jeremiah prayed thus:
O, Lord, God! we give thee humble and hearty thanks,
that thou hast created us in such wise that our happiness is
not dependant upon the outward circumstances and
conditions
of our bodies; and though we do not exult because that
they who are clothed in soft raiment, and who fare
sumptuously
in rich men's houses, are not happier than we, to
whom thou hast wisely denied these things, yet we rejoice, O
Lord! that to the meek and humble, the outcast and the
wretched, thou hast graciously been pleased to manifest
thyself
,
and hast condescended to pour into their hearts an oil of
gladness, of which those know but little, who look only upon
their outward seeming. And we beseech thee, O Lord! that
thine outstretched wings may be over this house, and that its
inmates
may be kept from all harm; and that he who has
kindly
given us a shelter beneath his roof, may never be exposed,
himself, to the inclemency of the elements. And we beseech
thee, O Lord! to remember in mercy that misguided
wayfarer
,
who has unjustly deprived us of our little property
Stop! Jeremiah, said John; I am not going to pray for
that scamp who stole our trunks!
Certainly we must, said Jeremiah, for we are
commanded
to pray for our enemies; and we do not yet
positively
know whether the gentleman has wronged us or not.
O, I know he did it, said John; for I saw him wink at
the great traveller two or three times, while he was talking
to you.
I am strongly inclined to believe, myself, said Jeremiah
that he is guilty, but still he
may
not be; and even if he
is, we do not know how sorely he may have been tempted,
nor how much he may have resisted.
Jeremiah would not hurt the feelings of the youngster by
reminding him of his own temptation and fall; but lifting up
his voice again, he continued his prayer. And when he had
finished, he declared he had never felt more comfortable in
his life. So huddling close together, the two fell into a sound
sleep, from which they did not awake until the entrance of
the landlord in the morning aroused them.
CHAPTER XI.
AMONG OTHER THINGS SHOWS THE BAD EFFECT OF
ENTERTAINING
TOO GOOD AN OPINION OF OUR OWN SPECIES.
OUR Travellers rose refreshed from their hard couches, and
went out to perform their morning ablutions at the
moss-covered
horse-trough at the tavern door. But neither of them
murmured at having to perform that necessary duty in such
a place; but on the contrary, they both acknowledged that it
was more invigorating, and far pleasanter, to wash in the open
air, from a clear mountain stream, than to perform the same
office in a confined chamber, with stagnant Manhattan
water.
Although it was cold and stormy the night before, the sun
was now shining bright and warm; the wind had died away
and the soft balmy air was filled with the pleasant and
cheerful
notes of myriads of twittering birds. The tavern was
situated in one of the pleasantest valleys in Massachusetts,
with a shallow but swift and sparkling stream running close
by the door. The hills, which rose to a great height on either
side, were covered to their very summits with beautiful trees,
while all the level lands were under a high state of cultivation;
and although the white farm-houses which were scattered
along the valley did not wear a very comfortable appearance,
on close inspection, yet they were highly picturesque at
a distance. There were large flocks of snowy sheep feeding
upon
the delicate white clover that grew upon the hilly fields, and
numerous herds of fat and lordly-looking cattle were grazing
in the rich meadows by the side of the little stream.
Jeremiah
declared he had never looked upon so fair a scene
before
,
and he thought that the demon of avarice must have a
strong hold upon a man's heart, to cause him to leave the
pleasant hills and valleys of New-England, to seek for richer
soils in the flat prairies of the West.
I know it is very fine, said John, whose taste for the
sublime and beautiful was not fully matured, but for my
part I should much prefer to look upon a good plate of toast
and some hot coffee, for I am very hungry.
And so am I, said Jeremiah; this fresh air, and these
pleasant sights and sounds, have given me a very keen
appetite
.
On returning to the tavern, they found the breakfast table
spread, and a lady and gentleman, whom they had not seen
before
,
just sitting down. John looked upon the table and
smacked his lips, as his eyes took an accurate inventory of
the good things with which it was covered; there were eggs
and fried ham, apple-pies and waffles, butter and cheese, and
rye-and-Indian bread, together with a great variety of dishes
of the composite order, the names of which he did not know.
But neither he nor Jeremiah offered to sit down, because there
were but two chairs in the room, and they were occupied by
the lady and gentleman, who apparently wished to be quite
exclusive, and who certainly gave proofs, by their
conversation
,
that they were no common kind of people.
As John had never seen the inside of a New-England
tavern before, he took particular notice of the painted floors,
the wooden-bottom chairs, the green paper curtains at the
windows; of an old-fashioned mahogany secretary, with a
large Bible and two or three hymn books placed with religious
care on top; and of the profiles of the family, cut in white
paper, and hung up in black frames around a yellowish
sampler
,
with the name and age of the feminine prodigy who
worked it somewhat ostentatiously emblazoned in gilded
letters
upon the glazing; and of several other little matters,
which appeared very odd to him, as every thing will appear
to travellers, which they may not have been in the habit of
seeing at home. But all these curiosities did not divert John's
mind from the breakfast upon which he feasted with his eyes
until his appetite increased to such a degree of intensity, that
he came very nigh behaving with great rudeness. A modest
little hazel-eyed girl waited upon the table, and poured out
coffee for the gentleman and lady.
Young geurl! said the lady to the little waiter, does
your father keep this establishment?
Yes m'am, replied she.
Then have the kindness, if you please, Miss, said the
lady, to request him to come to me.
The little girl tripped out, and in a few minutes returned
with her father.
Are you the proprietor of this hotel, Sir? inquired the
lady.
Wal, I own this house, I believe, said the tavern keeper.
Do you?ah, very well, said the lady; I wished to
inquire if these eggs are fresh laid.
Wal, I can't exactly say as to that, said the tavern-keeper,
but you can try and see.
That is my lady, Sir, said the gentleman, starting upon
his feet; she is very choice in her eggs, and she isn't up to
that kind of talk.
Wal, then I guess she might as well go where she can get
better, replied the landlord.
Here the gentleman gave evident signs of strangulation,
upon which the lady exclaimed, Don't, my dear, get
excited
;
don't, I beg of you, for
my
sake; do be composed;
I would rather eat addled eggs, and rancid butter, and stale
bread, and drink muddy coffee, all the rest of my days, than
see you unhappy.
The gentleman then assured his lady, that for her sake
he would be patient, but that nothing but a due regard for her
peculiar situation could induce him to remain quiet under
such treatment. However, said the gentleman, shaking his
head, I'll put the whole thing in the papers, as soon as I
return to the city; if I don't, my name ain't Jacobs, no how
you can fix it!
My dear! exclaimed the lady, what do you mean?
I mean my name ain't G. Washington Mortimer, no how:
I am blest, my dear, if I warn't thinking of your maiden name
when I spoke.
The lady and gentleman continued to eat their breakfast,
and to find fault with every thing before them. But the
tavern-keeper left them to make such comments as they
pleased upon his provisions.
Jeremiah followed him out, and requested breakfast for
himself and companion upon credit; promising to pay as
soon as he could get an answer to a letter he had just sent off
by the mail stage. The tavern-keeper hesitated a long time,
but at last consented to give them a bowl of bread and milk
in the kitchen.
Our travellers now went into the kitchen to get their bread
and milk, where they found the tavern-keeper's wife, a very
different sort of a person from her husband. She was very
fat, with a florid complexion, and a thick short neck, which
was ornamented with a string of gold beads, as big as
goose-berries
.
She was seated in a capacious arm chair, and one of
her hands was employed in holding a large horn snuff-box,
while the other was occupied in conveying the yellow dust to
her nostrils. Altogether, she appeared disposed to take the
world very easy. Do tell me, she said, addressing Jeremiah
if you are all the way from York?
Yes, madam, said Jeremiah; we left there the day
before
yesterday.
Well, I want to know if York isn't quite a place?
It is a large city, said Jeremiah.
Well, I shouldn't wonder if it was, said the lady; do
tell me if you know a man that keeps a shoe-store in Chatham
street?
Perfectly well, madam, replied Jeremiah.
Well now, do you know he is our son-in-law?
Is he indeed, said Jeremiah; what is the gentleman's
name to whom you allude?
Well, it is Pinkum, to be sure, said the lady.
Then I don't know him, said Jeremiah.
Do tell me! said the lady; I thought you said you did.
But there are several shoe-stores in Chatham-street, said
Jeremiah.
Do tell me if there are! said the lady; I want to know!
What a pretty creature that young man is!looking at
John; I want to know if he is your brother?
No, madam, replied Jeremiah.
Well, I thought you didn't look much alike, said the
lady. Do tell me if his mother warn't dreadful sorry to let
him leave her?
He has got no mother, said Jeremiah.
I want to know! said the lady; precious soul!
Huldah
,
bring out a currant pie. And do tell me if either of you
has ever experienced religion?
I am afraid not, replied Jeremiah.
Do tell! replied the querist; what a pity that such a
sweet pretty creature shouldn't get religion! Huldah, bring
out some ham and coffee, and give 'em. Precious souls!
So our travellers made a hearty breakfast; and then the
kind hearted landlady called John to her side, and having
smoothed down his hair, she gave him a kiss; and begged
him, for her sake, to try and get religion, which he promised
to do.
Jeremiah met the gentleman, whom he had seen at the
breakfast table, smoking a segar on the piazza after his
breakfast
,
and he told the stranger of his mishap, and of the
unpleasant
14
situation in which he found himself in consequence
I see you have got a watch, said the stranger; why
don't you pledge it with the landlord, and then you will be
under no obligation to him.
I would not do that upon any account, said Jeremiah,
because the watch is not my own; it is one that I borrowed
from a fellow clerk.
Is it waluable? inquired the gentleman.
I believe it is, replied Jeremiah, showing it to the
stranger.
Yes, it's very waluable, said the stranger; too much
so to put into the hands of such a rascal as the keeper of this
house is, any how. But I will tell you what I will do for
you. I am going to wusticate here with my wife some time
and I'll keep it for you, and come under obligation to the
landlord for your expenses, until you get your wemittances
by mail.
I should be very thankful if you would, said Jeremiah:
and as I am going to take a ramble in the woods with my
young companion, you would oblige me by taking care of it
until I return, for I should be extremely sorry to injure it.
With the gwatest pleasure into the world, Sir, replied
the stranger, and I will give you a weceipt for it, to prevent
accidents.
That will be quite desirable, said Jeremiah, as we are
strangers to each other.
Accordingly the gentleman took out his memorandum
book and wrote a receipt for the watch, and Jeremiah bade
him a good morning, and went to look after his companion
who was having fine sport with a large watch-dog in the
stable. And then they set out on a ramble in the woods, and
a long way they rambled too, and much longer they would
have continued to do so, but they began to grow hungry, and
were obliged to leave all the pleasant allurements of the woods
to return to the tavern for their dinner. But when they got
there, dinner was over, and Jeremiah being too modest to
make a bustle, especially as he was living upon credit, they
had to wait a long time before they could get any thing to
eat; and then it was given to them very grudgingly. The
fat good-natured landlady was taking her afternoon nap, and
Jeremiah told the tavern keeper that he need be under no
apprehension
about getting his pay for their board, as he had
put abundant security into the hands of Mr. Washington
Mortimer, who would be responsible for all charges.
Wal, Mister, said the tavern-keeper, I thought you
said you was from the city?
So we are, replied Jeremiah.
Wal, I never knew before that any green-horns
quite
as green as you, ever came from there, said the
tavern-keeper
.
What do you mean! exclaimed Jeremiah, a sudden
suspicion
flashing on his mind; you don't mean to say that
Mr. Mortimer is gone.
Wal, I expect he has, replied the tavern-keeper; he
started off in his shay more than two hours ago.
And has he taken his baggage with him? inquired
Jeremiah
.
Wal, all the baggage he had was that she critter of his'n,
and he took her, replied the tavern-keeper.
O, oh! groaned Jeremiah; he has taken the gold watch,
that I borrowed from one of the clerks! What shall I say, or
what can I do!
Never mind, Jeremiah, said John, I will give you my
watch in the place of it, when I get it from the watch-maker's.
But Jeremiah was so much overcome at this intelligence
and at the recollection of his want of discretion, that he could
not eat his dinner, and he left his companion and went away
by himself; and when John saw him again, his eyes were
red, as though he had been crying. That night the tavern
keeper gave them a bed, but the next day he was so cross and
surly, that Jeremiah resolved that he would not stop another
hour in the tavern, but that he would travel on foot to
Willow-mead
Academy, and send a conveyance back for his
companion
.
But John would not listen to such a proposition;
he insisted on accompanying Jeremiah, and accordingly they
set out on their journey toward Willow-mead, which was
forty miles distant. As their road lay through a pleasant
country, the time passed swiftly, and they travelled a
long distance without feeling at all weary. Sometimes they
would stop to slake their thirst in a clear running book, and
sometimes they would stretch themselves out on the dry
leaves, beneath the shade of a sycamore or a walnut tree, until
they were refreshed, and then they would continue their
journey again. At last, however, they were driven by
hunger
to beg for something to eat at a farm-house door. The
farmer's wife civilly asked them to walk in, and then placed
before them, on a nice white table, a piece of cold veal, some
brown bread and cheese, and a pitcher of hard cider, of which
they partook heartily, and having thanked the good woman
for her kindness, they continued on their way; but night
overtook
them at a desolate-looking place. It was on the summit
of a bleak hill, with but few signs of civilization around them.
There were no farm houses near; and to add to their
uncomfortable
prospects, the sky became suddenly overcast with
heavy clouds; and sudden gusts of wind, forewarned them of
an approaching storm. Jeremiah now bethought himself
that they had done a very foolish thing in leaving the tavern,
as he had directed Mr. Tremlett to write to him at that place
and it was probable that a letter with money would arrive
there for him that very evening. But it was too late to
return, and they had no other alternative but to push ahead
until they should arrive at a farm house or a tavern. Having
looked about them in vain for some signs of a dwelling house
they began to descend the hill, which was very rugged,
although
it was a gradual slope. By the time they reached the
bottom, it was pitch dark, and the rain had begun to pour
down in torrents; and notwithstanding it was in the summer
time, the weather was very cold, the wind blew fiercely from
the north east, and the big drops of rain struck upon the flesh
of our travellers with such force that they thought it was
hail.
Poor John! exclaimed Jeremiah, I am afraid you will
not be able to bear up under this pelting storm. I do not care
for myself; this cold rain and these rough roads do not make
me feel half as uncomfortable and wretched as I have often
felt, when under the warm shelter of a roof, at the harsh
replies
I have received from a brutal employer. Indeed I do not
know, Johnny that I should feel very bad, even though I
were certain that I should never see the sun's light again, for
there are none who would shed a tear over me when they
heard of my death. But there is one, at least, who would
weep for
you
, and for his sake as well as your own, I hope
we may soon find a shelter.
And there is one that would weep for you, Jeremiah,
said the boy: for I should cry very hard if any thing should
happen to you. So cheer up, and don't be cast down on my
account, for I do love you, indeed I do.
By this time they had reached the foot of the hill, when
they soon came to a wooden bridge which crossed a mill
stream, that foamed and fretted over its rocky bottom, and
made a much louder noise than does many a deeper river.
As soon as they crossed the bridge, they discovered a mill
and a little farther on they perceived a small but bright light
glimmering through the darkness. They ran toward it, and
very happy they felt when they discovered that it proceeded
from the kitchen window of a large farm house. The
numerous
outhouses and a large barn gave promise of good
quarters, and our travellers entered the house with great
confidence
of a kind reception. As they opened the door, a truly
pleasant sight met their eyes. A long table was spread on the
floor, and a bright, cheerful fire, of good stout hickory sticks,
burned in the capacious fire place; a steaming tea-kettle and
a frying pan, full of thick slices of ham which sputtered
merrily
,
gave assurance that supper was nearly ready. And long
shelves full of tin pans and pewter dishes, as bright as silver
reflected back the bright light which the hickory fire threw
out. A buxom, rosy-cheeked girl, with a blue-striped
long-short
,
and arms bared to her elbow, was busied about the
fire-place, while an elderly woman, with three or four young
children were seated in the chimney corner.
But few words were necessary to relate the necessities of
the travellers, and the woman bade them seat themselves
by the fire before they were half told. The preparations for
supper were carried on with great spirit by the buxom young
woman in the striped long-short, and John thought he had
never seen a comelier specimen of her sex. Presently three
young men came in looking very grave and steady, as though
supper was a serious business and not to be made light of,
and shortly afterwards the master of the house made his
appearance
.
He was a very saintly personage, altogether too
much so for an every day existence, and Jeremiah, with his
accustomed ingenuousness, congratulated himself upon falling
into the hands of such a pious looking individual; for
Jeremiah
never could learn to put a proper value upon external
appearances, which is not to be wondered at, for how is it
possible to believe, upon theory alone, that a human being
should be such a half way admirer of goodness, as to care
no more for it than only to wish to seem good. But a keener
sighted man than Jeremiah might have been deceived by the
very smooth exterior of the farmer. He wore a coat of an
exceedingly doubtful hue, cut after the straightest manner
of his sect, and adorned with a formidable row of horn
buttons
;
his hair was trimmed with a precision that hair scarce
seemed capable of; and his plain speech left no doubt in the
minds of the travellers that he belonged to the society of
friends. Upon hearing Jeremiah's story, friend Hogshart, for
that was the farmer's name, smoothed down his hair and
hemmed
two or three times with a solemnity that went to the
hearts of the benighted travellers.
Although we have no money now, said Jeremiah, we
shall soon have it in our power to pay you well, if you
will allow us to sleep here to night.
Doubtless thee will my friend, said the farmer, but we
do not keep a house of entertainment, except for friends at
yearly meetings; and then the discipline of society does not
allow us to claim money.
It is a generous discipline, replied Jeremiah, but I hope
it will not prevent your taking pay from us, as we shall
never have it in our power to return your kindness.
Thee is kind, said friend Hogshart, but we have got
no spare beds in the house; and it is not, moreover, in
conformity
with our customs to entertain strangers.
I would not insist, or even expect it, but we are strangers
to the road, said Jeremiah, and the night is so stormy that
I fear my young companion would not survive until morning
if he were exposed to the weather.
Truly friend, thee cannot expect that we should depart
from our established customs because the night is stormy,
replied friend Hogshart in a bland and convincing manner.
I must not insist, replied Jeremiah, and I would not,
for I do not pretend to have any claim upon you, but for the
sake of this poor lad; if you will allow him to sleep by your
kitchen fire I will willingly sleep in your barn myself.
Thee is very plausible my friend, said the farmer, but
if thee did not understand what I have been saying I will
repeat
it.
I understand perfectly, replied Jeremiah, but I hoped
that you might he persuaded to alter your determination.
I perceive thee is a stranger to friends, said the farmer,
but as supper is waiting, I will not detain thee from
proceeding
on thy journey. Thee will find a large house with a
small family a mile or two beyond, where they may be
disposed
to entertain thee.
John had been twitching Jeremiah by the sleeve with
manifest impatience to be gone, for some time, and now
Jeremiah
caught him by the hand, and with a degree of spirit he
had never shown before dragged him hastily out into the
pelting rain again. Friend Hogshart accompanied them to
the door, and as they emerged into the drakness he said
farewell friends, farewell, I wish thee good night,
farewell
.
Jeremiah could not say farewell, without, belying his
feelings, and he wouldn't be rude, so he said nothing, and his
young companion was at first so bewildered by coming
suddenly
into the darkness that he could not speak, and they
felt their way along the road, with the rain beating in their
faces, for some distance in silence; at last John said, I
wouldn't care about being turned out of doors Jeremiah, if
that nice old fellow hadn't said farewell to us.
We are certainly under obligation to him for civil
language
,
said Jeremiah, and he doubtless had good reasons
for not allowing us to remain in his house, although they may
not appear so to us.
But he might have given us some supper, said the boy,
and if he had I would have liked his reasons better. I can't
reason at all in this cold rain while I am so hungry.
The wind now blew so fiercely in their faces and the roads
had become so slippery and uncertain, that they were obliged
to stop and take breath; indeed they could hardly move
ahead at all. The blustering little river which they had
crossed was swollen to double its usual width and the
ricketty wooden bridge cracked and quivered, as the flood
rushed past its old piers, and seemed every moment on the
point of giving away. Fearful of losing themselves on the
road the travellers had retreated to the old mill and sheltered
themselves under its projecting eaves, where they stood wet
to the skin and shivering with cold, when their attention
was suddenly arrested by the noise of a carriage coming down
the hill on the opposite side of the river. Although they
could distinctly hear the tramp of horses' feet and the
rattling of wheels, it was so dark they could see nothing
of carriage or horses. It approached very rapidly and the
horses' hoofs were soon heard upon the hollow sounding
bridge, and then a loud crash and a cry, rose above the
howling of the wind and the roaring of the waters. The
white foam of the turbulent water enabled them to catch a
glimpse of the horses' heads and the top of the carriage as they
were hurried along towards the edge of the dam. John ran
to the farm house shouting for help with all his might, while
Jeremiah ran down the stream to give such aid as he could,
but he could do nothing to aid them except encourage the
driver who still clung to his seat and bid him hold on as
help was at hand. John soon returned with friend Hogshart
and his three sons, who were soon joined by the young lady
in the long-short carrying a lantern which she contrived to
hold in such a manner that the light blinded their eyes and
almost prevented them from doing any thing but run afoul
of each other. The carriage had fortunately floated against
some obstruction in the stream where it hung, and the driver
was crying to them to hurry for God's sake, as there was a
gentleman in the carriage who would certainly be drowned.
There was a large pile of boards near at hand with which a
loose raft was soon constructed and floated to the carriage,
from which they rescued the driver and the inside passenger,
but the horses they could not get ashore and they were
carried
over the dam. The unfortunate passenger was quite
exhausted
and unable to speak, but they bore him to the house,
John supporting his feet and Jeremiah his head. Friend
Hogshart humanely waived all considerations of discipline
and suffered them all to enter his house, where they placed
the gentleman upon the floor and began rubbing him with hot
flannels, while the farmer unlocked a corner cupboard and
took out a small phial of French brandy, a few drops of which
he poured down the gentleman's throat who very soon after
began to revive, and when he opened his eyes Jeremiah fell
upon his knees, and to the astonishment of every body
exclaimed
merciful heavens! and John clasped his arms
around the gentleman's neck and kissed him. It was Mr.
Tremlett.
CHAPTER XII.
WILL BRING THE FIRST PART OF THIS HISTORY, AND THE
EXPEDITION TO WILLOW-MEAD ACADEMY TO A CLOSE.
IF any inhabitant of the earth, who may favor our history
by conferring upon it the honor of a perusal, shall have
felt any dissatisfaction at the close of the last chapter, caused
by his never having met with a surprise during his actual
experience of worldly affairs, we must be allowed the
privilege
of expressing our belief that the individual has had a
very poor time of it in the course of his pilgrimage, since all
our pleasures, if closely analysed, will be found to consist of
surprises altogether. But for the benefit of such, few as they
may be, who are never satisfied with an effect without a
clearly
explained cause, and who would not believe in life itself
if they could help it, since it is wholly unaccountable, we will
explain the cause of Mr. Tremlett's being met with at a time
when the reader could have had no reasonable expectation of
seeing him.
Although Mr. Tremlett was not, as the reader knows, the
father of the subject of this history, yet so strong was his
attachment
to the lad, so much had he added to the old
gentleman's
pleasures, that perhaps he felt more keenly the loss of
his society than if he had been his natural parent, for he was
not willing to forego his own gratification for the sake of the
boy's eventual good; when, therefore, he returned to his house
alone, after parting with the youngster at the steam-boat, he
reproached himself with having acted too hastily in sending
him away to a distant school. He missed him at his solitary
supper, and he felt very lonely and dispirited at his breakfast
when he glanced towards the vacant seat which the boy had
occupied so long. Mrs. Swazey guessed at the thoughts
which haunted the old man's mind and she `hoped that
master
John would, get a good breakfast, but she was afraid
something
had happened to him, for she had dreamed twice the
night before of losing one of her teeth, and she never knew
the sign to fail; something was going to happen to somebody,
she was sure.'
Now Mr. Tremlett's mind was as free from superstitious
taint as most men of his age, but he felt annoyed at his
housekeeper's
dream, for he remembered to have heard his mother
relate a similar dream, and attach similar consequences to it,
but a short time before his father's death, when he was a young
boy; the circumstance had probably never occured to him
before, and he felt very sad, but he did not care that his
housekeeper should know how much he missed his adopted
son, and he coldly replied to her remarks that the boy would
be well taken care of where he had sent him.
The day passed wearily, and at night the old merchant
found himself again in the boy's little chamber gazing at his
vacant bed, and fondly examining one of the school books
which he had left behind. I see that I am getting old and
childish, he said to himself, as a tear trickled down his cheek;
after living all my life for myself alone, here I am unhappy
at the absence of a nameless little rogue who has no possible
claim upon my sympathy. I will overcome this weakness.
I will drive the boy from my thoughts and attend to my
business
as usual. If he were a nephew, or the son of an old
friend, or indeed the child of anybody whom I had ever
known, there would be less folly in it, butI shall soon
forget him, and that I may hear of him no more, I will instruct
my book-keeper to open all letters from Willow-mead and
make such remittances as may be necessary without speaking
to me on the subject.
Having made these brave resolutions, Mr. Tremlett wiped
his eyes and coughed two or three times to clear his throat
of a choking sensation; and then he ordered Mrs. Swazey to
have everything removed from the boy's room and the door
locked, after which, that his heart might be hardened against
all tender emotions and the love of his own species, and
particularly
of the destitute and juvenile portion of it, he walked
off to a ward meeting where his presence created an immense
sensation, and he met with nothing there to remind him in
the least degree that he was a man, but everything to make
him think that he was affiliated to a race of animals, if any
such exist, whose insticts lead them to devour each other.
He left the meeting at a late hour with his thoughts full of
of political patriotism, determined to go there again the next
evening, so entirely had he succeeded in getting all the kindly
feelings of his nature smothered; but when he retired to his
chamber he could not help opening the door of the little room
which adjoined his own, just to see whether or not his
housekeeper had obeyed his instructions, and his heart felt
cold as he looked in and saw its bare walls and naked little
cot; the door made a hollow reproachful sound as he
suddenly
closed it, and the face of its banished tenant seemed to
look upon him with melancholy tenderness. He turned
uneasily
upon his bed until morning, and when he went down
to his office he found a letter from Jeremiah lying upon his
desk. His hand trembled as he opened it, but he felt beyond
measure happy when he read its contents. Jeremiah had
given a simple detail of the accidents which had befallen him
and requested a remittance to enable him to get to
Willowmead
with his charge. But Mr. Tremlett forgot all his
resolutions
of the night before, and pretending to be afraid of
trusting
Jeremiah, but secretly determined to bring his adopted
son back to New York, he set off for the place at which the
letters was dated with the avowed purpose of seeing him safe
at Willow-mead. When he arrived at the tavern he learned
that the travellers had set out for Willow-mead on foot, some
hours before, and being fearful that some accident might
happen to them, he hired a carriage of the tavern keeper, and
in spite of the earnest entreaties of the feeling landlady, who
predicted a storm, he proceeded after them without stopping
to take any refreshment. But the roads were bad, one of the
horses was lame, and the driver was sleepy; so they did not
travel very fast, until it began to rain, when the driver felt a
sudden anxiety to get to the end of his journey, and he began
to lay his whip upon the backs of his cattle, with such a
hearty good will, and to pour such a strain of odd
expressions
into their ears that they galloped on the road at a greater
speed than was pleasant to all parties, when they were
suddenly
precipitated into the stream by the breaking down of
the old bridge as has already been related in the last chapter.
As soon as Mr. Tremlett was sufficiently recovered he was
clothed in a suit of friend Hogshart's linsey woolsey, which so
completely metamorphesed him, that John could not help
indulging
in a most uproarious burst of laughter for which he
was reproved by the Friend after this manner.
Thee laughs, my young friend, because thy father is
covered
with a good warm suit of comfortable clothing, and well
thee might, if it was properly done, for I dare say he feels
more like laughing himself than he did when he lay half
drowned in his cold and wet garments. But is thee laughing
at thy father? if so thee is transgressing the inspired word,
which thou shouldst not do; and if thee is laughing at the
outward covering of thy father, thee is doing worse, for thee
is making light of God's gifts. It would be quite impossible
to determine what were the precise feelings which prompted
this speech, whether it were pride or godliness, because the
farmer having been schooled to keep his expressions at the
same temperature let his feelings be what they might, his
motives rarely obtruded themselves in his speech; but John
felt the full force of this reproof, without attempting to analyse
the reprover's motives, and he looked very grave and
shamefaced
;
although his father could not help smiling himself, as
he glanced at his small clothes and blue stockings and long
skirted drab coat. But Jeremiah apologised for his young
friend's rudeness, and thanked the quaker with great
earnestness
for having turned him out of doors, as but for his
apparent
unkindness he could not have been instrumental in
saving the life of his benefactor.
So thee sees, friends, replied the Friend, it is always
safest to stick close to the discipline of society.
May God forgive me, replied Jeremiah, but I fear I
I entertained some hard feelings towards you although I
strove not to.
I doubt not thee did, it is likely, replied friend Hogshart
but I experienced some mental promptings within, which
would not allow me to do otherwise; it was doubtless the
workings of the spirit, since thee sees it was to work out a
good end.
I should like to feel the operation of some spirits too and
no mistake, said the driver who stood drying himself by the
fire, with a cloud of steam rising from his wet clothes, for I
am as dry as a fish and at the same time as wet as old Nabby
Dibletts after she had been ducked in a horse-pond for being
a witch; and as for inward promptings, I tell you how it is
neighbor, I have them no ways slow, and grumblings too,
although I will acknowledge in confidence to you, that they
are not so unusual as they should be to a man of my bringing
up, and I swear to gracious if I don't have something to eat
deuced soon, I shall be forced to break through the discipline
of society and the cup-board door too.
Thy thoughts should be placed on something higher, my
friend, said the quaker, after escaping from death as thee
has. I think my friends, that this will be a very suitable
occasion
for an exercise of prayer; according to the good Book, we
should be constant in prayer; and we are commanded to give
thanks in all things. So saying friend Hogshart, dropped
upon his knees and without further ceremony prayed with
great solemnity of voice, and in tones long drawn out, which
affected Jeremiah to such a degree that he shed tears; he felt
that he should never forgive himself for having thought ill
of so good a person.
When the Friend had made an end of his prayer he gave
orders for supper, which the travellers were very glad to
hear.
I tell you how it is neighbor longskirts, said the driver
whose tongue run very glibly as his clothes were getting dry,
I never could pray on an empty stomach, and I don't believe
you could either. I'll bet you a horn of Monongahela
whiskey
,
old fellow, that you have had your supper.
Heu quam
difficiles
and so forth, I can talk Latin to you by the
wholesale
,
which I don't believe that you can do, and I'll beat you
at praying after I have laid in a good supply of that fried ham
and apple sauce, or you may beat me and I'll acknowledge
myself no christian
Ne sutor crepidam
, let the parson go and
pray and you peg away.
Friend, replied the quaker, I have given thee shelter
and saved thy life, and I would have given thee food and a
bed for the night, but thy profane language has proved thee
unworthy to remain beneath this roof. Thee must go, and
the next time thee is taken into a friend's house, perhaps thee
will know how to behave thyself. Walk out.
Not I, said the driver as he braced himself against the
jamb of the fire place and began to smooth down the fur of
his shabby beaver hat with his coat sleeve, I couldn't
prevail
upon myself to do so, no how. You must call some
other time. I must have some supper first, and something hot
to drink, and after that I shall feel too sleepy to comply with
your polite request. I hope you have got plenty of
Dos
Amigos
, because I must have a smoke after supper; and
here's this pretty young lady that I must become acquainted
with too. And without more ado he put his arm round the
neck of the quaker's daughter and gave her a kiss. The
young lady did not faint as some young ladies would have
done, but she blushed very red, although her face was already
as hot as scarlet with frying the ham for the traveller's supper,
and she returned the compliment by a cuff on his ears from
her plump hands that must have made him hear strange
sounds.
Well friend, if thee don't see proper to go of thy own
will, I shall put thee out, said the quaker.
The driver would now willingly have begged pardon for
his rude behaviour, for he saw that friend Hogshart was not
a person to be trifled with; but his repentance came too late,
as repentance generally does. The farmer called his two
eldest sons to his aid, and in spite of the drivers kicks, and
struggles, they lifted him up and deposited him outside the door,
where they left him in the pelting rain to make such
disposition
of himself as he pleased. He rapped upon the window
and begged piteously to be admitted, and Mr. Tremtett and
Jeremiah interceded in his behalf, but the quaker could not
be moved from his purpose.
I know him very well, said friend Hogshart, he is the
son of Judge Hupstart, a man who has taken so much interest
in public affairs that he has entirely neglected his own; this
fellow is his eldest son, whom the government took care of
and fed at the soldier shop, down at West Point, until he
behaved
so bad that he was turned away; and then the
government
gave him an appointment among the marines, because
his father being a bad politician, they wanted to show their
affection for him by taking care of his bad progeny, which is
the general way, thee knows, with our government; and he
16
came home to his father's house with a sword by his side and
a red collar to his coat, but he did something amiss, what it
was I know not, although it must have been quite unhuman
for them not to have thought him fit for the marines, which I
am told is the very lowest grade of the war service, and he
was turned away from that place. As government could do
nothing more for him, he came home to his father, who
being a lawyer as well as a politician, for thee knows they
generally go together, thought that he would bring his son
up to his own profession and he was finally admitted to
practice the law, but he did not do well at that; and as thee
knows he could go no lower, why his father had to turn him
off to find his own level, and now he has got to be a stage
driver. But government was not entirely discouraged with
the family, they have put his two brothers into the navy, to
preserve the honor of the American flag, as I think they call
it, and you and I neighbor, turning to Mr. Tremlett, have
to pay our share towards supporting them; but for my own
part I would prefer to support the honor of my part of the
American flag myself, or if I had to delegate others to do it
for me, I should prefer to select people who had a little
honor themselves. And the father of this young man I hear
has just received an appointment to go abroad to support the
honor of the American nation at some foreign court, but I am
sure that if his townsmen were to select a man to support the
honor of their town he would be one of the last men they
would fix upon. But government always makes the most
of a bad family.
Mr. Tremlett remarked that friend Hogshart was rather
severe upon government and politicians, but as he only
named facts he could not of course dispute him, but he hoped
that all the government appointments were not quite so bad.
But Jeremiah was horror-struck at the profane boldness of
the quaker, for he had never dabbled in politics and seldom
read any thing in the newspapers except the advertisements,
and he looked upon government as a kind of divine
abstraction
,
or an embodiment of political power and wisdom which
dispensed justice infallibly and potently, and it had never
entered
his mind that any mere layman had any right even to
think or to call in question the doings of this mysterious
power; and as for the officers of the army and navy, he
looked
upon them with awe, believing them to be the most gallant
and perfect heroes in the world, and that without them the
whole twenty-four states of the union would immediately be
fallen upon and chopped into mince-meat by foreign nations;
and he had never once dreamed that it was possible for a man
to get into the navy without he first manifested all the bravery
and genius of Admiral Blake and Lord Nelson and Hull and
Perry combined, and he was grieved beyond measure to hear
that a sneaking poltroon, without even animal courage, or
mental energy enough to command an oyster boat, could by
political influence alone, be entrusted with the honor of the
American flag, and receive pay and rations for disgracing it.
Supper being placed on the table, the farmer's rosy cheek'd
daughter who had prepared it, sat down at the tea board, her
mother having gone out to put the young children to bed, and
the weary and hungry travellers gathered around it and
partook
of the smoking hot and delicious meal in a spirit of
exulting
happiness and gratitude. The old merchant, who had
never before met with an adventure having the slightest tinge
of marvelousness, looked upon himself as a perfect hero of
romance
,
little dreaming, however, that his exploits would ever
be recorded in history, and he chuckled with immense
inward
satisfaction at the noise his adventure would make in
South street when it should be known there. As for
Jeremiah
and John, they were both too much engaged with their
present delightful feelings to think of anything but their
present condition, but they were both unspeakably happy when
Mr. Tremlett told them he intended to return with them to
New York the very next day, if the weather would permit.
While they were enjoying themselves at their supper, the
farmer sat with a huge volume open before him, which
Jeremiah
discovered was Fox's Book of Martyrs bound up with
Barclay's Apology. The supper was acknowledged on all
hands to be the best that ever was eaten, and when the reader
is informed that it consisted, first of a huge loaf of rye and
indian bread, supported, on one side, by a brown dish of apple
sauce, on the other, by a pewter platter of fried ham and eggs,
and flanked by a roll of new butter and almost an entire old
cheese; second, a hot apple pie, accompanied by a plate of hot
rolls, a loaf of wheaten bread and part of a loin of roasted veal;
third, a loaf of pound cake and a dish of preserved peaches
swimming in fresh cream; and fourth, a cup, or rather a dozen
of them, of very choice old hyson, and a dish of honey comb,
which we forgot to put in its proper place, perhaps he will
not be disposed to doubt the fact.
As the evening was far advanced before the supper table
was cleared away, preparations were immediately made for
going to bed; the farmer had stated truly that he had no
spare beds, for it appeared that he had a couple of extra hands
at work upon his farm; but there was no deficiency of
bedding
,
as presently appeared, a field bed having been made in
an adjoining room where the travellers retired to rest, after
having each of them emptied a brown mug of old cider at
the pressing request of friend Hogshart and his wife, who both
assured them it would do them good, and to encourage them
to do so, first set the example themselves, in which they were
followed by the three sons, and even the young lady herself
who said she would take a little tiny drop, which she did, for
drops are only tiny in comparison with other drops, as a
bucket full is but a drop in the ocean.
The next morning, the weather being clear and pleasant, a
carriage was hired of friend Hogshart, and the three travellers
set out on their return to the city, with light hearts and very
light pockets, and without the encumbrance of any superfluous
baggage, Mr. Tremlett's trunk having been carried over the
dam of the river the night before.
Here we shall rest at the first stage of our journey and bring
the first part of our history to a close, but before we part with
our reader we will inform him of a fact of which he would
otherwise remain a long time ignorant.
However unaccountable a man's actions may sometimes
appear, they can generally be traced to a sufficient cause;
murders, suicides, robberies, treasons, are never accidents; but
in nine cases out of ten when a man falls in love, it would
puzzle the most profound philosopher of the new school to
discover a satisfactory reason for his doing so. While men
act from conviction in the most trifling affairs of life, in the
most important of falling in love, he shuts the eyes of his
reason
and leaves all to chance, and he gets punished
accordingly
,
he succeeds better in every thing than in getting married,
generally of course. What opportunities for becoming
acquainted
with Huldah Hogshart, the farmer's daughter,
Jeremiah
Jernegan may have enjoyed, has never transpired, but
when these two young persons bade each other farewell, it
was plain enough to the most careless observer that a tender
regard had sprung up between them, which was the more
manifest from the great pains which both took to conceal
it. Jeremiah was in love.
BOOK II.
CHAPTER I.
CONTAINS SOME SOLEMN REFLECTIONS ON A VERY SOLEMN
SUBJECT.
AMONG the innumerable little tin signs that dot the
surface
of every building in Wall street, there might have
been seen at the period whereof we write, one emblazoned in
copperish looking gilding with the names of Brothers Tuck,
fastened against the basement office of a very high granite
building. This was the place of business of the two young
gentlemen of that name who have already been presented to
the reader. When we last parted company with them they
were boys; they are now men. They were then called
simply Tom and Fred; they are now known as T. Jefferson
Tuck and F. Augustus Tuck; but we shall continue to apply
to them the appellation by which we first knew them, because
we have a fondness for old-fashioned names. In the
neighborhood
of Wall street, and at the Board of Brokers, they were
known by at least a dozen different appellations. Some
called
them simply
the
Tucks; others Guss. and Jeff., others
the
two
Tucks, while some merely called them
the Brothers
,
and some coarse people, for there are coarse people even in
Wall street, called them the
Tuckses
.
The Brothers Tuck were in good credit in Wall street, for
it was universally known that their bachelor uncle was rich
and old, and they never troubled themselves to contradict the
rumor that he was going to leave them a large portion of his
estate. Tom was the managing partner. He had a great
financial reputation, which in those days was equal to a
fortune
,
and he was consequently a very important personage
on the side-walk of Wall street, where he was rarely seen
without a knot of billious-looking, care-worn faces, clustered
around him, as though he were the sun of their centre from
whose beams they all imbibed light and heat. But the
meaning
of words is continually changing and a great financier in
these days is looked upon as signifying very nearly a great
rogue. Whenever anybody called upon Fred. in relation to
business, he always referred them to his brother, contenting
himself mainly with spending his share of the profits, and
reading all the new novels as fast as they came out. The
particular nature of their business no one ever rightly
understood
:
they talked mysteriously of their operations and
transactions
,
and they were supposed to be shrewd calculators
devilish close fellows who continued to keep their
business
to themselves. They lived, with their mother, at the
genteelest extremity of the city, and drove down to their office
every morning in a drab-colored phaeton of an indescribable
shape. They dealt some in stocks, talked knowingly about
the currency and exchanges, and dined at a French
restorateurs
.
They frequented political meetings and subscribed to
benevolent societies without number; they signed all the
petitions that were brought to them, let the object of them be
what it might: they worshipped in a fashionable church, and
entertained a truly orthodox and conservative hatred of
abolitionists and fanatics; and they were, of course,
universally
respected.
Have you seen that rascal Jacobs? said Tom Tuck to
his brother, as he entered their office one morning.
Not yet, replied Fred. I will directly. I am in the
middle of a capital story, don't disturb me.
Fred you're a fool! said Tom, as he jerked off his gloves
and threw them spitefully upon his desk, throw away
those cursed books and attend to your business.
Presently, presently, replied Fred, let me finish this
chapter first, or I shall lose the thread of the story.
You will lose your neck by your folly, returned his
brother
,
but I will see that you do me no harm. I'll dissolve
with you, and you shall starve, as you would without me.
You must see Jacobs this morning. Come!
Hush, hush, replied Fred, don't get excited; here
comes William.
Did you see young Tremlett? enquired the senior
brother
addressing a dwarfish looking boy who now entered the
office.
Yes sir, I just seen him, and he sent you this note, replied
the boy.
Let me have it Sir, said Tom, and the next time I
send you on an errand sir, do you move yourself quicker sir,
do you hear, sir?
The boy made no reply, because he was afraid.
Read it, read, said Fred.
Dear T. I cannot send you the money this morning.
Your uncle is confined to his room, and my father is out of
town. You know I cannot sign a check.
Truly Yours, John Tremlett.
P. S. Tell Julia I shall not be able to see her this
evening
.
First rate! exclaimed Fred. throwing down his book
I'll go and find Jac
He was cut short by a glance from his brother's eye, who
turned to the boy and told him pleasantly to go to Skamps
and Company and ask them if they were a couple of
thousand over. Now, he said, turning to Fred as soon as
they had left the office; start and don't let me see you
again 'til you have found him. But don't bring him here, tell
him I'll meet him at the old place.
Notwithstanding the great anxiety of the elder Tuck to get
his brother off, the junior stopped to brush his whiskers and
adjust his Madras cravat, which caused him to swear most
profanely. And even after Fred, had left the office, he
returned
again for his cane, and remarked to Tom that
that
story was one of thrilling interest.
So wide an interval having occurred since the close of our
last chapter, it may be proper to state that the firm of Tremlett
and Tuck was still in existence, although, in consequence of
the advanced age of the partners, their business had greatly
fallen off, but their wealth was supposed to be greater than
ever. John Tremlett had reached his twenty-first year, and
his manhood had more than fulfilled the promise of his youth,
the fondness of his father had increased as the one grew in
manliness and strength, and the other gradually gave way to
the encroachments of Time. They had never been parted
for a longer time than a day since their unlucky journey
towards
Willow-mead, and the presence of the young man had
become almost essential to the existence of the feeble old
merchant, who had often been heard to declare that he could
not die happy if his darling boy should not be present to close
his eyes when death should summon him away, and he made
no secret of his intentions to leave the young man his entire
property. Mr. Tuck was still called the junior partner; but
the infirmities of age pressed more heavily upon him than
upon Mr. Tremlett. He was often confined to his room by
illness, and his friends all agreed that he was not long for
this world, a conclusion that required no great wisdom to
arrive at, seeing that he was turned of seventy. But
notwithstanding
the perfect freedom with which his friends canvassed
the probabilities of his death, he would not listen to a word
on the subject himself, and whoever spoke to him about dying
once, incurred no risk of repeating the offence, for he would
not allow such people to enter his room. His enmity to his
two nephews and their mother continued unchanged, but
Julia Tuck was a constant, and welcome visitant at his
bedside
;
and although he was cross and quarrelsome to every
17
body else, he always received her with apparent pleasure,
and her presence soothed him like a charm even in his most
fretful moods. Of course, the old gentleman's last will and
testament was a theme which his relations were never tired
of discussing, for no one, but his lawyer, knew in what
manner
he intended to bequeath his great wealth. It was
believed
by some that he would give a large part of it to his niece
who became therefor an object of their envy and calumny. It
was confidently asserted by others that he had appropriated
the bulk of his property to build a church; an assertion that
had no better foundation than the fact that he had never
contributed
a copper in aid of such an object during his long
life. Others as confidently maintained that he was going to
found a magnificent public library, a supposition based upon
the same kind of grounds, since he was an acknowledged
hater of all books, excepting only cash-books and bank-books.
The feelings of his two nephews, however, were perfectly
serene on the subject, for they were well satisfied that their
uncle would not bequeath his money to them, let him
remember
whomsoever he might in his will, and therefore it
would be improper, at this stage of our narrative, to impute
any sinister motives to the brothers because they manifested
great anxiety on learning that he was confined to his room
by illness.
The old gentleman sat in his rocking chair, wondering that
his niece had not called to see him, but afraid to send for her
lest it should be thought he was sick, and trying to drive his
thoughts away from himself by sending them on 'change
where they would not remain, but kept returning and
hovering
about his heart which throbbed violently as though it
were trying to escape from his breast, when a tap was heard
at his chamber door, and the tapper being invited to come in,
the apparition of his nephew T. Jefferson Tuck presented
itself
to his astonished eyes. The appearance, for Mr. Tuck
thought for a moment that it was an unreal personage before
him, was accompanied by a middle aged gentleman in a
black bombazine suit, and a pair of gold mounted spectacles.
As soon as Mr. Tuck recovered the use of his tongue, the
functions of which were suspended for a while by
astonishment
,
he ordered the intruders to quit his sight without
ceremony
.
But his nephew meekly replied that he would if his
uncle would allow him to say one word first.
Say on, and then go! replied the old gentleman.
It is a long time since I have had this pleasure, said
Tom, and I am grieved at heart that our first meeting after
so long an estrangement, should be in a sick room.
If you came here to talk about sick rooms stop there,
said his uncle.
Well, then, it shall not be about sickness, but about health
and happiness, said his nephew, assuming a cheerful tone,
I heard you were not well, and not knowing who your
medical
attendant might be, my brother and I determined, even
at the risk of your displeasure, to recommend a very skillful
physician to you who has lately performed some very
remarkable
cures. This is the gentleman. Allow me to
introduce
Doctor Healman. Doctor this is my uncle; he will
no doubt be always happy to see you, because I am
persuaded
that after this visit he will rarely have occasion for your
services. The gentleman in the black suit made a low bow,
and Mr. Tuck told him to sit down.
And now, uncle, said his nephew, I will leave you,
and to show you how much more I respect your will than
my own wishes, this shall be the last time I will ever intrude
myself upon your presence, and with these words this
dutiful
nephew retired from his uncle's chamber with his face
buried in his white cambric pocket handkerchief.
I don't know what to make of that fellow, said Mr. Tuck
as his nephew closed the door.
Make of him! repeated the doctor, he don't wequire
anything to be made out on him at all. He is one of the
most wemarkable pious young men of the age. He is up to
all sorts of goodness.
But his brother Fred.
is
a confirmed rogue, continued
the old gentleman.
Pwehaps so, said the doctor, it is easily accounted for,
he weads too much.
Yes, yes, that is it. When I see him strutting through
the streets with one of those blue covered books under his
arm, I can hardly keep from beating him with my cane,
doctor
.
But, young men are different new, doctor, to what they
were when you and I were boys.
You may well say that, replied the doctor.
Did you ever have a case of beating of the heart in your
practice, doctor? asked Mr. Tuck.
I have made some wemarkable cures in that line, replied
the doctor. Are you affected after that sort?
Sometimes I feel such a terrible throbbing here, said the
old man putting his hand to his heart; and then I have such
a choking in my throat! O, Doctor, I would pay a good
round price to be cured of it. I don't mind expense, doctor.
I suppose it is not dangerous, but it is very annoying, because
it keeps me from my business.
Let me see your tongue, sir, said the doctor. O, ah!
it is nothing but a dewangement of the seckweting vessels. I
can cure it at wonst.
Do you really think that's it? asked Mr. Tuck.
Of course it is: I should wather guess I havn't dissected
a dead body evwy day for twenty years to be mistaken about
a disorder like yours.
Don't talk about dead bodies, said Mr. Tuck, it makes
me feel unpleasant, doctor, and I won't have it.
Don't be alarmed about that, the corpses that I cut up are
all poor people that couldn't afford to pay for a physician to
save their lives; paupers and such like that ain't of no
consequence
.
Ah! its a great thing to be able to pay for a first rate
physician
.
said Mr. Tuck, I suppose, doctor, you have stu
died a good deal in your time?
O, a gwate deal, all the ancient authors.
And, pray, doctor, how long did you ever know a man to
live? asked Mr. Tuck.
Some one hundwed, and some a hundwed and fifty,
replied
the doctor; it differs according to families. Some
families all die young, and some live to enormous ages.
If I could have my way, said Mr. Tuck, I would either
die very young, or live to about a hundred. I think that is a
very good age, and a man ought to be all ready to go then.
But to die at my age is dreadful. It is terrible to think of,
doctor, and I don't see why one could not live to a good old
age now, as well as in the time of Methusaleh.
So he might, replied the doctor, with pwoper tweatment,
if he was willing to live on woots, and other wight kinds of
food.
Ah, but, doctor, said Mr. Tuck, you know that
physicians
themslves do not live longer than other men.
Of course not, replied the doctor, it's all according to
wule; don't blacksmith's horses always go unshod?
That's true, that's true, said Mr. Tuck, but pray tell
me, doctor, what is the right kind of food. I would live on
anything for the sake of living to a good old age.
Why, esckwlent woots, such as sassafawilla, and other
things. But I must go, I can't neglect my other patients.
Do you charge by the hour, or only so much for a visit?
asked Mr. Tuck.
Only two dollars a call, long or short; it's all the same to
me.
Of course you don't charge as much for a simple case
like mine as you do for a dangerous one? said Mr.
Tuck.
It's all one, replied the doctor, I suppose it would make
no odds to you whether you died of a simple cold or of the
most invetwate complication of disordwes. It cost me as
much for a diploma to cure the measles as for the vewy worst
kind of cholewa.
Ah, that's very true, very true, replied Mr. Tuck,
if there were any real danger of dying, of course I shouldn't
object to the price.
Well Sir, said the doctor, I will go upon the pwinciple
of no cure no pay, like the quacks and patent doctors. But
it would be a shocking bad pwecedent for the wegular faculty
I must allow, for some patients will die on purpose under the
best tweatment. Here then, continued the doctor, taking a
phial from his coat pocket, is a bottle of my celebrated
elixir, the elixir of juvenility; Doctor Healman's cure for
disorders of the heart. It will cure you at wonst if you only
take enough of it.
Never fear, but I'll take enough of it, said Mr. Tuck, as
he reached out his hand for the bottle.
But stop, said the doctor, putting the elixir back into his
coat pocket; before I can pwescribe for you I must have a
solemn pwomise that you won't call in another physician, or
I'm o-p-h, I don't want anybody's botching laid at
my
door.
What do you mean by botching? inquired Mr. Tuck.
I mean, of course, if anybody should happen to kill you
by a wong pwescwiption it might injure my pwactice.
That's very true, very true, said Mr. Tuck, I pledge
you my word I will not call in another physician without
your permission.
Then, sir, I'll pwescribe for you with pleasure. Take
this bottle of elixir, stand it in a dark closet until nine o'clock
be careful not to let the light shine upon it, then take it, shake
the bottle thwee times up and down, and then swallow as much
of it as ever you can.
And do you really think I shall be well enough to attend
to business tomorrow? asked Mr. Tuck.
Of course you will, but if you ain't I won't make no
charge to you. The doctor stood for a moment and glanced
round the room, and then shook hands with his patient and
withdrew.
That Tom
is
a good boy, after all, said Mr. Tuck to
himself
,
if I hadn't made my will I don't know but I would
leave him something. But it will be time enough for that
when I'm going to die. The doctor is rather a strange man
for a physician, but Tom is no fool, let him be what he may;
and I am very certain he wouldn't employ any but the very
best physicians
As the old man sat mumbling to himself, and rocking
gently in his chair, another rap was heard at the door and
Jeremiah Jernegan made his appearance.
Ah, Jeremiah, is that you? said Mr. Tuck, come in,
come in, Jeremiah, and sit down, I am glad to see you, I want
to ask you a question. I thought it was Julia at first, I
wonder
where she can be?
Are you well enough to sign a check? asked Jeremiah,
sitting down by the old man's side. Mr. Tremlett has not
come in town to day.
What do you mean, what do you mean? replied the old
gentleman, well enough, well enough, don't you see I am
not sick? You, are stupid Jeremiah!
I am very glad to hear you are not sick, replied
Jeremiah
,
but really you do not look well. Perhaps it's owing
to these dark curtains. I am glad you are well.
Yes, yes, it's the curtains, I'll have them taken down
when the weather gets warmer, said Mr. Tuck, tell me,
Jeremiah, did you ever hear of anybody's living so long that
they didn't care about living any longer?
All good men are willing to die when they are called,
replied Jeremiah.
Do you think it makes them more willing if they are
good? Who was it, Jeremiah, in the Bible, who went up to
Heaven without dying at all? was it your namesake or
was it Isaiah? I forget about it.
Neither, replied Jeremiah. It was Elijah the
Tishbite
;
he was taken up into Heaven in a chariot of fire.
The Tishbite was a lucky fellow. I should like that way
myself.
If you would die like the Tishbite you must live like him,
said Jeremiah. But why would you ascend up into the
clouds, like the prophet, when the privilege is granted to you
of lying down in the grave with our Savior, who will
himself
summon you when you are called to Judgment. Think,
could your soul endure the terrors of the whirl-wind and fire,
the chariot of Israel and the horsemen thereof? Would
you not rather part from this life in the way appointed for all
flesh?
Ah, Jeremiah, you have read the Bible until you are used
to it, but I cannot think of dying without a shudder, I feel
the worms creeping over me.
If we thought aright on the subject, replied Jeremiah,
death would never cause us to shudder. If we can bear
up under the load of life, we ought not to be dismayed at the
prospect of death, for one, we know, is heavy and grievous to
bear, while the other, we are assured, is calm, and pleasant
and unchangeable. Here we are banished from the presence
of God, there we shall stand before his throne. If the infant
were capable of thought and reflection there would be greater
cause for apprehension and dread when entering upon this
changeful life, than when leaving it for the next world which
is unchangeable and eternal. Who that knew of the
afflictions
of this life, but would shudder at the thought af
encountering
them? and yet we make merry when a child is
born into the world, but we follow him with tears when he is
taken from it.
Stop, stop, exclaimed Mr. Tuck, say no more about
dying, but tell me about business. Don't tell any body that I
am sick. I shall be on 'change to-morrow. I don't like to be
questioned about my health, but I will tell you, Jeremiah,
because
you don't ask questions, I have got a terrible beating of
my heart; it almost chokes me at times; but you don't think
it's dangerous, Jeremiah?
Indeed, I have but little knowledge of diseases, replied
Jeremiah, but I supposed that diseases of the heart were
dangerous.
Yes, yes, replied Mr. Tuck, diseases of the heart may
be, but mine Jeremiah, is only a beating. If the heart didn't
beat you know a man would die.
Very true, replied Jeremiah, perhaps I am wrong.
butnever mind, never mind, Jeremiah, I know what you
are going to say. You needn't say it. I understand. Are
there any arrivals this morning, and what's the news?
The Susan has arrived from Rio, and coffee has advanced
half a cent, replied Jeremiah.
Good, good! ejaculated the old gentleman. A half a
cent, that's good. Is she full? Has she got in an entire
cargo?
Yes sir, said Jeremiah, an entire cargo of hides.
Hides! exclaimed the merchant, and coffee advanced
half a cent; that's bad, Jeremiah, very bad. Reach me my
port folio and let me sign the check. There go, go. Don't
say anything more, you make me nervous. My heart beats
worse than ever.
Jeremiah folded the check and left the chamber slowly.
He would gladly have remained to talk to the old gentleman
about the great concern of his soul, but he was afraid of
defeating his object by too much zeal. Once he turned
back, hesitated for a moment, and then returned to the
counting room. His indecision was ever after a source of
great grief to him.
No sooner was the old gentleman again left alone than he
wished that somebody was near him. His niece had more
18
before neglected him so long, and he listened eagerly for the
sound of her step on the stairs. But the day wore heavily
away, and she came not. He wondered at her absence, but
was afraid to send for her. He could expect no one beside
her to visit him; and he tried to divert his mind by thinking of
his business, but thoughts of death would rise up in his mind.
Gaunt spectres that only appeared more terrifying and distinct
when he closed his eyes, trying in vain to shut them out of
his mind. What could he do! Even his bed looked to him
like a grave; it had a green coverlid, and the back of the
chairs were in shape like tombstones. It was strange that he
had never noticed these things before, but they now appeared to
him with a terrible distinctness. His mother's portrait was
hung in the room and every time he glanced at it he
remembered
that she was lying in her grave, and that he must soon
be buried by her side. He walked to his book-case and took
up a volume hoping to amuse himself with its contents. He
turned to the title page; it was the Holy Living and Dying,
and it fell like lead from his hands. But another lay near
it. It was Julia's album that she had left there the day
before
.
He opened it, and seeing young Tremlett's writing,
curiosity tempted him to read: it was a little poem:
Oft have I joined in mirth and glee,
When many a weary heart was sighing,
And laughed, because I could not see
That all around the dead were lying.
And others now in frolic and glee,
Their festal hours with mirth are keeping
Who soon by sorrow touched, like me,
Beside some loved one may be weeping.
O! earth and air, and sea are full
Of messengers of death
He could read no more, and he closed the book. He knew
that the Bible was full of passages to remind him of death
and he would not open it although it, almost seemed to invite
him to do so. He turned from the book-case and walked to
the window to beguile his thoughts by watching the passers
by; but he had not stood there a minute, when two men came
along bearing an empty coffin upon their shoulders. He
turned his head quickly away but not until he had discerned
that it was about his own measure. To add to his gloomy
feelings it was a dull, dark day, and the wind moaned
drearily
through the blinds of his windows. His heart beat
violently
and he sank down in his chair and tried to compose his
thoughts, but in vain. When his housekeeper came into the
room he detained her in conversation as long as he could, but
she seemed in a hurry to leave him.
At last it was dark, and he ordered his shutters to be closed
and a bright light placed upon his table. But it cast fearful
shadows on the wall. His servant brought in the evening
paper. He opened it and the first item of intelligence that
met his eye, was the death of an old acquaintance from a
disease of the
heart
. He threw down the paper and
involuntarily
applied his hand to his left side. His heart throbbed as
though it would burst. He was alarmed and yet he was
afraid to send for a physician, remembering his promise to
Doctor Healman. Wearied and exhausted at last he fell into
a slight doze, but he was soon aroused from it by the hail
driving against his windows. It had a strange sound to him;
like stones rattling on a coffin when the first shovel full is
thrown in to fill up a grave. A cold sweat stood upon his
forehead, and the blood rushed furiously into his heart. He
tried to reason himself out of his fears. What could they
mean? Why had not the same sights and sounds produced
such an effect on him before? He had seen and heard them
a thousand times. He was in the daily habit of passing an
undertaker's shop where coffins stood round like boxes of
merchandise
,
but they had never awakened a gloomy thought in
his mind. His mother's picture had been hanging many
years in his chamber; and, although he had often times
dropped a tear when gazing upon her mild countenance, it
had never before suggested a thought of death, and why
should it now? Scarcely conscious of what he was doing
he opened his writing desk and took out his will. He
remembered
all the revengeful thoughts that were warring in
his mind when he wrote it, and how he anticipated the
disappointment
and chagrin of his relatives when they should
know its terms; and how he chuckled over the imaginary
anger of his brother's widow and her two sons, and be
wondered
that he should have been moved by such feelings while
engaged in such a solemn duty. But he soon grew weary
of his will, and he tried to get rid of the load that oppressed
him by pacing the chamber floor. Slowly and heavily the
hours dropped along, but scarcely were they gone than they
seemed to have flown like lightning. By and by the clock
struck nine. It was the appointed hour for taking the elixir.
He drew the phial from the dark corner in which he had
placed it, and remembering the injunction of the doctor shook
it three times, placed it to his mouth with trembling hands,
and swallowed its entire contents.
CHAPTER II.
TREATS ENTIRELY OF FAMILY MATTERS.
MRS. TUCK and her daughter were quietly sipping their
first cup of tea when Mr. F. Augustus entered the
parlor
and after depositing a couple of damp volumes on the
mantel piece by the side of his cigar case, seated himself at
the tea-table, and nodding significantly to his mother, said to
his sister,
You will not have the pleasure of Mr. Jack Tremlett's
company this evening, Miss.
My son! exclaimed his mother, with a reproving frown,
how can you!
Indeed, I did not know that you were Mr. Tremlett's
guardian, replied his sister in a tone meant to provoke a
reply.
His guardian! O, certainly not. But I am his friend,
Miss, and I beg you to understand he treats me with less
reserve
than you do. He will not be here this evening I can
assure you, he sent me a note to that effect and requested me
to communicate the fact to you. It takes me.
And pray, said the mother, folding her arms in a
queenly
manner, why did he not send his note to Julia, or come
himself and inform her of his intentions. Does the young
man know who my daughter is, pray?
I am satisfied, said the young lady in a trembling voice,
doubtless he had sufficient reasons.
But I am not satisfied, said the proud mother, neither
with him for daring to treat my daughter with such contempt
nor with you for tamely submitting to it. O, if you had your
father's or your mother's spirit you would never see him
again.
My dear mother, said Julia, do not compel me to act
contrary to your wishes. It is useless to talk to me on this
subject; I have a thousand times expressed my determination
and I can never, never, alter! I have no pride, no ambition
but to appear well in his eyes. Do not reproach me; your
words kill me!
I will never reproach you again, replied her mother,
but I have too much love for you, and too much respect for
your father's memory to see you humble yourself to a man
who shows no regard for you, without reminding you of your
duty to yourself and your father's family.
That's a little too strong, said Fred.
Perhaps your ambition will be gratified when you have
followed me to my grave, said Julia, and she rose sobbing
convulsively from the table and threw herself upon the sofa.
Now mother, said Fred you have done it. Look at her.
Mrs. Tuck turned towards her daughter with a severe frown
but it was instantly succeeded by an expression of terror, and
she ran to the sofa and clasping the young lady in her arms
exclaimed in the tenderest accents, Julia, my dear, dear
Julia, my darling, darling daughter, speak to me! O, darling
darling, speak to your mother.
But her daughter was insensible to her lamentations; she
lay cold and rigid as death.
It is too late to cry now, said Fred. you should have
thought of that sooner. Some hartshorn and brandy will do
more good than all your agony. Let me hold her while you
get the medicine. Hereupon he took his sister in in his
arms, and after chafing her temples, and rubbing her hands,
he made out with the assistance of the servants who had come
to his aid, to pour a spoonful of hartshorn and brandy into
her mouth, after which she began to revive, although it was
a long time before she was fully restored to consciousness.
Mrs. Tuck wept, and raved, and hung upon her daughter's
neck, and called upon Heaven to bless her, and knelt to her
and did a thousand other wild and passionate things in
strange contrast to her proud and haughty demeanor but a
few moments before. But the tempest began to subside as the
young lady began to revive; it had not settled into a perfect calm,
however, before Mr. T. Jefferson Tuck made his appearance,
and perceiving at a glance what had occurred, he exclaimed,
So you are amusing yourselves after the old fashion! come.
Shut up. It's time to be done with these follies, Do you
not know that Julia should have gone to her uncle this
evening
?
Remember, mother he can't bear a dissapointment, and
this evening's work may make an alteration in his will.
O, my children! cried the distressed mother, you know
I have no happiness but in seeing you happy; yet you will
afflict me with your cruel conduct.
You have told us that same thing a few times before,
mother
;
havn't you a feint recollection of it, Tom? said Mr. F.
Augustus.
Two fools in one family are enough, replied Tom,
behave
yourself, Fred. and copy after me; let your mother and
sister do up all the nonsense, but let us act with a little
decency
.
There she goes again, cried Fred, and Tom sprang to
the side of his sister who had relapsed into another
convulsion
fit, from which she did not recover until she had been
carried to her chamber and had poultices applied to her feet
and temples.
The brothers were too much accustomed to scenes like
this to be moved by their occurrence; and Tom and his
mother
had no sooner left the room bearing the unhappy and too
sensitive Julia in their arms, than Fred lighted a cigar, and
taking one of the volumes from the mantel piece that he had
placed there on entering the room, seated himself in an arm
chair which would have formed a fitting throne for the very
Genius of Indolence, and was directly lost in the golden haze
of fiction, where he forgot his sister, his business, himself
even, and everything appertaining to him, except his cigar,
which he continued to whiff until all the objects in the room
were dimmed by heavy clouds of smoke. But he was not
allowed to revel in this misty condition long, for his mother
and brother returned from his sister's room, and with their
hard realities shattered the slight forms that entranced him
into fragements finer than gossamer's shadow.
Now, mother, you have fooled me all my life, and I'll
not put up with it any longer, said Tom as he re-entered the
room.
Nor I, said her second son F. Augustus Tuck, lighting
another cigar, if I doconfound the cigarmother lend
me your scissors,If I docurse the thing it won't smoke
ah, yes, there it goesthat's itIf I do I shall alter immensely
I give you my word.
O, my children, cried their mother wringing her hands
you will not have to bear the burden of your poor mother's
affection much longer. But when I am in my grave
Then it will be time to cry, said Tom as he looked in
the glass and fingered his whiskers.
Yes, said Fred, it will be time enough then; but you
have told us that same thing so often, mother, it has got to be
an old story. If you would invent something a little more
touching I wouldn't mind giving way to it occasionally. But
I want to be left alone now, and I wish that you and Tom
would take to another room and leave me to my book.
Leave you to your book is it? said his brother, if it
were a book, a stock-book, a bill-book, a day-book, or
anything
else that deserves the name of a book I would; but such
a heap of trash as that is a disgrace to the name of a book,
and to show his contempt for the work he caught it out of his
brother's hand and threw it into the grate.
This was touching Fred upon a sensitive point; it was
his raw spot, so he jumped up from the purple morocco where
he seemed to be imbedded, and caught his brother by his
collar
who immediately caught his brother Fred in a similar
manner, and thus being brought into very close contact they
began to force each other about the room in such a
promiscuous
and hurry-scurry manner that the astral lamps, and
mirrors and chandeliers, seemed on the point of instant
annihilation
;
but they soon had the additional weight of their
mother's
person, which was probably twice their own, to
contend
with, she having thrown herself upon them to prevent
them from doing each other any injury; and by the help of
her voice tended to kick up a dust, that her tears were not
sufficiently copious to allay.
You puppy! said Tom as he darted a look of contempt
at his brother.
You beast! muttered Fred, take that for your pains;
and so saying he caught hold of his brother's gold headed
cane, and snapped it across his knee, and threw it into the
fire.
Ah! indeed, I like that much, said his brother Tom,
here's to you, and so saying he opened his pen-knife and
cut one of the eyes out of his brother Fred's portrait which
hung in the room, and threw it at him.
This brotherly act was immediately repaid by Fred who
caught hold of his brothers coat-tail and tore off just one half
of his new green coat, a feat which was reciprocated by Tom
without deliberation. They mutually paused, while they cast
their eyes around them for fresh objects to exercise their
affections
upon, and their mother threw herself upon her knees
between them and begged them to destroy her next, as they
both had an equal interest in her.
19
But for you, said Tom, this wouldn't have happened.
You always get us into difficulty.
That's true, said Fred, you know its all your own
fault, mother; if you hadn't disturbed me in my reading it
wouldn't have happened.
O, my poor husband, sobbed Mrs. Tuck, it is well for
you that the dead cannot see what is done by the living.
I think so too, said the tender Fred, he would be
ashamed of you if he saw how you carry on sometimes, I
dare believe. It takes me.
Come Fred, said Tom, I won't hear you abuse your
mother, in my presence,
O, let him, let him kill me, said Mrs. Tuck.
If he does I'll flog him, said the virtuous Tom with an
indignant jerk of his head.
You flog me! said Fred, throwing down the remains of
his coat on the floor, and siding up to his brother who was
clearing himself of the two sleeves of his coat, the back part
of which his brother had eased him of.
Now boys, said their mother, suddenly suspending a
flood of tears, I will have this no longer. I am ashamed
of you at your age to be acting like children.
Well, I am done, said Fred, fumbling in his hat for a
cigar, deuce take it there's none here. Tom give me a
cigar.
I'll give you a knock on the head, replied his brother,
look at my cane there.
And look at my picture there, you thief; returned Fred.
Tom, give your brother a cigar, said Mrs. Tuck, you
are the oldest and you should set a better example.
Take your cigar, said Tom as he threw his cigar-case
at his brother's head, but Fred dodged and the cigar-case
cracked the shade of the astral lamp.
There you go again, said Fred, never mind, you'll
have to pay for it yourself. And he picked up the cigar
case and lighted his cigar.
Now mother, said Fred, what good do you get by
talking
to Julia about young Tremlett. She swears she'll have
him, and you know she is too much like you not to have her
own way about it.
It mortifies my pride, and kills me to think of it; replied
Mrs. Tuck, that my daughter should throw herself away
upon a son of nobody. He has no family, no connections,
and not even a name of his own; and besides, I hate him.
But the young fellow will be rich, replied Fred, he
will have an immense estate at old Tremlett's death, and I
dare believe he will have a family all in good time. For my
part I always liked him, and I don't blame Julia for liking
him too.
Well, then, I do, said Tom, Mother is right. I hate him
too. But you need give yourself no uneasiness about Julia.
He never wanted her, and I do not believe that he loves her
any more than I do, in the way of marriage. But he is
amiable
and good natured and he has not the courage to tell her
so. It will all come out in the end. But we must let the
girl alone now, she is a great favorite with uncle Gris, and
if he should leave her anything we might whistle for our
share of it if we annoy her too much in this way.
Well, I dare believe there's truth in that, mother, said
Fred, now you have got your cue, don't throw her into
convulsions again by telling her he has no regard for her.
O, my children, said Mrs. Tuck, you little know the
strength of a mother's love; I could freely die for either of you
but I cannot see your sister disgrace herself.
O, I dare believe, you would die for us quite cheerfully,
said Fred, but you don't care a straw about our happiness.
Well, there's something a little too transcendental in that for
my philosophy.
A pull at the hall bell put an end to the conversation, and
the two brothers darted out of the parlor with the remnants of
their coats, while their mother began to snug up, and
presently
the servant ushered in two fashionable gentlemen, who
had called for the double purpose of enquiring after the health
of Miss Tuck, and of playing a game of whist with her
brothers
.
Mrs. Tuck received them with a most gracious, but
dignified
air, and informed them that her daughter was quite well,
but that she had gone out to spend the evening with a friend;
and in a few moments her two interesting sons walked in and
welcomed their visitors with the pleasantest and most
delightful
manner conceivable. Never were two gentlemen happier
to meet two other gentlemen than were the two Tucks to meet
their friends, and the two friends were equally delighted to
find the brothers at home, although their happiness was in a
manner damped at the absence of their sister; and Mrs. Tuck
was happy to hear that the two young gentlemen were quite
well, and the two young gentlemen, together and separately,
were happy in being made acquainted with the pleasing fact
that Mrs. Tuck was well, and had been well since she had
the pleasure of seeing them the last time. It must not be
supposed by the reader that these two gentlemen were a pair
of Howards going about the world enquiring after the health
of its inhabitants, and making themselves extremely happy or
miserable in conformity with the feelings of those whom they
met; quite the contrary, for in their walk to Mrs. Tuck's
house they encountered several persons whose woe-begone
and wretched appearance might have brought tears from the
eyes, and shillings from the pockets, of seemingly less
sensitive
persons; and yet they walked on quite happy and
cheerful
;
indeed they had made themselves rather merry at the
queer looks of a little bare-footed girl who asked them for
two pennies to buy her mother a loaf of bread, but never once
thought of complying with the little girl's request. As these
are a kind of people whose feelings and actions we are not
ambitious of incorporating into our history, we will introduce
them formally to the reader, merely as specimens for the
benefit
of remote countries, and then leave them.
The eldest of these two personages was named Barnsill;
P. Ramsey Barnsill, was printed upon the gentleman's
card; he was in stature something less than five feet; his
nose was exceedingly prominent and its high bridge seemed
to draw the skin tight over the gentleman's face, which was
thin in the extreme; his eyes were large and staring and his
teeth were set at every possible angle to his gums; his
forehead
was low and narrow, but it was ornamented by two
bushy black eye-brows, that were counterbalanced by two
bushy black whiskers; the gentleman's dress it is not
necessary
to notice, since there was nothing noticeable about it, it
being a style of costume which leaves one in doubt after
having
parted with a gentleman whether he wore any covering
or not. If you had met Mr. Barnsill at Scuddor's Museum
you would have thought, as a matter of course, that he was
one of the five hundred thousand curiosities in that
remarkable
collection; but meeting with him at Mrs. Tuck's you
would have concluded, very correctly, that there was a
precious
good reason for his being included in the circle of her
acquaintance. The reason was this; Mr. Barnsill was the
nephew and confidential cash-keeper of Mr. Jeromus Barnsill
an old stock-broker of whom the brothers found it convenient
two or three times a week to borrow a thousand dollars, just
before three o'clock, to make their account good at the Bank.
The other gentleman was Mr. Ditchely; in what manner he
put his name upon his card, or whether he carried a card or
not we have never ascertained; he was in person not
immensely
higher than Mr. Barnsill, but he had a regular set
of features and handsome teeth, and he tried very hard for a
beard, but a few scattering whitish hairs upon the extreme
end of his chin scarce afforded an apology for one; his
dress was very bright, very glossy, and very fine; he looked
like a
petit courier
just imported, and sent out for a pattern;
Mr. Ditchley, was a clerk in a jobbing store in Pearl street,
and he visited Mrs. Tuck's as the friend of Mr. Barnsill.
Shortly after these two gentlemen came in, whist was
proposed
,
and they sat down with the two brothers and began to
play for the trifling sum of two shillings a corner, just to keep
alive the interest of the game; and shortly after they sat down,
a pitcher of hot punch was introduced with four tumblers,
and Mrs. Tuck withdrew. So these four gentlemen
continued
to shuffle, and deal, and cut, and sip, and smoke, and
talk of honors, suits, and lifts, and finessing, and Hoyle,
until
it was past midnight, and the house was still, and there
were no echoes of tramping feet heard on the pavement, when
they were suddenly startled in their seats by a hasty ring at
the hall door. The two brothers looked at each other, and
Fred, who was dealing at the time, turned pale as ashes and let
his cards fall. The servants had gone to bed, and as the door
was not immediately opened, there was another violent pull at
the hall bell.
Go to the door Fred; said Tom.
No, no, I can't, gasped Fred, go you; go.
Tom took a deep draught of the punch and opened the hall
door, but immediately returned very pale and ghastly, with a
stranger behind him.
What is it? what is it? exclaimed Mr. Barnsill and Mr.
Ditchley together.
Here's a gentleman come to inform us that our uncle
Gris, poor old man, has been found dead in his chair, said
Tom.
Dead! ejaculated his brother, dead! It's a mistake.
It's too true, replied the stranger, I saw the old
gentleman
myself. He is dead, indeed.
CHAPTER III.
CONTAINS MANY DOUBTS AND SUSPICIONS.
MY dear boy, said old Mr. Tremlett, addressing his son
who sat by his bed-side; it grieves me to see you
weep, I meant nothing by my remarks, but that the time is at
hand when you and I must part, on this earth, at least. This
sudden death of my partner cannot but remind me that I have
not long to remain with you, and the little time that we may
be allowed to live in each other's society must not be spent in
tears. Whenever I shall be called I will cheerfully go, and
when I close my eyes upon the world there will be no one
but you, for whom I would stay.
O, my father, my more than father, replied the young
man, seizing the old merchant's hand and bathing it with his
tears, how can I live when you are gone! There will be
none to care for me then, and I shall be more destitute than I
was when you took me from my loveless home, and taught
me the true worth of friendship and virtue. I have lived in
the hope that some opportunity would be allowed me of
proving
to you that I have not been a thoughtless and ungrateful
recipient of your goodness.
You will offend me by such talk, replied the old
gentleman
,
I have never doubted your affection or your gratitude
and it is I and not you, who am the debtor. I bless God that
he gave you to me in my old age, in my helpless and
decrepid
condition to sweeten my cup of life at a time when I was
least able to endure its biterness. You are young, and will,
I hope, see many years of happiness when I am gone. The
time may seem remote to you and long and weary to look
ahead to the period at which I am arrived; but you view it
through an inverted telescope. I look back to your age and it
seems scarce a moment of time since I occupied the spot where
you now stand. It matters not when we lie down to sleep our
last sleep how long we may have moved about upon the earth
nor whether we die, as I shall die, the nominal possessor of
wealth, or indebted to the charity of our neighbor for the
pallet
on which we expire. I feel this now. Perhaps it would have
been better had I felt it sooner. I am not ashamed of my
wealth, for as far as I know it has been acquired without harm
to others. But I sometimes think I had no right to keep what
I could not use myself, yet it is a consolation to know, that
you will never know the cruel struggles and harrassing fears
which I endured in the early part of my life. To think of
this has long been one of my pleasures. With some trifling
exceptions, I shall leave you the whole of my property. It
will be sufficient for all your wants, and there will be small
inducements for you to enter into the tormenting pursuits of
business. But if it should be your desire to do so, I have no
wish to restrain you. I hope, however, that you will be
moved by higher aims in employing your time and your
money than a wish to increase your fortune.
The life of a merchant must be at best unsatisfactory and
humiliating to a generous mind. It is the most purely
selfish
and least ennobling of all human pursuits, because it is the
most mercenary. The lowest mechanic and the smallest
cultivator
of the soil aim at higher things, and must of necessity
commune more closely with God and Nature. I have been
amazed, even in my narrow historical researches, to find so
few of the eminent men of the world taken from the
mercantile
profession. It is true that there have been some great
men who were merchants. But they are few. And it is
true also that the opportunities of a merchant for doing good
are greater than the opportunities of other men, yet when
they are improved they are episodes in his business and not
necessary to it.
I did myself a great wrong by neglecting to marry, when I
was young, from prudential motives; it was a deplorable
mistake
and deplorably I have suffered for it; all the sweets of life
have been untasted by me, while I have fed upon its bitterest
food. You, my dear boy will have no such false restraints as
I supposed it necessary to impose upon myself. Be not
therefore
self-debarred from life's greatest pleasures. There is
doubtless unhappiness even in the marriage state, and it must
have its drawbacks as all earthly things have; but if you
cannot find happiness there you will look for it in vain, I
fear, elsewhere.
The young man had fallen on his knees by the bed-side
of the old merchant, but he could only reply to his
admonitions
by kissing his hand and bathing it in tears.
It was early in the morning. The intelligence of Mr.
Tuck's death had just been brought to Mr. Tremlett, who
was greatly affected thereby, although it was an event for
which he was by no means unprepared, for he knew that his
partner had long suffered from a diseased heart, and that his
death must be sudden. But they had been associated in
business
so long, and had learned so well to accomodate
themselves
to each others' whims, leaning on each others' strong
points, and supporting each other in their weak ones, that he
felt as though a part of himself had been torn away, and that
he could not remain long behind thus deprived of his
accustomed
help. And he looked back through the long years of
toil and perplexity which he had spent, of anxiety and
thriftless
hope, which when satisfied brought no satisfaction, and
he was overpowered at the littleness of the profit which had
accrued to him when he struck a hasty balance in his mind
20
and found that his outlay of time and strength, had brought
him so poor a recompense as dollars and cents, that had not
the power of soothing his mind with one consolotary
reflection
.
There lay his gains secured in some vault of ponderous
granite blocks, clamped together with iron bars, and watched
over by a hireling sentinel, as though they were some
terrible
evil whose escape would desolate the world, and not the
bits of precious metal whose presence in the house of misery
and want would diffuse smiles and health and happiness; and
there lay as palpable to his mind, the wasted years of his half
century of responsible existence; as he sccanned their worth
he could find but little among them which seemed at all to
compensate for their cost.
While the old merchant lay indulging himself in these
reflections
,
and his adopted son knelt silently by his bed-side, a
tap was heard at the door, and Jeremiah Jernegan walked in.
Young Tremlett rose hastily from his knees and seated
himself upon the bed-side, and the old man looked
inquisitively
at the intruder, who was about to withdraw without
speaking a word, when Mr. Tremlett called him back.
Sit down, Jeremiah, said Mr. Tremlett; we have no
secrets that you may not know. We have all labored
together
with poor Mr. Tuck, and together we must all weep
for him. Well, he was a sincere man; and I believe
Jeremiah
,
an honest merchant. Do you not think he was?
I never knew him to do a dishonest act, replied Jeremiah,
but far be it from me to judge of any man, but above all
of the dead. Perhaps I was the last person who saw him
alive, but I fear
Fear what? said Mr. Tremlett, raising himself; fear
what, Jeremiah? Do you fear that my partner is not happy
now? that he died without repentance Jeremiah?
No, those are fears that would not become me? said
Jeremiah, but, perhaps I had better not tell what were my
fears.
You must tell, Jeremiah, said Young Tremlett, your
words have excited a curiosity in my father which you must
satisfy, or he will indulge in harrassing doubts, let us know
what it is you were going to say? You need fear nothing
from us, or if you do not care to speak before me I will
retire
.
No, no, replied Jeremiah, I am glad you are here, for
although I came expressely to speak with your father, my
errand could not be completed without seeing you. I was
going to say that I fear I was not the last person who saw
Mr. Tuck alive.
Nothing more likely, said Mr. Tremlett, it could be
easily ascertained from the housekeeper; but it is a matter of
little moment; for myself I wish that I could have seen him
again, but I cannot now bring myself to look upon him. I
shall feel more composed before long.
It matters little to him, now, said Jeremiah, but as I
said before I have fears that I hardly know how to name.
You puzzle me, said Mr. Tremlett, speak out,
without
fear, that I may know what you mean.
I fear, said Jeremiah, gazing around him, that he died
by violence.
By violence! said the old man as his frame shook with
terror, how by violence? were there any marks upon his
person?
No, said Jeremiah; and that is why I am so
fearful
of speaking my thoughts. But I will relate to you my
reasons, and perhaps you will think I am easily alarmed.
But God knows that I would not mistrust a living soul of so
wicked an intent, yet I have seen so much of depravity and
selfishness that I can hardly doubt that anything that is
wicked
may not be true.
Go on, go on, said young Tremlett impatiently.
Yesterday morning, said Jeremiah, I had occasion to
call at Mr. Tuck's house to get a cheek signed, and I found
the old gentleman in his room, very evidently quite ill,
although
he would not acknowledge it. He spoke to me about
dying and I was glad of an opportunity, without seeming to
seek it myself, of talking with him on the subject; but when
I attempted to improve the occasion, he grew impatient, and
as I perceived that my remarks disturbed him, I left him, but
with great uneasiness of mind; for I had a presentiment
that his time was at hand. It so happened that my cash-book
did not balance at night when I made up my accounts, and
I was detained in the office until a very late hour in the
evening
before I discovered the error; so, after I had closed the
door of the counting room, on my way home I again thought
of poor Mr. Tuck, and I determined to call upon him again,
to speak with him once more, if he should be in a mood to
listen to me. It was very dark and a drizzly rain beat in my
face when I stepped up to the front door of his house, and
just as I was going to pull the bell handle, the door opened,
and a person came hastily out wrapped in a cloak. I
supposed
that it must be the physician, and I said, `Doctor.'
`Well?' replied the person; `Is Mr. Tuck better?' I asked;
`Not wemarkable,' replied the doctor; `will it do for me to
see him?' I asked further, for I wished to hear the doctor's
voice again;' `act your own discwetion,' he replied, and a
footstep was heard in the hall at that moment, when the
doctor
muffled his cloak about him and walked rapidly down
the street. I would have followed him, but the house-keeper
came to the door in great alarm, and seeing me requested
me to come in as she had heard somebody in the house. I
questioned her about the doctor, and she said that no doctor
had been there. I told her that I met him at the door upon
which she grew frightened and we went up to Mr. Tuck's
chamber together where we found the poor gentleman dead
in his chair, with some papers in his hand. The person
whom I met at the door I am very certain was the same man
who robbed me of my watch, when we were on our way
to Willow-mead together, he said, turning to young
Tremlett
.
I remember it perfectly well, said John, and I think I
should know the person if I were to see him again. I am
certain that I should recognise him by his voice.
It was by that alone which I knew him; said Jeremiah,
for it was too dark to see his face.
And was not his name Washington Mortimer, or
something
like it? asked John.
G. Washington Mortimer; replied Jeremiah, here is
the very receipt which he gave me for the watch. I have
preserved it ever since, amongst my papers, and this
morning
I found it.
There must be something in this, said Mr. Tremlett,
but I cannot see what. You had better send the oldest of
the two Tucks to me and I will put him on the track to scent
it out, but in the mean time Jeremiah, and you, my son, do
not whisper a word of this to any one.
I freely forgive the man, if it be him who took my
watch, said Jeremiah, but I would be glad to discover him,
nevertheless, for you know John, that Hopely, of whom
I borrowed it, always pretended that he did not believe our
story.
I had forgotten it, said John smiling faintly, but you
need have no alarm about Hopley, for you know he is now
serving out his time in prison, for an offence which no one
doubted his being guilty of.
That is true indeed, replied Jeremiah, but perhaps
it would be some consolation to him to know that we
were not as bad as he thought us, even in his own
degradation
.
Perhaps so, said young Tremlett, but I doubt the
reverse
would be more consoling to him.
Leave me now, said the old gentleman, that I may
compose my thoughts, and prepare myself for the part I must
perform; in the afternoon I must see you both again. And
you, Jeremiah, arrange your accounts as usual, and bring me
your checks to sign for the day's payments.
Jeremiah and John then withdrew and left the old
merchant
to his contemplations.
CHAPTER IV.
THE BOY IS FATHER OF THE MAN.
WHEN a rich man dies, everybody says: is it possible!
as though it were quite an impossible thing for
audacious
Death to grapple with a man of wealth: when a lawyer
dies, all the courts adjourn with complimentary speeches, and
Justice sheathes her terrible left-handed sword and pockets
her scales for a whole day, as though lawyers were so
exceedingly
rare that the loss of one deserved to be wept as a public
calamity; and when a merchant dies, all the ships in the
harbour
hoist their flags half-mast, out of respect to his memory,
as though the business of merchandizing was one of such
exceeding
honor to humanity that the bare accident of being
connected with it conferred such peculiar merit upon a man
that his loss called for a public demonstration of grief. This
last compliment was paid to Mr. Tuck; and while there was
but one pair of eyes that wept a tear at his funeral, there were
hundreds of yards of bunting, of all possible colors and
combinations
,
drooping from the half-mast-heads of innumerable
sea-going crafts at the wharfs, and in the river, and bay,
out of respect to his memory.
The old man had been buried; his name had already passed
out of the memories of those who had but just wept him in
bunting; and the world was moving on to all appearance as
usual, when Mrs. Tuck, the dignified sister-in-law of the
deceased, sat down in her back parlor surrounded and
supported
in her hour of grief by her three children;Those
juveniles that kept her in such a continued shifting between
bliss and misery that it would have puzzled her to strike a
balance of the two accounts and carry the result to the right
side. The whole party were clad in deep mourning, and
if it be permitted to departed spirits to look upon the scenes
that they have just left, a doctrine which finds many believers
even in this unbelieving age, Mr. Tuck must have looked
down upon this little family party with great complacency
when he saw how deeply they mourned his lossin dress.
They had evidently just returned from the house of
mourning
,
and their minds were occupied with serious things. The
oldest brother, who assumed all the prerogatives which
primogeniture
confers in monarchical countries, was the first to
break silence.
So, Miss, said T. Jefferson Tuck to his sister, you will
get married now, considerably quick; and I and your mother
who have had the care of you all your life, will have about
as wide a space in your affections, as we had in your
estimable
uncle's. Confound him!
Now boys, said Mrs. Tuck, who spoke with remarkable
clearness considering that she had just come from the
funeral
of a relative, for whose sake she had clothed herself in
such very deep mourning, remember that Julia is your
sister
I hope we may be reminded of that fact by the young
lady herself, said Fred, interrupting his mother.
And I hope, said the sister, that I may be made to feel
it by some token of brotherly kindness or consideration from
you. But if I was not entitled to it before your uncle's death,
I have no right to claim it now.
O! ah!' ejaculated the younger brother.
Now, Fred, interrupted the mother.
My uncle's will is not my will, continued the sister,
and it can have no influence upon either my affections or
my actions. As to marriage, it is not for me to say what I
may do. She had been weeping bitterly when the taunting
remarks of her brothers caused her to reply to them, and as
she concluded her speech she sank upon an ottoman and again
gave way to her grief.
Pooh! ejaculated her brother Tom contemptously.
O, my! said Fred, and tearing the crape from his hat,
he added, put that to your mourning, as he threw it
towards
her, I don't believe in hypocrisy, and I won't wear
mourning for that old miser.
Don't do that, said Tom, giving his brother a sharp
look, remember you owe something to appearancesto the
family
And to your father's memory, added his mother.
Well, then sew it on again, replied the repentant brother,
I wish I could pay all that I owe as easily.
Now my children, said Mrs. Tuck, all our
expectations
are at an end, we have nothing to hope from your dear
father's brother, and we must live for each other
And on each other, said Fred.
And with each other, said the mother, When Julia
gets married I am sure she will not forget us; and you, boys,
can go on with your business; and your sister will always be
ready and willing, I can promise you, to help you with a
little capital; and we shall live very genteely, and keep the
same company that we always have done. My daughter,
why do you weep so; remember that your uncle was a very
old man, and you should have been prepared for his death.
I was prepared for his death, said the young lady, but
I was not prepared to find that he had regarded me with such
fondness, and I cannot but weep now that I had not known
it while he was living, that I might have been more kind and
attentive to him. Ah me, I fear I shall never know such
another friend.
21
What, with all that money! said Fred, never you fear;
you'll have friends enough.
Now listen to me, said Tom, just mind what I say.
Here is Julia will get something when she's married; but
when she
is
married, we shall have no claims upon her: and
her husband will not care two straws about us. In that view
of the case, of course we are dished. But if Julia will be a
sensible girl, and listen to reason, we'll do better. The
conditions
of the will are, that she is to come into possession of
her uncle's share of the capital of the firm, which comprises
about all he has left, upon the day of her marriage. Now,
observe it is upon the
day of her marriage
, and not the day
after; therefore if she can persuade old Tremlett, who is the
executor, to put her in possession of the money, she can
immediately
make over two thirds of the property to us, which
is our share, and then when she is married in the evening,
she can hand over the balance to her husband, who will not
find fault with the arrangement if he be an honorable man
and if he should grumble at it I will challenge him for
insulting
my sister. But I am afraid that this plan could not be
carried out, for old Tremlett is a precise character, and if
Julia should take it into her head to marry his adopted son,
he would see that the young fellow gets all that belonged to
him.
That's a capital plan, Tom, and Julia might bring it
about if she were disposed to do so.
It is not safe to trust to it, replied the elder brother; but
I will suggest a plan that she might carry out, and which she
must carry out, if she have any regard for her family, and
that is, not to marry any man who will not sign an agreement
to give us two thirds of the estate that she may bring him;
and I can promise her she shall never marry upon any other
conditions.
You ought to have learned by this time, replied their
sister rising from the ottoman and walking proudly across
the room, that the only power which ever compelled me
was the power of kindness and love. I am willing to do
more, perhaps, than either of you would have the heart to
ask, but I will do nothing by force. The debt I owe you is
easily paid, but I shall not even pay that, small as it is, upon
compulsion.
Yes Madam, said her brother Tom, I have not
forgotten
the trick you played us with that pocket book to screen
that young thief upon whom your thoughts are settling just
now; and but for that we should have been as well off as
yourself. When you talk of paying debts my lady, please to
bear in mind that that debt is not omitted in my schedule.
It has got to be paid in full yet. So be careful how you
threaten.
A sudden interruption at this moment prevented one of the
most thrilling scenes that was probably ever described in
history
,
and deprived us of an opportunity of improving our pen
in the service of the Tragic Muse.
The door opened and a servant beckoned to the elder
brother who returned after a moment's absence and requested
the other parties to retire and leave him alone with a friend
with whom he had some particular business.
Well, Jacobs, you are a precious rascal, said the elder
Tuck to his business friend, who entered the back parlor as
soon as the others had left it; your name is Dennis, and no
mistake. If you are not hung after the next Oyer and
Terminer
,
you may thank my benevolent bumps.
Well, if I am hung; replied Mr. Jacobs, for that was the
gentleman's name, I know who'll dance upon nothink about
the same time.
Yes I dare say you do; replied Tom, thieves and
murderers
generally have accomplices.
You may say that without much wisk, said Mr. Jacobs,
when you are an accomplish yourself.
Come sir, said Tom, with an air, I shall have no
insolence
,
and if you open your Jew's mouth in that manner
again, I will have you taken immediately to prison. Do you
know that hand writing sir? Mr. G. Washington Mortimer,
and so saying Mr. T. Jefferson Tuck held a scrap of dirty
brown paper up to his friend's eyes.
Ha! ha! Where did you get that document fwom?
inquired
Mr. Jacobs.
I know where I got it from, said Tom; and where
I got it there's plenty more blacker and ranker. Enough to
hang you half a dozen times.
Mr. Jacobs looked a little abashed, if that term can properly
be applied to a gentleman of his entire self-possession; and in
a somewhat subdued manner asked for an explanation.
The truth is Jacobs, said Tom, you are known; and
officers are in pursuit of you. Remember old fellow that I
cautioned you in the beginning not to make the dose too strong,
all that I hired you to do, was to put him into a sound sleep
so that you might get the will without waking him; and
what have you done? you have committed murder; and you
took the wrong will; and you have exposed yourself so that
you will be discovered. What did you make any reply for
when you were spoken to at the door? Did you not know
that your rascally voice would lead to your detection? I
warned you in time; but I will be generous to you
nevertheless
.
If you will promise me to leave New York this very
night, and never return here again, I will promise not to
inform
against you.
Not without you pay me what you pwomised, said Mr.
Jacobs, I've pwefwomed my part, now you do yours.
Pay you indeed, said Tom, What should I pay you
for; for destroying my brilliant prospects? You took the
very will that I did not want, and the other, which he held
in his hand as if offering it to you, you never touched.
Well, said Mr. Jacobs, I went where you diwected
me to, and I was fweaful if I touched the papers in his hand I
should wake him.
I am not answerable for your bungling work, said Tom
and if you think to include me in your villanies, just bear
in mind that you cannot bring a particle of evidence to
support
your lies; so if you are not very obedient, I will have
you hung as sure as you stand there.
Poo! I am not fwightened at your talk about hanging;
didn't the cowoner's juwy bwing in that he died of the
disease of the heart. You can't hang this child no how,
said Mr. Jacobs, and as for that weceipt about the watch
its only a twansaction, there is nothing to fear about that.
Well, said Tom: your neck is your own, and of course
it's your own business whether you wear a hempen collar or
not. I shall not trouble myself about it.
Pay me the money you pwomised, then; said Mr.
Jacobs
,
I have had enough of you; I thought I was dealing
with a man of honor, give me my money and let me go. I'll
get clear of you as fast as I can.
I shall give you no money, replied Tom, you have
been the means of my losing one fortune, and I shall send
nothing after it.
Vewy good, then I shall not quit the city for the excellent
weason that I havn't got money enough to take me away,
said Mr. Jacobs as he took hold of the door to go.
Take this, said Tom, reaching him a roll of bills, and
let me never see your face again or you will hang for it, I
give you my word and honor.
The gentleman caught hold of the bills eagerly, and having
thrust them into his pocket, he wished Mr. T. Jefferson Tuck
a very good night, and whispered in his ear confidentially
that if he should ever have occasion for his services he might
hear of him at the old place. And without any other
exchange
of compliments the two friends parted.
CHAPTER V.
WILL INTRODUCE FOUR PERSONAGES TO THE READER
WITH ALL OF WHOM HE IS EXPECTED TO BECOME
BETTER
ACQUAINTED BEFORE THE HISTORY IS CLOSED.
ALTHOUGH Mr. Tremlett did not design that his
adopted
son should embark his fortunes in mercantile
speculations
,
yet he was aware of the advantage which a
methodical
mercantile education would confer upon him, let him
embrace
whatever course of life he might; therefore he kept the
young man in his counting-room, and exacted from him a
close attention to his duties. It is true that the duties
assigned
to him were very far removed from drudgery, and were
rather of a confidential nature; yet they required strict
attention
and fidelity, although they allowed him the free use of
a good portion of his time. Perhaps one reason why the old
merchant compelled the attendance of his son in his counting
room was that he might be always near him, for the old
gentleman
was always nervous and anxious whenever he was
half a day without seeing him.
There were certain masters of vessels in the employment
of Tremlett and Tuck, whose families drew half pay during
their absence, and it was one of the duties of young Tremlett
to act as cashier when their monthly allowances were paid
out. Amongst those who were in the habit of calling on the
first of every month for their stated allowances, was a hearty
old man who had once sailed in the service of the house, as
first mate of one of their vessels, and whose son now
commanded
one of their ships, and had left an order for a certain
sum to be paid for the board of his daughter, an only child
who lived with the old sailor and his wife, her mother having
died when she was an infant.
This hearty old sailor had gained the kindly regard of
young Tremlett by his frank and quaint address, and as he
had not called for his last month's allowance, the young man
put a check in his pocket and called upon him to inquire the
cause of his absence. It was the evening of the day on which
Mr. Tuck was buried, and the presence of the young man
must have been more unexpected than at any other time.
The old sailor, whose name was Clearman, lived in a little
court leading out of the Bowery, and John had some
difficulty
in finding the place, although the moment he set his eyes
upon it he knew that old Clearman must live there, every
thing about the house, which was a very humble one, looked
so much like him and seemed to partake of the quaintness and
honesty of his mind; even the little white washed palings in
front of the queerest little garden that could be imagined had a
nautical look; and the steps that led to the front door, with a
bit of tarred rope ornamented at the end with one of those
mysterious
knots called a turk's-head, tied to the bannisters for
no conceivable purpose, at least, none that a lands-man could
conceive, looked more like the companion way of a ship, than
the entrance of a quite stationary house. John knocked at
the door, and it was opened by a young girl who showed him
into a little back parlor where he found the old sailor
smoking
a pipe in an arm chair with one leg bound up in flannel
and resting upon a stool. An attack of the rheumatism had
kept him confined to the house, and this was the sole cause
of his not calling for the monthly allowance. John was
unaffectedly
glad to learn that it was for no more serious cause
and having paid the old man the check and taken his receipt,
he rose to go, when the old sailor and his wife both urged
him with such an earnest but gentle good will to sit down
and take a cup of tea with them that he remained, as much
to his own satisfaction as theirs. There was such an air of
perfect neatness and propriety about the little room that he
could not persuade himself they had not known of his coming
and made preparation for him. The old man immediately
laid aside his pipe, and his wife and the young girl who had
opened the door, spread the table, at which they took their
seats, and the old lady reverently craved a blessing. This
was something new. He had never heard a blessing asked
upon the meat of which he partook at the merchant's table,
neither had he heard one at Mrs. Tuck's, nor at any of the
Louses at which he had visited. It filled his mind with
serious
and melancholy thoughts; he had a dim recollection
that he used to hear grace over his dinners when he was an
inmate of the charitable institution from which Mr. Tremblett
had taken him, and he thought it a strange thing that the poor
should be more grateful to God for their poverty than the rich
for their riches. But the hearty voice of the old sailor, and
the cheerful manners of his wife, and above all the bright
countenance of the young girl who sat opposite to him, and
who ever and anon cast her hazel eyes upon him as she
reached him some of the delicacies with which the table was
covered, instantly put to flight and completely annihilated the
remotest shadow of any melancholy thought that had crossed
his mind. The young girl, or rather the young lady, for such
girls are called ladies in the Bowery, was the daughter of the
sea captain whose monthly allowance John had just paid;
she was apparently seventeen, or if more than that. Time
had dealt daintily with her, as though she were a favorite with
the stern old tyrant who shows favors to none; and yet she
must have been more than seventeen for how could such
charms as hers come to perfection in so short a time. In
truth, she was seventeen and six months, as John ascertained
from her grand father by personal inquiry. It is just the age
of which no young lady ever felt ashamed; and but few young
ladies ever had such endowments to grace it, if ever any had
beside Fidelia Clearman, and although John was fully
sensible
of the slightest of her outward perfections, and gazed upon
them with a kind of entrancement yet her greatest charm in
his eyes was her cheerful and dutiful deportment to her
grand-parents, who seemed quite unconscious of her beauty,
it was so entirely overshadowed by her goodness. She was
neither tall nor short, but of a proper hight, which exactly
harmonized with her fair complexion, her sunny hair, her
hazel eyes, her smiling mouth and her beautiful neck, that
resembled nothing but itself, and therefore cannot be
distinguished
by an epithet, as indeed no genuine beauty properly
can be; and we will not mislead our readers by making
comparisons
which could give no just idea of the original.
When the supper table had been removed and the little
company had drawn around the fire, the old sailor asked
Fidelia
to sing him the little ballad that he had taught her
when she was hardly old enough to lisp.
O, my dear grandfather, said Fidelia blushing, you
must not insist upon my singing; remember that Mr.
Tremlett
will not listen to me with your partial ears.
Well my little daughter, said the old man I will not
say you must if you say you musn't; but that's no excuse for
not singing; I larn't you the song, and I want you to sing it
to my visitor; but if so be that you won't, I must sing it
myself
.
And the old man chuckled his fair grand-daughter under
the chin, and his old broad face and his two glistening black
eyes seemed all lighted up and alive with good humor.
It's a ballad you see, he said turning to his visitor and
taking his pipe from his mouth, which I larn't from a young
lady which was a passenger with me, on a v'yage from City
Point to London, and arter that to Archangel, when I was
second
mate of the ship Sukey, commanded by captain Josh
22
Davis, and belonging to the firm of Brumstead and Bishop
when your father was clark with them, before my son, this
little girl's father, was born. This young lady was going to
jine her sweet-heart, which was a clark in a ship chandlery
store in Wapping; a store which I knowed as well as I
knowed your father's store in South street; and she used to
sit on deck with me through my whole watch, whenever it
was a pleasant night and I had the first trick, and sing
ballads
to me; and it was she that larn't the ballad to me and I
larn't it to my grand-daughter and now I want she should
sing it for you, for I never saw two young creatures look
more alike than she and the young lady. If I hadn't been
hitched on to the old woman that's sitting there I railly
believe
that I should have made a match with that young
woman, for I saw enough to convince me she liked me.
Yes, well, it would have saved me a wonderful deal of
trouble if you had, said the old lady, but she wasn't such
a simpleton as I was. And then the old lady laughed; and
the old sailor laughed more heartily than ever, and his great
brown under lip, and his double chin, as they shook and
trembled with mirth seemed the very incarnations of
pleasantry
and good humor; and the young lady smiled from sheer
sympathy and displayed ravishing glimpses of her pearly teeth
which almost deprived their young guest of his senses.
After hearing such an account of the ballad, said John,
I cannot think of leaving without hearing it, and if Miss
Clearman will not sing it her grandfather must.
Fidelia blushed again, and said it was a poor trifle, but if it
would give any pleasure to her grandfather she could not
refuse to sing it, although she knew that Mr. Tremlett would
never ask her to sing it a second time. And then she drew a
guitar case from underneath an old mahogany bureau which
stood in the little room, and after she had tuned her instrument
she accompanied herself to the following words, while her
grandfather marked time with the bowl of his tobacco pipe,
and John listened to her bewitching voice with such intensity
of emotion that he quite forgot that he was gazing upon her.
We regret our inability to furnish the readers of this history
with the air to which the words were warbled, but we have
not been able to discover that it was ever put upon paper.
ADRA.
Adra left her father's door;
Wrong she never did before,
Long he wept and murmured sore;
But he never saw his daughter more.
Alph was dying far away,
On his fevered bed he lay;
Alph, her lover, once so gay,
Sick to death, and far away.
Who would hear his feeble sighs?
Stranger ears would slight his cries,
Hireling hands would close his eyes
Slaves perform his obsequies.
Alph has oped his eyes with dread,
Morning's dream of home has fled;
Dreaming still, or is he dead!
Adra stands beside his bed.
Like a star that sheds its light,
Thro' a long and dismal night;
Like the blush of morning bright,
Bringing ever new delight.
Morn and midnight, watching still
Noon and eve, thro' heat and chill,
Guided by his changing will,
Gentle Adra watches still.
Alph has left his fevered bed
Adra fills it in his stead,
Health upon his cheek is spread,
Now he watches o'er her head.
Racked with fevers heat and pain
Wild delirium with its train,
Watching, prayers, and tears are vain,
Adra never rose again.
As soon as the young lady had ceased, her grandfather
kissed her fair forehead, and her young auditor felt an
irrepressible
desire to manifest his satisfaction in the same
manner
;
but his thoughts were suddenly put to flight by a
hollow
sepulchral voice which exclaimed in most unearthly
tones, let us pray! John involuntarily jumped upon his
feet at this strange sound and looked behind him, but saw
nobody; and looking at the old sailor for an explanation, he
perceived the old man's face and his double chin shaking
with laughter and his glistening eyes all festooned round with
smiles.
What was it? inquired the astonished youth.
It's only Poll; replied the old woman, there she is.
And looking in the direction of her finger he discovered a
venerable looking fowl dressed in a coat of respectable drab
colored feathers, with a rather unbecoming cap of crimson
plumage sitting with great gravity and composedness of
features
on top of an old mahogany bureau.
What a remarkable creature, said John.
Yes, yes, replied the old man, poll is older than you
and I put together; and I believe she knows as much too.
My father brought that bird from Holland more than fifty-five
year ago, and the marchant which he got it of in Amsterdam
which was his consignee, told him that he had owned her
more than thirty years.
Such an undoubted specimen of antiquity deserved a close
inspection, and after John had examined her ladyship, he had
not the least doubt of her remote birth, for unlike many of
her sex she took not the slightest pains to disguise her age,
but on the contrary seemed to take considerable pride in her
venerable appearance. How it was possible to laugh, or even
smile, in the presence of such a grave and sedate personage,
was a wonder, but the old man's laughter appeared to come
and go of its own accord, neither giving him much thought
or disturbance, although it kept him well and hearty, and
sustained the brightness of his old black eyes, and the full
volume of his heavy sides and his double chin.
Poll always reminds us, said the old lady, when it's
time for prayers, let who will be here.
I hope I do not interrupt you, said John, but yet
showed
no signs of going.
O, no, said Fidelia looking up to her grandmother,
perhaps Mr. Tremlett will not refuse to join in our evening
service.
It would give me great pleasure; he replied, and
thereupon
the young lady drew out a little stand with a Bible
upon
it, and having unclasped the holy book she read a chapter
with such sweetness and propriety of emphasis that John
wondered why he had never found such beauty in God's
Word before. When the chapter had been read, the
venerable
old bird again exclaimed let us pray and they all
knelt down, except the old man, who was disabled by his
rheumatic leg, while the old lady repeated in devout and
measured tones the evening prayer from the prayer book, and
at the close their venerable feathered companion pronounced
a solemn. Amen.
John could not with propriety prolong his visit, so he bade
good night to his new friends, and hurried home to his father
whom he found alarmed and uneasy at his absence. He
hesitated to say how he had spent the evening, and yet he
blushed at the thought of doing so, he could not tell
exactly
why, for assuredly he had done nothing amiss; but the
old merchant did not perceive his embarrassment, or he did
not notice it if he did, and the young man made some
observation
which soon changed the subject.
I cannot discover, said Mr. Tremlett, that there was
any foundation for Jeremiah's fears in regard to the sudden
death of my partner; the doctors all agree that it was caused
by a disease of his heart, and as there were no signs of
violence
upon his person, I doubt not such was the fact. The
man whom he met at the door had probably get into the
house by means of false keys, and being alarmed by
Jeremiah's
appearance had no time to carry anything off. But I
am puzzled at one thing, the will that was found in Mr.
Tuck's hand was not the last one he made, as I have learned
of his lawyer; but he is of opinion that the poor man
afterwards
changed his mind and destroyed it; which is not
unlikely
.
The will which has been found places me in a
position
towards his niece which I do not like. I know that her
uncle would have bequeathed to me his entire interest in our
firm if I had not, urged him not to do so. He used to say that
our property had been acquired by our joint exertions and
therefore, when either of us died, the survivor should become
possessed of the whole, but I would not, for your sake, consent
to such an arrangement; and he has left it to my discretion
either to give the young lady her portion of the estate on the
day of her marriage, or upon the settlement of the estate
at my own death; he was doubtless influenced in doing this
by the supposition that you would marry his niece, and that
then the entire property would be united in the possession of
his own representative and mineseemingly the rightful
hands into which it should fall. And this to me would be
the disposition of it most in conformity with my own wishes,
for although I do not think that I have an inordinate love of
wealth, yet I cannot but feel a wish that our estate, which I
have labored so long to help to accumulate, should remain
entire after I am gone, and be enjoyed by those for whom I
feel a regard.
Mr. Tremlett paused a moment, but the young man made
no reply, for in truth he had not clearly understood all that
the old gentleman had been saying, his thoughts being full of
the antiquated old bird, and the beautiful young girl in whose
company he had spent the evening, and a great estate
appeared
so trifling an affair when compared with either, that he
could not entirely divert his thoughts from them.
But I shall cause the firm to he closed immediately,
resumed
Mr. Tremlett, and when I have ascertained the
amount due to Mr. Tuck, I shall place it at the disposal of
Julia lest she should think that I wished to control her will.
John commended his father's generosity, and the old
gentleman
smiled at his seeming innocence.
Julia is a spirited girl and I have loved her ever since the
day when she exposed her brothers, by restoring her uncle's
pocket-book, and I love her better now because she loves you.
It is a matter of great mortification to me, my son, that in so
important a transaction as marriage I am incompetent to give
you any advice. But I hope that advice will not be needed
by you and Julia; you will no doubt be happy in each other,
yet there is one thing that an old gentleman used to tell me
when I was of your age which I think you will do well bear in
mind. Why don't you get married my boy? he used to
say to me, `because,' I would reply, `I don't know how to
choose a wife, and I am afraid of getting a bad one,' `poo,
poo,' he would say, `any wife is good enough, if her mother
don't live with you, but the best wife will not be good enough
if she should.' Now I think, from what I have seen of Mrs.
Tuck that she will not add much to your happiness when
you are married if she should live with you.
John thanked his father tenderly for his hint, and promised
to bear it in mind, and they bade each other good night, and
he was very soon in the pleasant land of dreams where he was
exceedingly amused by an appearance which he could not
look upon long enough to distinguish whether it were a very
old bird or a very young lady, and strange noises, sometimes
like the chaunting of angels, and sometimes like the hoarse
tones of an old friar calling to prayer, haunted his pillow
until
daylight.
CHAPTER VI.
CONTAINS REVELATIONS OF GREAT DELICACY.
THE firm of Tremlett & Tuck being composed of two
very sedate old bachelors they imparted a conservative
and orderly character to all the clerks in their service, which
rendered them noticeable for their uniformity and precision
of habits, surrounded as they were, on every side, by
changelings
and all manner of hurry-skurry people. The reader
will not be surprised, therefore to find that Mr. Bates still acted
as their head book-keeper, and that Jeremiah had been
gradually
promoted, step by step, and not in a disorderly and
hurried
manner, until he occupied the responsible post of cashier
of the house. Several of the younger clerks had in the mean
time, however, entered into business, and compromised with
their creditors some half a dozen times; and some of them had
come back to fill their old stations after ruining their friends
and involving themselves in debt to a very large amount.
But ups and downs belong more particularly to the
mercantile
profession than to any other, and such changes do not
break many hearts, because they are looked upon as matters
of course.
Mr. Bates' salary was as fixed as his habits, but as it had
no particular influence on natural causes, his family and his
wants had increased to an alarming extent in spite of the
stationary nature of the income that was to supply them; and
Mrs. Bates, who was not wanting in shrewdness and industry,
had consented to receive a few boarders into her family,
professedly
for the sake of society, but in truth to help educate
the children. This was a praiseworthy and excellent motive
but some people have a horror of being thought useful and
honest, perhaps from modesty, let us think so at least, as it
is best always to put the fairest construction upon the motives
of others, that they will allow. As Mr. Bates was a good
carver and Mrs. Bates had a peculiar faculty in giving a
genteel
air to her table, they gave great satisfaction to their
boarders
,
which is a fact of sufficiently rare occurrence to entitle
it to a special notice, for it is well known that landladies and
their boarders always make it a point to be dissatisfied with
each other.
Jeremiah had gone to board with Mrs. Bates, and soon after
he had taken possession of his room, Huldah Hogshart, who
had come to New York to learn the art of making ladies
dresses
with a fashionable mantua-maker in Broadway, at the
recommendation of Mr. Tremlett, also took board with Mrs.
Bates; whereupon Jeremiah, resolved upon leaving the house
lest people should make scandalous remarks about the young
lady and himself, but as he made known his scruples to Mrs.
Bates she, after much debate, succeeded in convincing him
that he was exceedingly prudish; and by assuring him that it
would hurt the credit of her house if it were known that
her husband's intimate friend had left it, he consented to
remain
.
But we wish the reader to understand that he
conducted
htmself in the most exemplary manner towards her,
although he felt a growing kindness for her which at times
almost overmastered his discretion. Miss Hogshart was by
no means so strict a disciplinarian as her father, and she was
guilty of some wide departures from the rules of her sect
which would have given the conscientious farmer much
concern
of mind if he had witnessed them. For instance, she
had twice accompanied Jeremiah to a presbyterian meeting,
23
and once she had even entered the precincts of a public garden
where there was much profane music elaborated by fiddles
and cornets-a-piston; and she had looked with a manifest
liking upon a gentleman and lady, decorated with a wicked
profusion of spangles and quite an unnecessary economy of
clothing, who performed certain mysterious and highly
figurative
evolutions, the object of which she did not fully
comprehend
;
but they were called in the bills a `
grand pas de
deux
.' She moreover showed a decided fondness for
decorating
her person with very bright colors, but Jeremiah thought
she had never looked so lovely as when he first saw her, clad
in her blue striped long-short preparing supper over a
cheerful
hickory fire. But she was exceedingly neat in her person,
healthy and good-natured, and so fond of Jeremiah that he
could not but love her with sincerity and earnestness,
although
he had never told her so in direct words; and he was
exceedingly puzzled to know how to get about it. It was a
subject on which he could not well ask advice of any of his
acquaintance, and as he never read novels wherein he might
have found a great variety of examples of declaring love, he
was in great perplexity. He had several times been on the
point of asking John, who still continued his friend and
confidant
,
to assist him with a suggestion, but shame had kept
him silent. And it so chanced that an opportunity was
afforded
him, the day after the funeral of Mr. Tuck, of
speaking
to young Tremlett on the subject, when he found that his
young friend was as ignorant of all necessary forms as
himself
.
The clerks had all left the counting room and Jeremiah
and John were sitting alone at their desks. Jeremiah,
said John, it is a long time since you and I have spoken a
word in private, but I hope that hereafter we shall not be so
much apart.
I hope not, replied Jeremiah, who perceived that his
young friend had something to communicate to him, and so
he shut up his cash-book and sat down by his side in the now
vacant seat of poor Mr. Tuck.
I suppose Jeremiah, you think that I am very happy?
Indeed, replied he, I rather hoped than thought so;
for although I cannot conceive that you should be otherwise,
I know very well that there is much wretchedness in the
world where its existence is never suspected. But what can
cause your unhappiness? I cannot dream of a real cause.
You know Jeremiah, it has been always talked of as a
matter of course that I should marry Julia Tuck; how it
happened I scarcely know; but we have been on intimate
terms a good while, and the young lady loves me better than I
wish she did; I do not speak vainly you know, Jeremiah,
because
I would it were not so; but I cannot be blind to the
truth. But, Jeremiah, I tell you sincerely and truly, I never
told her that I loved her, neither did I ever speak a word to
her about marriage; and yet she thinks that I intend to marry
her, and so do her friends. But I cannot; and it is this
which makes me unhappy, for I do not know in what
manner
I can extricate myself, without giving pain to her and
others whom I do love and respect. I cannot deceive her
longer, or rather allow her to deceive herself, and I dread a
disclosure of my real feelings not more for her sake than my
father's, for last night he told me that he expected, and
wished
that I should marry her that the entire estate of the firm
might be kept in my possession.
Jeremiah was astonished at this disclosure for he had
supposed
that John was engaged and sincerely attached to Miss
Tuck, as indeed all his friends believed.
What must I do, Jeremiah? How can I relieve myself?
Really indeed, replied Jeremiah, I cannot advise you;
but if it were my case I think I would do nothing. If you
have never told the young lady that you loved her, I do not
see that she has any right to claim your attentions; or that
her friends can with decency urge you to marry her.
It is in this manner that I reason with myself, said John
but as soon as I meet her, or any of her friends, I feel at
once as though I were in bonds. Perhaps the fault is mine
for having allowed the suspicion of my love for her to grow
into a certainty in the minds of others, by not contradicting
it pointedly, either by words or actions. But her having
become
suddenly rich by the death of her uncle, will, in some
measure, relieve me, as no one could accuse me of base
motives
if I were to leave her now; for my father has assured
me that he intends to put her in immediate possession of her
uncle's portion of the estate, thinking that I shall very shortly
be entitled to it as her husband. Now if I tell him that I can
never marry her, he may not do it, but be governed by the
strict letter of the will; and if I do not, he may justly
reproach
me with dissimulation. Tell me Jeremiah what I
must do to do right, and do not consider what may be politic
or prudent. I have thought so much on the subject that I
hardly know what would be right.
That indeed, is a question more easily answered, replied
Jeremiah, the right and honest course would be to confess
the true state of your feelings to your father, and let the young
lady discover them herself from your actions; for if you were
to confess to her she might laugh at you for your
presumption
.
Thank you, thank you, Jeremiah, exclaimed the young
man in an ecstacy, seizing the hand of his adviser and
shaking
it heartily, I will do it; it is the only way, and although
I may cause some tears to be shed it is the only way to save
greater griefs bye and bye.
And now, said Jeremiah, since you have made me
your confidant, I will make bold to ask your advice in a
similar
business, although for very different reasons. If, for
instance
,
he continued after moving his lips several times
without uttering any distinct words, if, for instance, now,
you were going to tell a young lady that you did love her,
how would you do it?
Indeed I don't exactly know what course I should take,
replied John, who for the first time in his life thought to
himself
how such a communication could be made; but I have
no doubt that when any real affection is felt, the declaration
would come out spontaneously.
One would think so, said Jeremiah, but to have the
thing positively understood, it strikes me that some particular
form of words should be used.
But as you meet with no difficulty in expressing yourself
on other subjects I do not see why you should on this, said
John; what can be easier; you, for instance are a young
lady, and I wish to tell you that I love you; I draw my chair
close to yours in this manner, suiting the action to the word
as he spoke, and taking her by the hand, provided she does
not draw it away, say, `My dear Miss Davis,' or, `my
beautiful
Arabella, I love you very dearly and I feel that my
existence
will be a blank unless you share it with me, can you
love and will you love me?' of course the young lady then
says `yes' or, `no,' and your existence becomes a
good-for-nothing
blank, or like a blank filled up, of immense value as
the case may be.
That's very genteelly done, and I am very much obliged
to you; but I should like very much to know what effect
such an address may have produced.
Try it, Jeremiah, said John, try it.
Perhaps I may, replied Jeremiah.
It now being dark, Jeremiah locked up his books in the
iron safe, and the two friends, having bidden each other good
night, they went to their homes, resolved to profit by each
other's counsel, and we shall see in due time how they
proceeded
.
CHAPTER VII.
JEREMIAH MAKES A DECLARATION OF LOVE WITHOUT
BEING
ACCEPTED, AND AFTERWARDS MEETS WITH AN OLD
ACQUAINTANCE.
AS soon as Jeremiah had swallowed his tea he hastened
up to his room, and in passing through the hall he saw
the shawl and bonnet of Huldah Hogshart lying upon the
bannister, and an uncontrolable fit of lovingness coming over
him at the sight of them, he took them in his arms and
stealthily
bore them off to his chamber, and having turned the
key inside, he took a pillow from his bed and dressed it up in
the habiliments of his mistress, and then drew his chair to the
side of the one on which he had placed it, with an air of the
most insinuating and seductive
nonchalance;
and putting his
arm in a very familiar and easy manner round the neck of his
imaginary mistress, he crossed his legs and looked round the
room very much in the style of a theatrical performer. He
was quite astonished at his own boldness, and patted the
young lady under her imaginary chin, and pressed her waist
with a freedom quite unbecoming; and then he rose from his
seat and falling upon one knee declared his love in the most
impassioned terms conceivable, and vowed that unless she
would accept him as a lover, life would lose all its attractions
and the consequences to himself would be too serious to speak
of. Then he seated himself again by her side, and in a more
subdued and respectful manner, related in a plain and
business
like address the story of his affections, and reasoned with
her upon the advantages which a union would be likely to
confer upon them, throwing in a careless and unpremeditated
word about the delight of educating young souls for eternity,
and the advantage of having one's pillow smoothed in
sickness
by a companion and friend through evil report and good
report. But he was suddenly startled by a slight noise as
though somebody was breathing through the key hole of his
door, and he discovered that he had been so imprudent as to
go through with his amorous performances directly in the
range of it so that anybody, and everybody, might have
looked
at him if they had been disposed to do so; and the
supposition
that somebody had been doing so was the most
reasonable thing in the world, for he listened with suspended
breath, and was almost certain that he heard a light footstep
retreating from his door. The thought of having been seen
in his pantomimic performances quite overcame him, and he
blushed to the very tips of his fingers. He undressed the
pillow
,
and while in the act of folding up the shawl, a smart tap
at the door made his blood tingle all over his body. But he
threw the bonnet and shawl hastily into his clothes-press and
opened the door.
Good evening Mr. Jernegan, said Mrs. Bates as she
pushed herself into his chamber, where is your friend, Mr.
Jernegan?
My friend, said Jeremiah, with the guiltiest look that
ever an innocent man wore, what friend do you mean, Mrs.
Bates?
O, yes; replied Mrs. Bates, Mr. Pious, I understand
perfectly. Where is she? And without further ceremony
she looked under Jeremiah's bed and was evidently astonished
at finding nobody there.
I shall not allow such liberties in my room, said
Jeremiah
spiritedly; what can you mean, Mrs. Bates?
Don't ask me for a meaning, sir, replied the lady in a
tone of sarcasm, but please explain yourself, sir, for
introducing
a female person into your room, sir, without my
permision
,
sir, in my house, sir.
There has been no person in my room, either male or
female
,
to my knowledge, replied Jeremiah calmly, except
myself.
Very well, sir, very well, sir, replied the lady; I have
got eyes, sir, yes sir, I have got eyes, and ears too. Please
remember
that, sir;
I shall remember it, madam, without any prompting,
replied Jeremiah, and he was going to add that he was
aware that the lady was the possessor of a tongue as well as
eyes and ears, but it was not in his nature to say an unkind
word to anybody; so he checked himself, and again asked
Mrs. Bates to explain her conduct. But as the lady could
not consistently make an explanation, and as Jeremiah did
not in reality need one, he did not insist upon it, and the lady
withdrew herself in great confusion, which she endeavored to
hide by working herself into a great passion. As soon as she
was gone, Jeremiah sat down to consider how he might best
free himself from his difficulty; but as there was no possible
way of doing it without making a confession that he could
not persuade himself to do, he determined to deliver himself
into the hands of Fate, and meet events as they might
transpire
in the best way he could.
But a new difficulty soon presented itself, which, strangely
enough, he had not anticipated. On going below he found
the whole house in a state of great excitement about Miss
Hogshart's shawl, and the young lady herself in tears.
Somebody
had entered the hall while the boarders were at supper
and stolen it and her hat, although the thief had taken
nothing
else, notwithstanding there were a number of coats
hanging upon the hall stand. This was the report.
Jeremiah
blushed with shame, for he at once made up his mind
not to confess his guilt. And yet he hesitated upon second
thoughts, for he had to acknowledge to himself that it would
be a piece of gross dissimulation, a thing that he abhorred.
Poor Jeremiah! he had never before stood battling between
good and evil. He was in a sad perplexity, but as he could
not see that any harm could come of the business, except to
himself, he at last resolved to make a present of just such
another hat and shawl to Miss Hogshart, and keep his own
folly to himself.
Let not the reader suppose that we would justify the
conduct
of Jeremiah: No. He acted a lie, and he must abide by
its consequences; what they may be, we shall ascertain bye and
bye. But let the reader bear in mind, although we would not
insinuate that he would be guilty of such a thing himself,
that a lie to screen one from ridicule is as bad as a lie to gain
anything else, even so poor a thing as money.
Jeremiah felt more guilty and shame-faced than he had ever
before felt in his life, when Huldah Hogshart thanked him
for his goodness, and extolled his generosity in the presence
of all the boarders. It is true that the shawl she had lost
could not be replaced, as Jeremiah discovered; it was of a
much finer quality and a richer pattern than any that could
be found in Broadway. How so modest a young lady as Miss
Hogshart had happened to possess a shawl of such rare
beauty, he had too much delicacy, of course, to inquire, but it
puzzled him when he thought of it, for he had never seen
her wear it before that evening.
On entering the parlor, John found his father watching
anxiously for his return, and he resolved at once to make a
full confession of the true state of his feelings in regard to
Julia Tuck; but the old gentleman immediately began to talk
about his property, and to give directions about the
investment
of certain sums; and at the close of every period, just
as the young man was on the point of divulging his secret,
he would begin anew, and so the evening wore away until
it was time for bed, when just as an opportunity offered by a
24
lull in the old gentleman's conversation, they were startled by
a knock at the door, and directly a stout gentleman, with
glossy hair and a red face, wearing the clothes of a gentleman
but without the smallest air of one, made his appearance, and
announced himself as a police officer. His business was to
inform Mr. Tremlett that he had arrested a person who bore
a strong resemblanceto Mr. G. Washington Mortimer, the
gentleman
whom Jeremiah suspected of breaking into Mr. Tuck's
house on the night of the poor man's death. John was very
much excited at this intelligence and offered to go
immediately
in search of Tom Tuck, and with him and Jeremiah, go to
the house of detention to satisfy themselves whether the
prisoner were the real culprit.
Mr. Tremlett at first objected to the young man's
proposition
,
but at last consented, and he left the house in company
with the officer and proceeded to Mrs. Tuck's, where they
found Tom, but he refused to join them, lest he should be
tempted to do some violence to the villain. They found
Jeremiah in bed, but he immediately dressed himself and
went with them to the prison, although he declared that in
his heart he hoped it was not the right man, as he would be
extremely sorry to get the poor fellow into trouble. The
police officer said he had no doubt of it, and told Jeremiah
he was a regular wag. For which Jeremiah reproved him
and told him he made no pretensions that way.
On entering the lock-up-house, they found the prisoner
stretched at full length upon a wooden bench, with his glazed
cap for a pillow, snoring very loud and apparently enjoying a
sweet and dreamless sleep.
My, my! said Jeremiah, looking upon the sleeper, that
cannot be the person.
What for? said the officer.
Surely, he could never sleep so soundly, if he had ever
injured anybody, replied Jeremiah.
O, no, of course not; particularly after such a tramp as I
gave him yesterday and to day, said the police officer, who
thought that Jeremiah was giving vent to his waggishness.
But the proof of the pudding isn't in looking at it. Come,
get up, and let's see the color of your eyes; and without
farther ceremony he kicked over the bench and put a sudden
stop to the gentleman's snoring.
Stop of that! exclaimed the suddenly awakened
gentleman
,
don't you know better nor to commit such an
outwage
on a gentleman confined on suspicion. If you do
something of that sort again I'll make you wepent of it,
mister
.
See 'f I don't. I know my wights as well as another
individual.
What do you think of him, gentlemen? asked the officer
is he the man?
No doubt of it, replied Jeremiah, let us go, I do not
like this place.
Stop, stop, said his companion, I should like to inquire
after his lady. I wonder if she is as particular as ever about
her eggs.
Don't, said Jeremiah, the man has feelings, and I
would no more inflict a wound upon his mind than I would
upon his body. Let us go. I am satisfied.
Well, gentlemen, you'll be on hand in the morning? We
shall want your testimony, and I shall want the reward you
know. And so they parted.
The reward! thought Jeremiah as he walked through the
now deserted streets, after he parted with John. The reward!
O, is there no way for that poor man to live, but he must trade
on the crimes and sufferings of his fellow-creatures. The
reward! It is by such means then, that he buys those fine
clothes, and perhaps his wife and daughters flaunt through
the streets, and parade their silks and gew-gaws up and down
the aisles of churches, while he is prowling about in dens of
vice, and among the haunts of wretchedness and misery to
seize upon some poor wretch on whose head the law has set
a price. And he claims a reward! Perhaps this poor man
whom he has now seized was taken from the arms of an
innocent
wife, or torn from shrieking children, who have never
dreamed of their father's crimes. And the Law provides no
officers for the apprehension of wrong-doers, but private
citizens
must offer rewards to tempt men to act like bloodhounds
and hunt their fellow beings for the sake of gain. Ah!
CHAPTER V.
REVEALS CERTAIN FACTS ESSENTIAL TO A PROPER
UNDERSTANDING
OF THIS HISTORY.
SO, Jacobs, you have allowed yourself to be caught, said
the elder Tuck to an individual in the city prison.
Well, you'll be hung, as I always predicted. But don't
lay the blame upon me; I cautioned you in time.
Yes, a pwecious scwape you've bwought me into. But I
can pwomise you now, as I did before, I won't suffer alone,
you may put all your anxious fears to west on that gwound,
replied the person addressed.
Don't be insolent, Jacobs, replied his accomplished
visitor
,
or I'll leave you without another word.
Go, go, said Mr. Jacobs, coolly, and I'll take pwecious
good care you'll soon be bwought back again.
And what is the nature of the complaint for which you
are arrested? Is it murder, or house-breaking? or some of your
low Chatham-square practices?
It's not much, something about a watch, and a suspicion
of breaking into your uncle's house, said Mr. Jacobs, and
those two fellows are the only witnesses; but if they are not
got out of the way I'll blow you.
No threats you rascal. You don't deserve my
commiseration
but you know I can't refuse to do a good turn even to
a fellow like you. I will take care that they do not appear
against you. But be discreet and keep your mouth shut, or
to the gallows you go.
I'll do my part; but I can't be left here without no
amusement. Send me a box of pwincipes and the morning
papers; and all the new novels as fast as ever they're published,
and a pwartwidge, and a charlotte wusse.
So, you read novels do you, you rascal? said Mr. Tuck,
well, that accounts for some of your villanies. I'll see that
you get some suitable books. And he turned to go.
Good morning to you, said Mr. Jacobs, making a
horrible
face at him as soon as his back was turned, and don't
forget to make my wespects to Fwed.
As Tom Tuck left the prison door, he was joined by his
brother, who had just lighted his third cigar.
Is it him? inquired Fred.
Yes, replied Tom, jerking out the word as though he
meant it should strike with force, as it did; for his brother
started and turned pale at the sound of it.
And what did he say? said Fred taking his brother's
arm and turning down a bye street.
He told me to give his respects to you, said Tom.
Ah, he's very good. Was that all?
No, replied his brother.
And what's to be done?
That must be determined, replied Tom, But one thing
must be done, or we are
un
done. Jack Tremlett, and that
croaking Jeremiah must be got out of the way before
to-morrow
,
for then he will be examined.
Can't you persuade John to run away with Julia?
suggested
Fred.
No, no, he has not much inclination for that; and if he
had, there's no need. Something must be done, and quickly
done too; I'll study it out to-day. But it's time now to
be in Wall Street. We must look after that large note to
day.
And then the two brother's walked hastily down
Broadway
,
until they reached Wall street, when they followed the
tide of brokers, bank-clerks, cashiers, secretaries of insurance
companies, and a horde of mongrel money changers, attornies
and note-shavers who kept disappearing here and there, some
diving down into deep and dingy cellars and others mounting
tall stair-cases into pigeon-holes of offices in third and fourth
stories, until they reached their own proper office, when they
too popped down into a granite basement, and the living stream
continued to pour on above their heads. The office of the
Brothers Tuck would not, to the uninitiated, convey any very
magnificent ideas of business, it being a little cooped up
place with no other furniture than two painted desks, three
old arm chairs, a few steel pens, a glass inkstand, some loose
bank checks, and a profusion of cobwebs, and a small boy
with a very dirty shirt collar ostentatiously turned over his
jacket, as though dirty linen were a very pleasant thing to
feast one's eyes upon. But the denizens of Wall street care
very little for office furniture; the chief business of that street
being transacted on the side walks, and thousands, millions
even, of dollars changing hands without any such formal
records being made as the smallest transactions in a
merchant's
counting room require.
The brothers Tuck understood perfectly well the importance
of appearances, and they neglected not the smallest matter
which would have an effect upon their credit. They never
spoke of their losses, but always contrived to publish their
gains; and perhaps it would not be a very gross venture to
assert that they sometimes exaggerated them. Their sole
capital when they commenced business was their relationship
to Mr. Tuck, upon which they had acquired a very
extensive
credit, and entered into speculations, the particulars of
which it is not necessary at this time to notice. The brothers
had scarcely entered their office when they were visited by
young Tremlett, who called to congratulate them upon the
arrest of Mr. G. Washington Mortimer, for by that name alone
he knew their friend Jacobs, and to inquire if their sister
would remain at home during the morning, as his father had
commissioned him to inform her that her uncle's portion of
the estate of Tremlett and Tuck should be placed at her
command
as soon as a division of the property could be made.
The brothers were in raptures at this last piece of
information
,
as they affected to be with the first, and as soon as the
young man had left their office, for the first time, perhaps, in
their lives, they embraced each other, and seemed entirely
overcome
with the most delightful anticipations. Fred
immediately
lighted a cigar, but Tom, who abominated tobacco,
sat down at his desk and began to foot up the columns of his
check-book, and both began to form enchanting tableaux
after
their own manners, out of the materials which the
communication
of young Tremlett had furnished; for they looked
upon the property of their sister as their own, feeling very
certain that if she would not yield it to them by gentle means,
that, by their mother's aid, they could force it from her; and
in the space of five minutes Tom had placed himself at the
head of half a dozen moneyed institutions, as it was the
fashion
in those days to call moneyless corporations; and Fred
had read through scores of new novels, and smoked cigars
enough to stock the shop of a Broadway tobacconist.
But we will leave them to their pleasant occupation, and
follow young Tremlett on his mission to their sister. He
was fully determined to inform her, in some manner, that she
would not misunderstand, that their close intimacy must
cease, and that thence forward she must regard him only as
a friend. But when he entered the parlor of her mother's
house, he found her in tears; weeping as he believed for the
loss of her uncle, and his tender nature would not allow him
to add to her grief. Therefore, he saluted her with his
accustomed
gentleness and familiarity of manner, and his kind
words and cheerful smile were the sweetest consolation that
could have been offered to her wounded feelings; for it was
not her uncle's death that caused her tears, but the reproaches
of her mother who had again been telling her that she threw
away her love upon a man who showed none for her in
return
.
Mrs. Tuck was one of those tender mothers who are
always
seeking for an opportunity to make their children
unhappy
out of pure love; and since she had discovered that
she could at any time throw her daughter into hysterics by
barely hinting that John Tremlett was indifferent to her, she
rarely allowed a day to pass by without causing her to shed
a flood of tears at least; and she had been unusually
successful
this morning, the young lady having wept very bitterly
and being just on the point of convulsions when the subject
of her grief made his appearance. But at the sound of his
voice, her sobs were hushed, and one glance at his face dried
up the fountain of her tears. How could she indulge in grief
when he was by; the first and sole object of her young
affections
,
who had for more than ten years held entire control in
her thoughts, whether sleeping or waking, until he seemed
like a part of her own being; and every tear that she had
shed for him, and every harsh word she had endured from
her mother and brothers for his sake, had but made him dearer
to her. Her love for him had been of such long growth,
beginning
in her childhood and increasing in intensity as her
person matured, that it had become to her a thing of course,
and she never dreamed that it was not ardently returned by
him, although to other eyes his attentions seemed to be rather
prompted by amiable feelings than love. He was too
respectful
for a lover, too even in his temper, too easily satisfied, too
good-natured in her presence, and too content when absent.
But these things she could not see. She only saw his worth,
and knowing her own regard for him, she could not see why
he should not love her as she did him; and when her mother
told her that he did not, she attributed her mother's doubts to
family pride; she would not believe that, which to suspect,
would alone have killed her.
25
John had the most tender regard for her feelings, and his
respectful consideration was construed by her as a return for
the passionate fondness which she took no pains to conceal.
He was possessed of all the outward graces of person
which create a kindly and loving sympathy even before the
graces of the mind, which alone beget love, are known, and
these were heightened because he appeared entirely
unconscious
of them himself; and yet he possessed that air of ease
and quiet unconcern so peculiar to those who have an
instinctive
feeling that they will appear to advantage and
excite
admiration let them do as they may. There was nothing
about him that reminded you of a hidden defect or an attempt
at display. If he wore his hair long, its glossy luxuriance
was a glory to his head; if he cropped it close, it displayed
his perfectly formed neck and seemed to add a new grace to
his person; if he was moved by mirth, his whole features
appeared
to have gained their highest character; but when he
was depressed by sadness, you felt that his down cast eyes,
his closed lips, and the tender melancholy of his countenance
formed the expression best suited to his features; when
excitement
spread the rosy glow of health upon his cheek and
he trod with buoyant step, a gentle moisture upon his fair
brow, his mouth half unclosed and his eyes sparkling with
animal life, then he appeared to shine forth in his proper form
and to exult in his strength and beauty; but look at him
sitting
by the bed-side of his father with the dim rays of a
chamber-lamp feebly illuminating his pale countenance, and
making his deep blue eyes seem black as night, and his wavy
brown hair like a raven's wing, while he modestly listens to
the counsel of the old man, who detains him by needless
repetition
for the mere pleasure of gazing upon him, and you
would still think that you saw him in his most fortunate
aspect.
But she possessed none of those graces of expression which,
though so worthless in themselves, are so potent in gaining
esteem, and sympathy, and even love; she was dark in
complexion
,
slight in her person, with thin and ill-formed lips, a
harsh voice, and eyes that were painfully brilliant, and, except
when agitated by passion her motions were languid and her
conversation spiritless. Her education had been of a kind to
heighten all the defects of her person and to strengthen all the
worst qualities of her mind; a fashionable boarding school
had enfeebled her body, and the alternate indulgence and
severity of her mother had rendered her capricious and
resentful
,
and the rude conduct of her brothers had compelled
her to a violence of manner which was foreign to her
natural
temper.
When John told her that her uncle's portion of the estate
of Tremlett and Tuck would be placed at her command as
soon as a division of the property could be effected; she
barely
replied that Mr. Tremlett was very kind but that she would
not violate her uncle's will by accepting of it before the time
appointed by him.
John looked upon her with a feeling of tender pity, for he
feared she was nursing hopes which would never be realized;
but he did not know how to undeceive her, and he left it to
time to reveal what he felt must soon be known.
You take this news very quietly, he said, there are
not many young ladies who would receive such an
announcement
with so little emotion.
Perhaps not, replied Julia, and I might have taken it
with more emotion myself if any one but you had made it
to me.
So, then, it is my little worth which makes the fortune
seem less, said John.
Ah, you cruel! replied she looking reproachfully in his
face, how you pervert my meaning. You know it is your
great worth which makes the fortune appear so little.
No, no, I cannot think so, although you say it. But do
you know how great the fortune is?
Indeed I do not care, she said, except for his sake
who will use it. He knows, does he not?
Indeed, I cannot tell, replied John carelessly; but I
know that whoever the user may be, he will have a noble
fortune
,
and I hope it will serve him as long as it took your uncle
to scrape it together.
Julia's face turned very pale as he spoke, but it flushed
with crimson as she said with down-cast eyes and a trembling
voice, but
you
know how much the fortune is, do you
not?
I have been told it will exceed half a million, he
replied
.
That is a very, very large sum; larger, a vast deal larger
than I ever dreamed of possessing, for my dreams have not
been encumbered with gold; but large as it is I would give
it all, yes, if it were ten times as large, to know one thing.
That would indeed be a costly secret, he said
laughingly
,
but a woman once gave more than that to satisfy her
curiosity.
Women have always paid dear enough for all they have
learned, she replied, but I would, besides the fortune
which my uncle's partiality bequeathed to me, give my
life.
At this moment Mrs. Tuck entered the parlor and
prevented
a catastrophe which John foresaw, from the passionate
manner of the young lady could not be prevented.
And Mrs. Tuck upon learning the cause of the young
man's visit was so overcome at the intelligence that she sat
and fanned herself with a newspaper for a long time before
she could gather breath to speak, and happily for the young
lady she attributed her agitation to excess of joy. Like her
two sons she looked upon the money as her own, counting
the real possessor as hardly entitled to a word in regard to
it. A new house filled with French furniture, a new
carriage
with a footman in white top boots, new jewelry, a host
of servants and a set of plate, visits to Marquand's and
Stewart's
,
jaunts to the springs, and a few other trifles of a
kindred
excellence flitted through her imagination, and so
disordered
her vision that the furniture of the room she sat in,
and the dress that she wore seemed to contaminate her by
their touch.
John was happy of an opportunity to be gone, and seeing
that Mrs. Tuck was agitated by feelings which she was
dying
to coin into words took pity upon her, and bidding the
two ladies good morning, returned to his duties at the
counting
room, where we must follow him, and leave the mother
and daughter to the enjoyment of their
tete a tete
on their
bright prospects.
CHAPTER IX.
A MYSTERIOUS LETTER, AND AN UNEXPECTED DEPARTURE.
THE death of Mr. Tuck had imposed new duties upon
young Tremlett, and he was forced to confine himself
to his desk the whole day, and at dark, when he threw down
his pen and was preparing to go home, he remembered that a
foreign arrival in the morning had brought intelligence from
Captain Clearman and letters for his daughter, the young
lady in the Bowery, which he had, by some strange mistake
put into his pocket, instead of sending them to her, as he
should have done. This was very wrong, as he honestly
confessed; and to punish himself for his negligence, he
resolved
to take them up into the Bowery and deliver them into
the young lady's own hands and confess his fault. It would
learn him to do better another time. So he buttoned up his
coat and hurried off on his penitential errand; but so little
like a penance did his pilgrimage into the Bowery appear to
him, that he was forced to confess he never found that famous
thoroughfare one half so pleasant before. It did, indeed,
appear
to him like what its name would lead a stranger to
expect
,
a mossy road winding amongst venerable trees by the
green margin of crystal brooks, with climbing vines
dropping
their clustered fruit around and warbling birds filling
the air with melody; instead of a cobble-paved street lighted
with gas and and filled with oyster saloons and pawnbrokers'
shops, with nothing in the world to remind one of a `bowery'
save a farmer's waggon from Westchester stopping at the
door of a feed store. But he walked on encountering many
a sad sight which gave him no sadness, and jostled by rude
passengers who could get no rudeness from him, until he
reached the little court where the old sailor lived, where
he found the quaint little garden with its two large conch
shells, and the two bits of rope with the two turks'-heads, and
the bright little brass knocker, and the yellow painted stoop
exactly as he had left them; and on entering this quiet home
he found the old man, and the old lady, and the young lady,
and the drab colored parrot, exactly as he had found them
before
,
excepting that they now all met him with smiling faces,
whereas before they had welcomed him with a serious and
respectful air; only poll preserved her gravity; nothing
could have induced her to unbend.
But when the letters were handed to the young lady, then
there were renewed smiles, sobered a little by a vagrant tear,
which, coming unbid, was soon dashed away, as tears should
be; and the old sailor took larger whiffs of his pipe, and the
old lady rubbed her spectacles, and Fidelia knelt down at her
grandmother's feet who read the letters aloud; and they were
all exceedingly happy at the news, and the bearer of the
letters
having heard the contents, took his hat and said he must
leave them, but upon being pressed, consented to take a cup
of tea with them lest he should hurt the feelings of the old
couple; so they sat down to the same neat and well spread
board as before, the old lady again implored a blessing, and
after tea the old man told the same stories, and laughed the
same good-natured and honest laugh, Fidelia sang the same
little ballad, only with a sweeter voice and a more bewitching
smile, and afterwards the venerable old bird startled them
again with her exclamation of `let us pray;' for it appeared,
to their visitor at least, that the evening was not half spent;
and after prayer poll again pronounced her solemn amen, and
John again took his leave, more delighted than ever with
Fidelia, and resolved to see her again the very next night.
The first sight of this young lady had given him a new
taste of life, with which he was so enchanted that with all the
inconsiderateness of youth he yielded himself up to its
influences
without taking a second thought about propriety, or
fitness, or prudence, or station, or age, or wealth, or any of
those numberless considerations which are known by the
experienced
to be so essential to secure permanent happiness
when one makes a business of falling in love. But if he was
enchanted on his first visit he was enraptured and maddened
on the second, and instead of cooly calculating the advantages
which his prospects of wealth, his education, and his person
should entitle him to, and prudently exacting a certain
amount of family dignity, of wealth, of connections and of
personal accomplishment in exchange for them, he
renounced
them all and with a total disregard of riches and position
thought of nothing but the charms of Fidelia which eclipsed
and annihilated every possible consideration, save only his
father; and but for the respect which he felt for the good
old man, he would have proposed immediate marriage to her
before he left the quiet little house. What the effect of such
a sudden and astounding proposition would have been it is
not easy to conceive, since it is very certain, from events
which afterwards transpired, that neither Fidelia nor her
grand parents had she most remote suspicion that John had
called upon them from any other than the kindest and most
respectful motives. For although it is true that she looked
upon him as the very perfection of humanity yet she could not
but consider that there was a great gulf between them which it
would require at least half a million of dollars to fill up, and
she did not even in her dreams, once fancy so wild and
improbable
an event as his falling in love with her. She
looked
upon him as a superior being, one whom she could
venerate
and love, as she might a distant star, without a hope of
calling it her own, and therefore to be loved fervently and
ardently, without passion, or dissapointment, or jealousy.
But he had never valued himself on his prospective riches,
and therefore he did not undervalue others whose prospects
were not as bright as his own; neither had he ever been
troubled with any of those overwhelming feelings of the
irresistible
charms of his own person which are common to
good looking young men of his age; and his only fear was
that he might not be acceptable to Fidelia. But it was not
in his nature to disguise his feelings long, except when the
utterance of them would cause pain, and he resolved as soon
as he reached his fathers chamber to confess to the old
gentleman
the exact state of his affections, and then to make a
formal offer to the young lady herself.
But on entering his father's office he found him with an
open letter in his hand, and apparently in a state of great
perplexity.
I am glad you have come, my boy, said the old
gentleman
,
brightning up as the young man entered; here is a
most perplexing affair, and I do not see how we are to
manage it.
What is it, can my advice be of any service?
I hardly know what to make of it, continued Mr.
Tremlett
,
here's a letter that has been brought to me this evening
but from whom I do not know, stating that our
correspondent
in Charleston is on the point of failing, and that unless
I, or my partner, of whose death the writer does not appear
to have been aware, do not immediately repair to that city we
shall lose the very large amount now owing to us by him.
It is a very strange business, indeed, said John, have
you any reason to believe the statement?
None whatever. But you know that our correspondent,
Mr. Loudon, has property in his hands, belonging to the firm,
to a very large amount, and it will not do to trust to chance
for its security. Even though I were willing to risk my own
property I have no right to sacrifice that of my partner's
representative
,
so I think we must look into this business.
26
Perhaps it would be well to write to Mr. Loudon, first,
said John, something is due to the feelings of so old a
correspondent
.
True, true, replied the old merchant, but more is due
to ourselves. I have always made it a point, my son, in
business
engagements, to look upon men as mere machines;
feelings
are things which, you know, I never treat lightly; but,
in business they must be thrown aside. Loudon is a heavy
operator in cotton on his own account, and it is by no means
improbable that he may have ruined himself by bad
speculations
;
and now I think of it, his book-keeper is a Scotchman
to whom I once made a small loan when he was embarrassed,
and who afterwards carried letters of recommendation from
me to Charleston, by which means he got employment; and
it is the likeliest thing in the world that he has taken this
method
of repaying the favor, for he was a grateful fellow.
It seems very natural, said John, but how are you to
avail yourself of his suggestion? You cannot leave, yourself
at this time.
True, true, what can be done?
Will it be prudent to send Jeremiah?
No, no, Jeremiah could not be trusted on so delicate an
errand; he is too honest and unsuspecting. Every day
something turns up to make me feel the loss of poor Mr. Tuck.
replied the old gentleman as he put his hand to his eyes.
Could you trust Mr. Bates? said John.
No, no, replied Mr. Tremlett, Bates would never do.
He is too precise, too exact; he would only do what he might
be instructed to do, and nothing more; but this is a case
where no instructions can be given. Crisp would not do, he
is too much of a dandy, he might be bought with a cigar and
a glass of champagne; Keckhaussen would do if he could
talk English. Let me see.
There is Van; suggested John.
Which of the Vans? replied the old gentleman.
Van Winkle.
No, no, he is too young, and if he were not, he is too
simple.
Could you trust to Tom Tuck? asked John.
I could trust to his ability, if nothing more were required;
replied Mr. Tremlett, but it will not do to employ a stranger
on such a business.
Have you no other correspondent there, whom you could
trust?
Yes, but not without a breach of confidence towards
Loudon
,
which I could not be guilty of, replied Mr. Tremlett.
After all, my son, I see no alternative, but for you to go on
this unpleasant business yourself.
John bit his lip, and looked a little disconcerted, for he
had formed a plan of operations, in his own mind, for the next
fortnight, which an excursion to Charleston would
completely
overthrow. In truth, we will inform the reader, as he has
a right to know, John had formed a very strong resolution, to
which he had bound himself without writing, to spend every
evening of the succeeding two weeks at the little yellow house
in the Bowery, and the few thousands of dollars owing by
the Charleston merchant appeared to him too trifling a matter
to call for such a sacrifice as he would have to make to
secure
them. But he made no objections, and the old
gentleman
either did not see, or would not, that his proposition was
not a very pleasant one. You will be absent but a very
short time, continued the fond old man, or I would not
consent to your going; and the journey will be shorter to
you, than it will to me, for there will be novelty and
excitement
to divert your attention, while I shall be left alone
without
a friend to cheer me until you return.
A second thought had worked a change in John's mind,
for he felt the unreasonableness of objecting to his father's
wishes; and he expressed a cheerful willingness to undertake
the business; although he had doubts of the necessity of the
journey. And he truly said that he felt a disinclination to
leaving the old gentleman for so long a time. But it being
a matter of urgent necessity, they both heroically agreed to
bear their temporary separation with fortitude, and made
themselves very happy in the thoughts of meeting after a
brief absence.
The old gentleman detained his son in conversation as
long as he could, but as it was necessary to make preparations
for leaving the next morning they separated at an earlier hour
than usual, and John, after he had retired to his chamber, sat
down and penned a few, but expressive lines to Fidelia, in
which he told her in simple language, without adornment or
exaggeration, that he loved her, and that on his return he
should call upon her to learn from her own lips whether or
not she could love him in return. Never before had he
expressed
himself on paper so easily, so feelingly, and so much
to his own satisfaction. After he had written his letter he
read it over and over again, delighted at the true
expression
of his own feelings, and wondering at his success in
a style of composition which he had then attempted for the
first time. Those who feel can write feelingly, but
counterfeit
feelings on paper, like counterfeit laughter, or
counterfeit
tears, affect nobody, because feelings lie deeper than the
eye or the ear, and like can only affect like; as the devil
could not tempt St. Anthony, although he has tempted so
many sham saints before and since his time, and the angel
could find shelter with no man but Lot in all Sodom because
Lot alone of all its inhabitants partook of the angel's nature.
When he had folded and sealed his letter to Fidelia, he
attempted to write to Julia, but after many attempts and great
study he was obliged to give it up, he could neither arrange
his thoughts to suit him, nor find proper words in which to
express them. Something was necessary, but he could not
write, and at last he determined to wait until his return and
then make a formal explanation to her brothers and let chance
direct him afterwards. And then he resigned himself to sleep
and forgot all his cares and anxieties and rambled, spirit-free
over the beautiful land of dreams, and his soul refreshed
herself
by drinking at the fountains of living waters from which
she was exiled during her attendance upon his body, which,
while she was thus pleasantly employed, regained the vigor
and beauty it had lost during the day, and rendered itself
more worthy of her dwelling.
But his old father remained many hours in dark and silent
watchfulness, his spirit weary of his body and yet unable to
leave it; for Nature has seemingly reversed her rule of
compensating
in regard to sleep, giving it in liberal measure to the
young and healthful, whose cares are few, and whose
memories
are pleasant, but doling it out with a niggard hand to the
old and diseased, who have many cares they would forget, and
memories that do but sadden them.
The next morning John was up with the sun, and his
preparations
being completed, he entrusted the letter for Fidelia
to the keeping of Jeremiah, from whom he exacted a promise
that he would deliver it in person to the young lady herself
that very evening, and having taken a tender leave of his
father, whose old eyes ran over with tears, for the first time
in many a long day, as he shook the young man by the hand
and in vain endeavoured to ask God's blessing upon him, he
brushed the falling drops from his own bright eyes and
followed
by his servant departed upon his journey.
CHAPTER X.
INVOLVES JEREMIAH IN A VERY STRANGE ADVENTURE, AND
CLOSES THE SECOND DIVISION OF THIS HISTORY.
THE good fortune which had fallen to Julia Tuck had
produced a greater change in the feelings of all her
relatives
than it had in her; for although it was a source of
unspeakable joy to her to have it in her power to bestow a
fortune upon the man whom she loved above all the earth,
the fortune itself was otherwise trivial in her eyes, for she
had resolved, at the first, to use no part of it for her own
gratification
,
and to leave it to the generosity of her future husband
to bestow what part he chose upon her mother and brothers.
But as she had not intimated her determination to them, they
revelled in the most intoxicating anticipations of the uses to
which they would appropriate her money, and looked upon
her and her husband, whoever he might be, as persons of
secondary
consideration to themselves.
Mrs. Tuck had already engaged an extra servant and
ordered a silver tea-set, and her youngest son, Fred, had sent
off his library of novels to be re-bound in green morocco; he
had bought a new gold-headed cane, a crimson satin
robe-de-chambre
lined with white merino, a pair of cream-colored
horses, and had bespoke a yellow tiger. His brother Tom, who
hated ostentation in dress and furniture, had simply furnished
himself with the costliest pocket-chronometer he could find,
and in a quiet way had gone into an operation in fancy
stocks large enough to ruin the richest merchant in Wall
street. His highest ambition, and the object of all his
operations
,
was to gain a reputation in that particular spot; and
let not the reader accuse him of a low ambition, for Tom well
knew that a sensation in Wall street, like a throb of the heart
in the animal economy, would be felt at the extremities of the
world which bounded his vision. As his sister had not yet
come into possession of her property, it could not of course be
of any service to him in an actual operation where money
must be paid out; but the reputation of a rich relation will
enable a man to transact a very heavy business on credit,
which his character alone would not allow him to do. This
trading upon the reputation of one's friends, although
practised
to a very great extent, does not seem to accord with the
cunning and cautiousness of the mercantile profession. But
merchants are like a certain species of domestic animals, whose
name it will not do to mention in this connection, that are so
suspicious, and so close; that you could not by the most
artful
representations deceive them into danger, nor even induce
them to show their heads in daylight, but by the mere scent
of a piece of toasted cheese, may be lured into traps which
otherwise they could not have been persuaded to look at from
a distance.
When this amiable family assembled at their tea-table, they
seemed to be invested with new characters, every individual
with the exception of the young lady, having grown very
dignified and high minded, so much so, indeed, that they not
only exacted a more dignified bearing in others, but they
displayed
their own airs with profuse liberality; even the cook
and chambermaid had caught the infection and tossed their
heads disdainfully to the servants next door.
Mrs. Tuck was continually jogging the memories of the
boys not to forget their sister, and the boys were continually
reminding each other that they took no notice of Julia, and
both of them handed her a chair together, and both of them
asked her in the same breath if they could do anything for
her in the evening, and both of them brought her a present;
Fred's, being a newly imported annual, filled with the softest
looking female nobilities conceivable, and Tom's, a gold
fillagree card-case.
These attentions appeared rather to embarrass their sister
than to please her; the rudeness with which they had
formerly
treated her was not so annoying, because it was more
genuine. Nothing can make a sensitive person more uneasy
than to be treated with insincerity, because you cannot tell the
exact degree of deceit which is practised towards you, and as
you do not want to repay kind attentions with contempt, you
do not want to acknowledge yourself deceived by returning
thanks for sinister motives.
But, in the case of Julia Tuck and her brothers, there was
no need of refining upon motives, as she understood them
perfectly
well, and gave them to understand that they did not
deceive her. With the second cup of tea, all the assumed
airs with which they had sat down began to wear off, and
they all gradually fell into their natural characters.
So, they say Jack Tremlett has sloped, observed Fred to
his brother; do you really think he has gone to England?
Julia turned pale and let her cup slip from her fingers.
My son! said Mrs. Tuck frowning upon Fred, how
can you be so rude.
Fact, isn't it Tom?
Fred, you are a fool, replied his brother; young
Tremlett
has gone on a short journey somewhere on business; I
believe; at least, they told me so at the counting house.
Julia took up her cup again, but she could not carry it to
her lips, her hand trembled so violently.
I suppose he sent you a note, sister, to advise you of the
fact? said Fred.
No, he did not, you know he did not, she replied,
bursting
into tears, and he has not gone. You say so to agitate
me; but the time will come when you will not sport with my
feelings.
Now children, said Mrs. Tuck in a tone of authority, I
command you to conduct yourselves with more propriety
towards
your sister; please remember, both of you, that she is
no longer a child, and that her present position entitles her to
a more respectful and affectionate manner than you have
been accustomed to show to her. Your sister is the head of
the family now.
Well; said Fred, shoving his plate across the table,
suppose she is; am I to be held accountable for the actions of
Mister Jack Tremlett? I rather guess not.
Now mother, said Tom, if you want Fred to behave,
as he should, just learn to behave yourself.
Come, Tom, that's piling it up a little too high; said
Fred in a reproving manner.
And as for you, Julia, continued Tom, turning to his
sister, it is time you gave up that fellow. If he has gone to
Charleston without sending you word, I'll break off the match
as soon as he comes back. Just remember, all of you, that
I
have got something to say in this family.
If he has left without sending me word, replied Julia,
rising from the table, It was because he had a very good
reason for doing so, and if I do not complain, no one else has
a right to do so.
If he has done that, you ought to complain, said her
mother
,
O! if your poor father had ever treated me so, I would
never have seen his face again.
There, said Fred, smoke that.
You are determined to drive me from this house, said
Julia, but if you do, I will never return to it, and so
saying
she left the room.
Now you
have
done it, said Tom.
I? said his mother.
27
Yes, you, and you, replied Tom.
O, my children, replied the mother, putting her
handkerchief
to her eyes.
But, before any reply could be made, the chambermaid
came running into the room and exclaimed that Miss Julia
was in convulsions, upon which they all ran out together, in
great alarm, towards the young lady's chamber. We will
leave them to finish their evening's performance; and once
more return to Jeremiah with whose adventures we propose
to draw the second book of our history to a close.
Jeremiah had parted with his young friend in the morning
with a good deal of regret, for although he was to be absent
but a fortnight, yet for that fortnight he would be wholly
destitute
of a sympathetic friend; and his sources of pleasure
were too restricted, for him not to feel sensibly the removal
of even one. He did not know the exact nature of the
business
which called young Tremlett away; he only knew that
it was an urgent call, and thought no more about it, but the
letter which he had entrusted to his care puzzled him sorely
because it was directed to a young lady; and as soon as his
daily work was done he hurried up into the Bowery to the
old sailor's house to deliver it according to his instructions;
with a slight hope, perhaps, that he should learn something
of its contents.
Jeremiah had never been to the house before, and it was
quite dark when he reached there; he found the old couple
seated quietly before the little grate, with their grand
daughter
seated between them reading from an old book of travels.
It was a huge volume liberally illustrated with plates, and
printed in a type almost too large to allow the eye to take in a
reasonably long word at a glance; the old sailor had brought
it from London when he was a youngster, and it had been read
through by all the members of his family scores of times, and
they still found amusement in its pages.
The old couple welcomed Jeremiah very heartily, and the
young lady took his hat and reached him a chair; he en
quired if it was Miss Clearman, and, as she blushed and
answered `yes,' he reached her the letter; upon which she
blushed still deeper, and asked if it was from her father.
I do not know, replied Jeremiah, but I think not.
For he was not so slow of apprehension as not to guess at
the nature of its contents when he perceived how
surpassingly
beautiful the young lady was.
I wonder who it can be from? said Fidelia, turning the
letter over and over in her hand, and then trying to spell out
the motto on the seal, Who can it be.
Open it and see, my little daughter, said her grandfather
that's the way I always used to do when I got a letter from
your grandmother, and then the old man took his pipe from
his mouth and enjoyed a quiet honest laugh, which was so
genuine and unaffected that Jeremiah laughed too, and
thought he had never seen such a humorous old gentleman
before.
Every body always knowed my letters easy enough,
said the old man, for you see, Mr. Jernegan, I never spelt
a word right in my life. Nat'rally I couldn't, for I never had
but one quarter's schooling; but then I always was sure to get
letters enough in it. They warn't put together in a ship-shape
fashion; and I always write so plain that you could read my
writing across the river; and my owners always said that
they had as lief read my letters as any ship-master's in their
employ; and then the old man let his under lip fall and
shook his old body again with another quiet explosion of
mirth, which it was impossible to see and not try to
imitate
.
And while he had been talking to Jeremiah, Fidelia
had opened and read her letter.
Well, what is the news my little daughter? said the old
man.
Nothing, quietly answered Fidelia, as she folded up the
letter; but her grandmother perceived that she put her hand
to her heart and stealthily drew a long sigh. And a few
moments
,
afterwards, when she found an excuse to leave the
room, the old lady followed after her.
Do you know who the letter was from, Mr. Jernegan?
asked the old man, as soon the ladies had left the room.
It was given to me by young Mr. Tremlett, replied
Jeremiah
.
Ah, I never liked the looks of letters from young people,
said the old man drawing a long whiff at his pipe. I don't
suppose that Mr. Tremlett would write anything out of the
way to my grand-darter, but I never liked the looks of letters.
I do not know that he wrote the letter, said Jeremiah,
but if he did, I can assure you that it contains nothing
wrong. He is incapable of an evil thought.
So I told my wife, said the old man, after he was here
the other night; but letters have a suspicious look. I am
now rising my seventy-sixth year, and I never wrote a letter
to a young woman in my life.
Indeed! said Jeremiah.
Never, and I don't think, now, I ever shall. And what
is more, I don't owe a dollar in the world; and I never was
sued, and I never sued a man in my life; and I never in all
my going to sea, which was for more than fifty-five years,
struck a man, or called one out of his name; and to the
best of my knowledge I never wronged a living soul out of a
copper, and I never spent a shilling for my pleasure in a
foreign port, in all my rambling about.
That is very remarkable, said Jeremiah.
It was always pleasure enough for me to sit down and
think about the old woman and the children; and I knew
that they wanted all the shillings I might have to spare.
And I dare say you never repented of your prudence,'
said Jeremiah.
And what is more, continued the old sailor after having
refreshed himself with two or three long pulls at his pipe, I
never killed but one man in my life, and that man was a
Dutchman.
Is it possible, said Jeremiah, opening his eyes very wide
that you killed a Dutchman?
I will tell you how it happened, said the old man, as he
knocked the ashes from his pipe and refilled it with tobacco,
in the year eighty-five, I was second officer of the brig Betsey
lying in the port of Archangel, waiting for a cargo of tallow
to take to London. Our first officer was a Dutchman of the
name of Scraffle, and our skipper's name was captain
Paddock
;
he belonged to the town of Salem, and he was the
most ill-favored dog that ever stepped on a ship's deck; which
was owing mostly to his having been kicked in the face by a
horse. One Sunday afternoon I asked leave to take the jolly
boat and go ashore; the mate was standing by at the time,
and the captain said, no, because I was too much of an old
soldier. Now that, you know, Mr. Jernegan is the worst
name that you can call a sailor-man, and I was tempted to
take the captain and throw him overboard; but I kept my
temper, and I says to him, `I will keep my hands off of you,
captain Paddock, because it would not be respectful to strike
a superior officer, but I will tell you what I will do; as soon
as we get to the States, I'll go to Salem and enquire for the
horse that kicked you in the face, and if I can find him I will
treat him to a peck of oats. With that the mate began to
laugh, and the captain began to stamp and swear; and the
more he swore the more the mate laughed, until at last he
lay down upon the deck and began to roll over and over until
he rolled down into the fore peak, and one of the sailors, which
was an Irishman, jumped on deck and called out, `sure Mr.
Scraffle is kilt entirely.' And the captain says he, `there,
you have killed the mate with your confounded nonsense,'
`well,' said I, `that is the first man I ever killed;' and it was
the last.
And was he really killed? asked Jeremiah with an
alarming look.
O, no, replied the old man, he made out to eat his
rations
the next day. But the skipper took good care never
to call me an old soldier again.
Fidelia and her grandmother now returned, and the
remainder
of the evening was spent in agreeable conversation; and
Jeremiah had just looked at his watch and was thinking
about bidding the good old couple and their lovely
grand-daughter
good night, when he was startled by the warning
voice of Poll, who exclaimed with unusual solemnity `let us
pray.'
The history of the drab parrot now had to be related, which
gave Jeremiah greater delight than any history he had ever
listened to in his life, and his feelings had become so warmly
enlisted in favor of every member of the little family that when
the old lady invited him to remain and join in their evening
service
,
he dropped into a chair again with a feeling of infinite
gratification
,
and, at the close of the prayer, pronounced an amen
in as solemn and impressive a tone as the venerable bird
herself, who, at the sound of his voice, peered over the top of
the bureau as if looking for the individual who was
attempting
to disturb her prerogative.
At last when Jeremiah could not decently prolong his
visit another moment, he took his leave equally in love with
the parrot and Fidelia, and the old man and his wife.
Scarcely
had the door closed upon him when Fidelia took the letter
from her bosom, and kissed it with rapturous delight, and
clasped her arms around her grand-father's neck and
sobbed
for very joy. It was her hour of happiness, which,
though she were never to know another, was so full of
sweetness
and bliss, that it would suffice for a long life.
Her grandfather and grandmother cautioned her against
indulging
in too lively hopes, and remainded her in their plain
and honest terms of the liability of every human expectation
to be blasted. But, though she listened attentively to their
admonitions, they could not dampen her ardent feelings. She
was loved by the man whose perfections had inspired her with
a feeling of awe. It was enough. How could there be
disappointments
in a world which opened upon her vision so
brightly and so alluring.
Jeremiah came out of the little court and emerged into the
Bowery in a state of most delightful agitation, and it being
very dark, and the street but imperfectly lighted, he did not
discover until he had proceeded some distance, perhaps the
length of three or four blocks, that he was followed by a
female
who was trying to overtake him. As soon as he did
perceive her, he stopped, and she caught hold of his arm.
My good woman, said Jeremiah, what do you want
of me?
O, do not call me a good woman, said the female, I
am a very bad woman.
Are you, indeed, said Jeremiah, whose heart was
touched
by such a remarkable confession; what can I do for you?
O, sir, replied the woman, who appeared young and
handsome, as the street light illuminated her face, O, sir,
you can do nothing for me; but my poor sister is dying, and
she cannot die in peace unless some good man will pray with
her. Will you not come to her?
My poor friend, said Jeremiah, I am far from being a
good man, but if I can be of service to your sister lead me to
her.
O, sir, cried the unfortunate, your are so good, and my
poor sister will die so happy, if you will but say a good word
to her and pray for her. This way sir, this way.
And the woman clung to his arm and hurried him along until
they came to a dark cross-street into which she turned, and,
after walking a short distance, she turned into another dark
street and soon they came to a modern built brick house with
some kind of a tree in front, and having opened the
street-door
with a night key she led him up a pair of stairs through
a well furnished hall, and conducted him into a small
bedroom
containing no other furniture than a bed and rocking
chair. Sit down, she said upon which Jeremiah seated
himself in the rocking chair and she closed the door and
locked it on the outside. Make yourself easy until morning,
she said, speaking to him through the key hole, my sister
is better.
BOOK III.
CHAPTER I.
WILL CONTAIN SOME EXCELLENT HINTS TO NEWLY
MARRIED
COUPLES, AND SOME MELANCHOLY TIDINGS WHICH
WILL COME TO THE READER'S KNOWLEDGE IN DUE
COURSE.
JEREMIAH remained a prisoner all the next day and
night in the little room where we left him at the close of
our last chapter. Nobody came near him, and the only food
that he had tasted was the claw of a boiled lobster and a crust
of bread, that were thrown into his room over the sky-light
of the door. He made up his mind to be murdered, but he
resolved to defend himself to the best of his powers His
only weapon of defence was a pocket-knife, and from want of
practice he was not very expert in the use of his hands; and
feeling his own weakness he knew that he could make but a
feeble resistance to any one that would be likely to attack
him; he therefore endeavored to compose his mind, and tried
to prevail upon himself that he was resigned to whatever
death he might be doomed to suffer. As he had wronged no
man, and was in no manner enlisted in any cause that
required
a sacrifice, he was entirely at a loss to conceive any
28
reason for his confinement; and when, at last, he was set at
liberty by the same woman who had enticed him to her den,
he was so overjoyed to regain his freedom that he forgot to
ask for an explanation, but hurried out of the house and ran
the entire length of two or three streets before he thought of
the necessity of taking the number of the house.
His absence from his business and his boarding house,
caused innumerable speculations among his friends, and very
serious inconvenience to Mr. Tremlett, who was compelled
to remain until a very late hour at the counting-room, to
arrange
some business that no one but Jeremiah or himself
could attend to, and on his way home at night, he was
overtaken
by a sudden shower of rain, and a severe cold attended
by a fever, was the consequence.
Jeremiah hastened to the house of his employer, the
moment
he was set at liberty, and related to him the particulars
of his confinement, omitting only the cause of his visit to the
Bowery. The old gentleman was not a little amazed at so
strange a story, and if he had not known that Jeremiah was
incapable of deceit, he would have been inclined to doubt the
truth of it. But believing it entirely, he advised him to make
a complaint at the police office and have the woman punished.
Jeremiah, however, had a great horror of seeing his name in
a newspaper, and he had made up his mind to keep the
circumstance
to himself and seek for no redress for his
grievances
.
Miss Hogshart had been terribly alarmed during his
absence
,
but now that he had come back unharmed, she felt
herself
constrained to be very cold and dignified in her manner
towards him, and to treat his protestations of innocence in a
very sneering manner, unbecoming in any lady, but especially
so in her; she almost insinuated that Jeremiah was a
hypocrite
,
and not half as good as he pretended to be, which made
him feel very wretched; for it distressed him beyond measure
to know that she could, under any circumstances, appear so
unamiable. But it was nevertheless some consolation to him
to know that her ill feelings were excited by her excessive
fondness for him, and therefore he forgave her. Among the
very first friends who called upon him the next morning to
inquire about the cause of his absence were the brothers
Tuck, who were shocked and amazed when they heard of
the outrage that had been committed upon his person, and
expressed
a world of sympathy for him, but advised him not to
make the affair public, lest he should get into the papers, and
suffer in his reputation. They informed him with many
expressions
of regret and chagrin that in consequence of his
absence, Mr. Washington Mortimer had been allowed to
escape
,
as they depended solely upon his testimony to procure
a commitment. Jeremiah had no possible sympathy for
wrong-doers, and yet it was a relief to him to hear that the
poor man had got clear; it would have been a continual
source of unhappiness to him if any human being through
his agency had been confined in prison or otherwise harmed.
Although the brothers, and Mr. Tremlett, and even Miss
Hogshart in reality, acquitted Jeremiah of the slightest
suspicion
of wrong doing; yet there were two persons who
entertained
the most coarse and indelicate doubts of his uprightness;
doubts that impressed even these virtuous persons so
seriously
that they only ventured to give a slight intimation of their
existence by whispers and winks, and awful shrugs of their
shoulders, which being rendered into language mean, Oh,
the wickedness of some folks. These two excellent persons
were Mr. and Mrs. Bates. Such a coincidence of thought
between two persons so remarkably dissimilar is a
phenomenon
that requires an explanation; and as differences of opinion
are fruitful of much unhappiness among married people, we
will cheerfully devote a few lines to giving one, in the
confident
hope that the profit to be derived therefrom will
compensate
to our readers for a suspension of our narrative.
Some men, and some women even, are so fond of peace
and quietness that they are willing to fight continually for
their sakes, while others are so partial to a quiet life that they
will live in a continual tumult lest any attempt to allay it
should only increase its force. Of these two kinds of people
were Mr. and Mrs. Bates, and consequently where each was
resolutely bent on peace and quietness, it must have happened
that there were no disagreeable differences of opinion, and
unpleasant
bickerings, such as have too often brought the
marriage
state into contempt and given occasion to crabbed old
bachelors and cross tempered old maids to cast many witless
reproaches upon the blessed matrimonial condition. She
being determined for the sake of peace to have her own way
and he being determined, for the same reason, that she should,
the most delightful harmony must always have prevailed in
the opinions and actions of these excellent persons. Another
thing which helped to produce this most pleasant and
peaceful
condition was the fact that Mr. Bates had attained to a
very respectable age, some eight and thirty years, before he
was blessed by his union with his better part; and being duly
impressed by her with a sense of the great sacrifice she had
made in consenting to unite herself to him, he could not find
it in his heart to oppose her in any of her little peculiarities
of opinion. When she first took possession of the rooms that
Mr. Bates had furnished for her, she discovered that he had
appropriated a particular peg, for each particular portion of his
wardrobe, and in fulfilment of her marriage vows, which had
just fallen from her lips, she immediately tumbled all his
coats, pantaloons and wrap-rascals into a dark closet, and
supplied
their places with her own
trousseau
, consisting of a
greater number of articles than we have here space to
enumerate
;
and upon his re-appearance he was struck aghast at
the tremendous change.
Bless my eyes, my dear! he exclaimed, what's the
meaning of all this?
Meaning of it, indeed! said the bride smartly, is the
man blind? Don't you see that I am going to have those pegs
for my own use?
But you musn't my dear, it will never do.
Musn't! musn't! screamed Mrs. B., as though she had
never before heard those words, where did you learn that
word sir? come, come, I must have my way, so don't put on
any of your old bachelor airs to me.
It is needless to say who came off conqueror and who
consented
to be bound hand and foot, manacled like a slave and
deprived of his rights, for the sake of peace and quietness.
Never again did Mr. Bates demur to any of his wife's
propositions
,
and when she hinted that Jeremiah was a dreadful
slyboots
,
he immediately expressed exactly the same opinion, and
said, moreover, that he had never had any other.
It gives us pain to record these things against Mr. Bates, for
doubtless many people have always looked upon him as a
very excellent person, as, indeed, he was; for he had always
paid his debts, a great thing assuredly in a community where
a neglect to do so is looked upon as an odious offence,
without
any consideration of the debtors misfortunes or ability,
but then it must be remembered that nobody would have
trusted Mr. Bates beyond his known ability to pay; he had
robbed no man of his money, an unusual thing in those days,
when even governments and independent states set examples
of dishonesty; he had never cheated government out of a
penny, although it is right to say that he had never been
intrusted
with any of the nation's funds; he had run away with
no man's wife, which was a greater merit in him, since he
would not have looked upon it as an unpardonable offence if
any body had run away with his; he had never accepted office
of a party and then proved traitorous to those who placed him
in power, a rare virtue in him, since he saw so many
examples
around him, and heard them spoken of as good jokes
rather than as black crimes; but then it must be remembered
that nobody ever dreamed of trusting him with an office; he
had fought no duels; he had misled no minds by preaching
false doctrines; he had never overturned any established
forms of society by making pestiferous innovations; he had
wronged no man by giving freedom to his slave; he paid his
pew rent regularly and believed as devoutly in the apostolical
authority of his pastor as though he had been educated at
Oxford; and, in one word, he was a very good sort of man.
We might extend the catalogue of his virtues to a much
greater length, but we trust enough has been done to satisfy
his friends that we have no wish to treat him unjustly.
But Jeremiah was wholly unconscious that any one
entertained
such cruel suspicions against him as Mr. and Mrs. Bates
did, and he walked erect in the light of his own innocence,
fearing nothing so much as doing wrong to others. The
first day of his release, he was confined until a late hour to
his desk, and before he went to his boarding-house at night
he called upon Mr. Tremlett and was alarmed to find the old
gentleman in a high fever. Poor old Mrs. Swazey, the
housekeeper
,
was doing all she could to hasten his end by
smothering
him with hot blankets, and deluging his bowels with hot
boneset tea.
Jeremiah saw at a glance that the old gentleman was very
ill, and he begged Mrs. Swazey to desist from giving him any
more of her remedies until he called in a physician. But the
old lady looked upon his interference with high disdain.
Dosing
was her peculiar province, and if there was any thing
that she delighted in it was compelling people to drink
decoctions
of boneset and penny-royal. Jeremiah was too seriously
impressed with the necessity of immediate medical assistance
to be influenced by Mrs. Swazey's persuasions and he went
directly in search of a doctor.
It is a sad thing for poor human nature that the innocent
and unpretending should always prove the easiest and surest
prey to the knavish and humbugeous portion of mankind;
like natures so far from proving attractive, always repel each
other, and humbugs of every kind receive their chief
countenance
and support from the open hearted and sincere part of
the community.
With his accustomed ingenuousness, Jeremiah proceeded
directly to the house of doctor Smoothcoat when he went in
pursuit of a physician, for he knew that that personage was
celebrated for his high charges, and he thought that no
physician
could have the conscience to value his services at a
higher rate than the rest of the faculty unless he were
conscious
that they were worth more to the patient; and as there
were many other simple-minded people besides Jeremiah,
Doctor Smoothcoat had a good many rich patients who
enabled him, by their contributions, to live in great
magnificence
,
and occasionally to refresh himself by a visit to Europe,
which brought him more patients than even his high charges,
for an European reputation is a great help to one's progress
in the New World.
Jeremiah's heart sank within him when he reached the
doctor's house, and was informed that the great man was out
on a professional visit; he waited a long time expecting him
to return, and at last came away without seeing him, but left
a note on his office table requesting him to call at Mr.
Tremlett's
house. He sat by the old gentleman's bed-side until past
midnight watching with great anxiety, but no physician came;
and then, growing alarmed, he went again in search of
Doctor
Smoothcoat. This time he found the professional
gentleman
at home, but he was astonished to learn that he had
been for more than an hour in bed and asleep. How could
he sleep when a patient lay sick almost unto death, waiting
for his assistance?
But the Doctor said he had not received a call.
Did you not get the note that I left for you? asked
Jeremiah
.
The note! said the Doctor, I have received no
communication
from you.
But I left one upon your office table, said Jeremiah.
Oh! ah! I do remember that I observed a bit of paper
lying there directed to me, but I did not think that it could
be of any moment, said Doctor Smoothcoat, gentlemen
having
communications to make to me usually seal their letters
with wax.
Wax! exclaimed Jeremiah with unusual warmth,
Wax! O, true, it should ha ve been wax; and here it is
sealed with a wafer; and it has not been opened. Well, well,
I am very sorry. But, surely the life of a human being is of
more consequence than a bit of wax.
The doctor thought otherwise. He had not been to Europe
for nothing. Moreover he was a conservative, and
consequently
a great stickler for forms. So wicked a departure
from established usages as sealing a note to a person of his
consequence with a wafer, was not to be lightly passed by.
He understood the full importance of wax.
Jeremiah really blamed himself for his awful indiscretion
and want of breeding; and, in truth, felt like a criminal. It
was in consequence of his want of thought, or ignorance of
what was due to a great man, that his good old employer had
lain many hours watching with painful anxiety for a
physician
.
It was a long time before Doctor Smoothcoat was ready
to leave, for he stopped to dress himself with as much nicety
as though it had been noon instead of midnight; and when
at last he took his cane in his hand and buttoned up his coat
to go, Jeremiah in the excitement of his feelings, exclaimed,
Wax! quite unconsciously; at which the Doctor started
and told him he had better be careful. The night was cold
and they walked very brisky, and Jeremiah kept all the time
a few steps in advance, trying to seduce the doctor into a trot,
but without effect. It was not long, however, before they
reached the house and when the Doctor saw Mr. Tremlett, he
shook his head and said they should have sent for him sooner;
he bled his patient and left a prescription to be administered
every half hour. Jeremiah was dreadfully alarmed, and never
left the old gentleman's bed-side until morning, but just before
daylight he fell into a slumber from which he soon roused
himself and frightened the housekeeper, who had gone to
sleep in the adjoining room, by crying out in a loud voice,
wax! So much was his mind occupied by the unfortunate
blunder he had committed that the thought of it haunted him
in his sleep.
The morning came, and with it the Doctor, but neither
brought any relief to the sick old man. Jeremiah was obliged
to leave him, but his place was supplied by Mrs. Tuck who
offered her services with many expressions of kindness and
good will that were peculiarly grateful to the sick man's ears,
and acceptable to Mrs. Swazey, who was grown too old and
infirm to bear much fatigue. Mrs. Tuck was far from feeling
any very great tenderness for Mr. Tremlett, but with the true
instinct of her sex she could not but visit him in his illness,
and offer him those soothing and grateful offices which none
but a woman can perform, and she appeared to him like an
angel of goodness while she was smoothing his pillow or
gracefully
submitting to the meanest duties for his relief. But in
spite of the skill of his physician and the kind attentions of
his friends, the old man grew worse and worse; although his
mind was disordered by turns he seemed fully aware of his
danger, but uttered no complaints only at the absence of his
darling boy and fears that he should never see him again.
Poor old man! There was not another earthly object to
which his affections clung, and he could not die without
embracing
him once more. Only once more. If his eyes could
but rest on that dear form as they closed in death, his way
through the dark valley would be bright and cheerful.
Jeremiah wrote immediately to young Tremlett, informing
him of the old gentleman's danger, and urging his return.
But the next day his symptoms were more favorable, and
gave hopes of his recovery. Mrs. Swazey was so much
elated
29
that she insisted on his eating a bowl of chicken soup to
give him strength. The old man demurred, but she
persevered
,
and said, `nonsense,' until at length, partly overcome by
her persuasions and partly by the delicious odor of the broth
as she held it by the bed-side, he consented to taste a spoonful;
it was so pleasant to his feverish mouth that he took one
spoonful after another until he had swallowed the whole
bowlfull
,
when he fell back upon his pillow and in a few hours
had gained so much strength that it was with great difficulty
that Mrs. Swazey, assisted by the coachman and
chambermaid
,
could hold him upon his bed. His fever returned with
more alarming symptoms than before, and his poor brain was
in a wild delirium. He continued to grow weaker and weaker;
a consultation of physicians was held and his case was
pronounced
hopeless. Poor old man! he must die, and his
darling
boy far away. But he lingered on from day to day,
clinging to life with a tenacity that astonished his attendants,
who hoped that he might live to see him once more. Not
a word had been heard from him since he left, and it was time
that he returned. Jeremiah was in an agony of fear, such as
he had never felt before; he could endure his own
disappointments
and sufferings, but the troubles of those whom he loved
touched him deeply. If ever a mortal's lips gave utterance
to a sincere prayer, then did Jeremiah's when he nightly
poured forth his soul's desire to the Most High that the life
of the old man might be spared until his son's return.
It was the tenth day after Mr. Tremlett's illness, and the
mail brought a letter from Mr. Loudon stating that John had
arrived in Charleston in apparent good health, but was almost
immediately seized with an illness that confined him to his bed.
It was expressed in very guarded language, and a postcript
added that the physicians supposed the disease to be
varioloid
.
This news very nearly deprived Jeremiah of his reason; the
cautious manner in which the letter was written, filled him
with the saddest apprehensions. He called immediately upon
the brothers Tuck with the letter, and it put them in a great
excitement; Fred had no sooner overlooked the contents of
it than he caught up his hat and ran home to comfort his
sister with the intelligence. The physician forbade the
slightest allusion to the subject in the presence of Mr.
Tremlett
;
but if the old gentleman's mind had been in an ordinary
state of repose he would have guessed at his son's danger from
the downcast and melancholy looks of those about him,
particularly
Mrs. Swazy, who crept about the room with a
handkerchief
to her eyes, and ejaculated, `O, Lord!' between
every word she utiered. She loved the young man as though
he had been her own child, at least she thought she did, and
she knew he would die, for she had dreamed of losing another
tooth. Sure presage of death!
The day after the letters had been received an incident
occurred
that caused more excitement and speculation than any
event that we have yet recorded; this was nothing less than
the elopement of Julia Tuck. Whither she had gone nobody
knew, although her own family were at no loss for a
reasonable
surmise. The intelligence of young Tremlett's illness
produced a stunning effect upon her at first, but when she
recovered
her consciousness she bore up under the affliction
with a sober composure that astonished her friends. She
retired
to her room at an earlier hour than usual, and begged
that she might not be disturbed; but her mother became
alarmed at her long silence in the morning and going up to
her chamber found that the bed had not been slept in and
that some few light articles of dress had been removed from
her wardrobe. She was gone, but nobody had seen her leave
the house, and it was supposed that she had made her escape
while the rest of the family were all asleep. The wretched
mother was at first overwhelmed with grief, and the brothers
were paralyzed with rage; but pride and interest soon came
to their aid and they came to the determination that, for the
sake of the family, it would be best to say nothing about the
matter, and they instructed the servants to say that Julia had
gone into the country, if any inquiries should be made about
her.
Before Mrs. Tuck had wholly recovered from the effect of
this astounding blow, she was summoned to the bed-side of
Mr. Tremlett; the poor old gentleman was sinking fast, and
it was thought that he could not survive an hour. As she
entered the room he looked wistfully towards the door, but
closed his eyes with an expression of disappointment when he
saw her. Jeremiah sat by the bed-side of the dying man,
and Mrs. Swazey walked the floor wringing her hands but
giving no audible expression to her grief; his eyes remained
closed so long, and his features grew so rigid and pale that
they thought he was dead. But his pulse still beat, although
so weak and uncertain, that every throb seemed as though it
must be the last; and after lying more than an hour without
giving any other signs of life, he suddenly opened his eyes
and attempted to speak, but his parched lips could not utter a
word. Jeremiah wet them with a sponge and pressed a
tea-spoonful
of toast water into his mouth, when he looked up
with a grateful smile and said, in a low weak voice, I have
seen him, he will not come.
Who? said Jeremiah, John?
Yes.
The old house-keeper could contain her feelings no longer,
but lifted up her voice, and exclaimed, Bless my dear God
for it. He has seen the precious soul!
Hush, hush, said Jeremiah in a low voice, he is dead!
Let us go with him into the presence of the Lamb. And he
knelt down and prayed long and fervently; and the soul of
the old merchant was accompanied in its upward flight by the
sincerest prayer that ever dropped from the lips of a follower
of Him whose word is life to them that believe.
He was a dear good man, said Mrs. Tuck, wiping her
eyes, how sweet and calm he looks. Can it be that he is
dead?
He is dead to us, said Jeremiah, but the memory of
his good acts will live while any of those live who knew
him.
Only the actions of the just
Smell sweet and blossom in the dust.
CHAPTER II.
WILL CONTAIN A BRIDAL AND A BURIAL.
IT was something more than a fortnight since the arrival
of young Tremlett in Charleston and he lay sick, almost
to death of a loathsome and virulent disease. On landing he
had called immediately upon Mr. Loudon and frankly told
him the cause of his visit, and that correct and high spirited
merchant, though mortified in the extreme when he heard it,
convinced him of the entire groundlessness of the information
received by his father, by offering to pay on the spot the full
amount due to his firm the moment a balance could be made.
This was abundantly satisfactory, of course; but not satisfied
with John's assurances, Mr. Loudon had his book-keeper to
make out a full statement of his affairs, with an affidavit of
its correctness affixed, showing him to be worth a very
considerable
sum after all his debts should be paid. But this
John refused to examine or even to take with him to his
father. He was exceedingly well pleased with the
termination
of his business, and made his arrangements for leaving
the next day, although he felt a strong inclination to accept
of Mr. Loudon's invitation to spend a day or two on his
plantation
a few miles from the city. But his anxiety to return
home was very great, not only on his father's account, but for
the sake of Fidelia, whose image had haunted him, sleeping
or waking, ever since he left her, and he retired to his chamber
at an early hour partly that he might rise early in the
morning
,
but mainly because of a severe and unusual pain in his
head and back, which he attributed to over exertion and want
of rest. His servant awoke him at the appointed hour in the
morning, but when he attempted to rise, he found himself too
weak to stand; his head seemed to be on fire, and in a few
moments, he lost all consciousness, save only a wild and
fearful
thought that he could not lose, that he was lying in the
midst of a burning lake; how long this horrid seeming
continued
he knew not, but when he awoke to a perception of
the things about him he more than ever thought himself in a
wild and feverish dream. His acute sufferings would not
allow him long to remain under such a delusion. His hands
were bound up so that he could not move them; his eyes
were swollen; his whole body, from his head to his feet,
burned as though he were lying upon a bed of coals, and a
fiery thirst seemed to dry up all the moisture of his frame.
A negro woman stood at his head, bathing his face with a
sponge wet with rose-water and milk.
Where am I? he said gazing about him and trying to
rise, where am I? how got I here?
Lord love you, young master, said the negro woman,
you are in your own room; lie still, honey.
Where is my father? where is Jeremiah? where is Mrs.
Swazey?
O, honey, lie still. Blessed Lord! don't talk master.
This is not my room, I don't know it. Who are you,
what are you? Why are my hands bound? Let me look
in a glass that I may know who I am.
The nurse brought him a small mirror from the dressing
bureau, and as he caught sight of his face he fell back with a
groan. He well might doubt his own impersonality, for his
face bore no possible resemblance to his recollection of
himself
.
He lay a long while, fully conscious of his sufferings,
but unable to reconcile his present condition to his former
self, and doubtful whether he was really himself or somebody
else with his own recollections, but directly he caught sight of
his watch hanging by his bed, and Mr. Loudon coming in a
few moments afterwards, related to him the full particulars of
his situation. He had been confined to his bed a week and at
one time his physician had considered his case hopeless, but
since his disease had shown itself they felt confident of his
recovery
.
His hands had been bandaged to prevent him from
scarring his face by tearing his flesh in his delirium. Mr.
Loudon had taken a favorite slave from his own family to
wait upon him; and although she was a good nurse, she was
peculiarly well qualified to wait upon him, as she had had
the disease herself but a few months before, and was perfectly
familiar with the proper treatment of it; for she was a
valuable
servant and had been attended by the best physicians in
the place. He was pained to hear that Mr. Loudon had
written
to his father informing him of his danger, and begged that
another letter might be immediately written to inform the old
gentleman that he was getting better. Mr. Loudon promised
to do so in the morning, and as the day was drawing to a
close and he had to go to his plantation, he bade him good
night, after a very short stay, and left him. Juno, the nurse,
had gone out, and he was all alone; his head burned and he
gasped for a cooling drink; but his hands were bound so that
he could not pull the bell and he was too feeble to call for
assistance. There was no candle burning, but a faint streak
of red in the west cast a gloomy and uncertain light into the
chamber and threw heavy and indistinct masses of grotesque
shadows on the walls that seemed to oppress him, he knew
not why, for he knew they were but shadows. The air was
hot and dull and the mosquitoes were beginning to buzz
around his head threatening to add to his already
insupportable
heat by their poisonous bite. A huge ungainly bird flew
lazily past his window flapping its dusky wings and
croaking
dismally in his ears. He lay marking these dull sights
and sounds, and thinking how much his sufferings would be
lessened if only Fidelia, or his father, or even Mrs. Swazey
were near him, and ejaculating O, if God thought it not
good that man should be alone in Eden, man can never know
how good it is to have a help-meet here until he has been
stretched upon a bed of sickness, when suddenly, O,
welcome
sight, his father approached to his bed-side and looked
upon him with a sad pale face, but spoke no word.
The young man sprang upwards by a great effort and
exclaimed
,
O, father, father! But, still his father spake not.
O, father, will you not speak to me? O, why did they not
tell me you were here. But, overcome by the exertions he
had made, he fell back upon his pillow, his eyes still resting
upon his father's form, whose mournful and troubled gaze
alarmed him. He was just trying to reach out his arms when
his nurse came in and his father disappeared from his side.
Where is my father gone? he said, Why did they not
let me know before that he was here? when did he arrive?
O, beg him to come back to me, Juno.
O, honey! said Juno, bless your sweet soul, young
master, old master has not been here. Don't talk, honey.
Let me wash your face wis rose water and cool milk.
Why do you deceive me? he cried pettishly, it is cruel
to trifle with me; go, Juno, and send my man Patrick to me.
Dear heart, you is took sick, took sick, honey. Lie still
one little minute. There, honey. She bathed his face with
the sponge and then went out and returned in a few moments
with Patrick.
O, Patrick, said John, why did you not come and tell
me that my father was here?
Heaven bless you sir, said Patrick, but Mr. Tremlett
has not been here at all.
Why do you all deceive me, he stood here but a moment
since.
30
Faith thin you may depind upon it, sir, but I did not
know of it at all before. And then Patrick whispered
behind
the curtains to Juno that the poor young gentleman was
quite gone out of his senses. Which was not in fact far from
the truth, for he had over-exerted himself and the agitation
of his mind had heightened his fever, and he soon began to
talk wildly and vehemently until, becoming weak and
exhausted
,
he fell into a troubled slumber, which lasted until
past midnight, and when he awoke, the real incidents of the
evening appeared to him like a part of the dream that
haunted
him in his sleep; and he made no more enquiries about his
father, believing that he had only dreamed of seeing him.
From this time he grew better although he still continued to
suffer severely. The fourth day after his cousciousness
returned
,
as he lay in a half dreamy state while Juno bathed his
burning brow with a cooling wash, and his imagination
called
around him a host of beautiful figures, each of them in
some manner reminding him of Fidelia, and yet each unlike
her, Patrick came into his chamber with a very important air
and announced to him that a young lady had just arrived
from the north who insisted on seeing him.
A young lady, Patrick? And, did she send her name?
Faith, sir, she wouldn't, said Patrick, and when they
told her she musn't see you she took on like mad.
Let her come, Patrick, let her come, replied John, for
his mind had been so filled with Fidelia that he could think
of nobody beside her. O, what a dear delight, to have her sit
by his bed-side and soothe him to sleep with her sweet voice,
or to cheer him with her bright and innocent looks when he
awaked from his troubled dreams. But no, she must not see
him, it would endanger her life, and he told Patrick, that she
mnst not be admitted. But before Patrick could leave the
chamber an altercation was heard on the stairs wherein
mingled the voices of the landlord of the hotel, the physician,
Mr. Loudon, and the sobs and supplications of a woman.
Hark! It is not the voice of Fidelia that replies to the
Physician
when he expostulates with her on the danger she incurs
in visiting the sick chamber. And now the kind and earnest
voice of Mr. Loudon is heard.
Consider, my dear young lady, the risk to your life. Let
me beg of you for your own sake as well as for his, that you
defer seeing him for a while. Remember your friends at
home.
O, I cannot be denied, replied the young lady, I
cannot
endure to remain here and not see him. Let me go.
Let me go.
Be composed, Madam, be composed, said the Physician
in a few days he will be well, and then you can see him
without danger to yourself or to him.
No, no, he will die and I shall not see him; do not
hinder
me, I cannot live if you do.
What can we do? said Mr. Loudon.
Let her go in, let her go in, said the landlord's wife who
now joined them upon the stairs, it will do them good,
both; I'll answer for the consequences.
Perhaps your lady is right, said the Doctor to the
landlord
,
madam follow me; but command your feelings in his
presence.
The door of the chamber was immediately opened and the
Physician entered, followed by Julia Tuck leaning upon Mr.
Loudon's arm.
Don't be agitated, said the Physician, as he approached
the bed-side of his patient, and at the same time took the hand
of the young lady and presented her to him. But this was
like a gunner cautioning his piece not to go off as he applied
his match to the priming. His patient was agitated,
dreadfully
so; and Julia no sooner caught sight of his disfigured
and swollen face than she fell senseless in the Physician's
arms. But proper remedies having been applied she soon
revived
again and was able to sit with some degree of
composure
by the bed-side; yet she said nothing, but wept
convulsively
;
and no one spake to her, for they were all touched by
her grief, and even Patrick and Juno sobbed aloud. As to
John, he was stupified with amazement, and could say
nothing
.
What, indeed, could he say? But Mr. Loudon
thinking
that delicacy prevented him from giving utterance to his
feelings while there were so many spectators and listeners,
considerately motioned to them all to withdraw, and the two
unhappy young persons were left alone together.
O, forgive me, forgive me, cried Julia, as she fell upon
her knees by his bed-side.
Rise, rise, he said feebly, rise and do not ask my
forgiveness
.
I am too deeply sensible of the sacrifice you make
for my sake, and it is I that should ask to be forgiven. I am
not entitled to this sacrifice. Believe me. Seriously I am
not. This frightful disease will deprive me of whatever
graces your partiality may have fancied that I possessed, even
though I should recover.
O, do not say so, you will recover; you must recover! I
know that you will. And then she wept, and covered her
face with her hands, for now that she found herself in the
presence of him for whose sake she was willing to peril her
life and even her good name, she was overcome by a sense of
shame and a conviction of the imprudent course she had
taken. Her anxiety of mind and the strength of her passion
had sustained her on her journey, but now she sunk under
her feelings, and could do nothing but sob. But rising, at
last, from her knees, she said; tell me that you will not
despise
me for this, and I will ask no more.
John was touched to the heart by her passionate and
earnest
manner, and he could not but reflect on his own guilt in
allowing her to remain ignorant of his real feelings so long;
and now that she had incurred danger and the reproach of
friends for his sake, what could he do? He could not tell her
under such circumstances that he did not love her, and drive
her from him, in a strange place where she had no protector;
no home. Knowing the vehemence of her nature he feared
that such an announcement might prove fatal to her; and
furthermore he might not live, and if he should die, his secret
would die with him, and she might yet be happy. Luckily
for him the physician came back before he could reply to her
passionate appeal, and motioned to her that it was time to
withdraw. After she left the room he felt his patient's pulse
and perceiving that his fever had increased, cautioned him
against holding long and earnest conversations, and in a very
round-about and delicate manner gave him to understand that
the young lady must not visit him again, until he got much
better. He was a kind-hearted, sympathetic man, although a
learned physician, and so singularly modest that he avoided
every appearance of etiquette or formality with his patients,
and always listened to their complaints as though he derived
great pleasure and instruction therefrom, and sometimes made
them feel as though they really had been doing him a good
turn by relating the full particulars of a long sleepless night
or the effects of an undigested dinner. John was not exactly
one of this class for he fully appreciated the doctor's
kindheartedness
and simplicity of manner, and he almost smiled
at his delicacy of expression in telling him that his new visitor
would not be allowed to sit by him until he got better, for
had the announcement been made to him in the most direct
and positive terms, it would have produced no unhappy effect
upon him, but on the contrary, it would have been one of the
surest means of giving him strength and peace. But this the
doctor could not know, for such a case of
maladie du coeur
as
his patient's, he had probably never met with in his practice
or his books. He gave him a new prescription and withdrew,
leaving him alone to his own reflections, which were
distracting
enough.
The events that we have recorded in so short a space,
occupied
a good portion of the afternoon in their occurrence,
and it was now close upon the edge of night. The short
twilight of a southern sky was rapidly melting into darkness,
and all the objects in the room began to assume a strange
uncertain
aspect when some passing sight or sound recalled to
John's mind the fact that his father's form had visited his
bed-side but a few days before. It flashed upon his memory
with a startling distinctness; he was alarmed, he scarce
knew why, and he was just on the point of calling for his
nurse, when suddenly the same venerable form stood before
him again. He was paralyzed, but hardly with fear. What
had he to dread from his father's form. He tried to move,
but he could not; he tried to speak, but his tongue was
powerless
;
he could not even close his eyes, or turn them away
from the appearance before him. The old man looked upon
him with a tender, compassionate expression, wholly divested
of the care worn and troubled features with which he gazed
upon him before. Then he seemed as if he would speak,
now a holy, calm and happy air of serenity prevaded his
looks. The lineaments of the face seemed unchanged and yet
the young man knew that it no longer belonged to the earth.
O, with what fondness he gazed upon those mild eyes, so full
of purity and love and peace, and how he longed to clasp his
arms around that venerable form. But he knew that he could
not. The barriers of Life and Death were between them,
although
they looked upon each other face to face. How long
his father's form continued to gaze upon him he knew not,
for he soon became unconscious to everything about him, and
when the nurse returned she found him lying with his eyes
wide open, but entirely insensible and incapable of motion.
The physician came and bled him, but it was many hours
before he began to manifest a returning consciousness, which
was first manifested by his making enquiries for his father.
The physician and Mr. Loudon, who had both been sent for,
as they had supposed him to be dying, exchanged significant
glances, and Patrick could scarce be restrained by their looks
from making an exclamation that they were fearful of his
hearing. They had just learned the news of the old
gentleman's
death, and they were afraid if he were informed of it,
that it would prove fatal to him. The intelligence was
brought by Fred Tuck who had followed close upon the heels
of his sister. But they might have told him the sad news
without apprehension of danger, for he knew it already. He
knew it as positively as though he had closed the old man's
eyes and followed him to the grave. But he did not say so.
He knew it himself, and he cared not for others.
A great change had taken place in his feelings. He no
longer wished to live. His father had looked upon him with
his face so full of peace and content, so devoid of care and
pain, of evil and apprehension, that he longed to be with him
and at rest. His sufferings had given him a distaste for life,
and he feared almost to recover. He was embarrassed at the
thought of Julia Tuck, and apprehensive that Fidelia might
spurn him from her presence. There seemed nothing worth
living for, and he turned his back upon his attendants with a
deep sigh, without making a murmer or a complaint.
The physician discovered an alteration in his patient and
he became alarmed; he summoned his consulting brethren
and they came to the conclusion that the young man could
not live. Soon he perceived an alteration in the manner of
his attendants, and of his physician; they regarded him with
solemn looks and moved with a soft and stealthy tread about
his room, and Patrick, his servant, knelt down by his
bedside
and sobbed when they were left alone together; they
gave him but little medicine and no other nourishment than
cooling drinks; and they asked him if he would object to a
visit from a clergyman; the landlord's wife and daughter
came into his chamber and looked upon him with a strange
expression of wonder, and then left him with their
handkerchiefs
to their eyes without speaking a word; a Bible and a
prayer-book were placed within his reach as if by accident,
and they removed the bandages from his hands and did not
attempt
to restrain him from using them; his black nurse, Juno,
sang a methodistic hymn to him, in a low soft voice full of
simple ejaculations of happiness and glory; and bye and bye
there came to him a venerable old man, dressed in black, with
long white locks flowing over his shoulders but with a ruddy
healthy face and a clear soft eye, and he sat down by the
bedside
and talked of Christ and his atoning blood, of the joys of
Heaven and the ills of earth; and then knelt down and prayed
long and devoutly. All these things soothed his mind; and
he felt himself growing weaker and weaker, sinking, sinking,
and he knew that he must die. But he felt no dread, no
apprehension
;not
even a wish to recover. This gentle,
peaceful
sinking into the arms of death was slightly disturbed by the
entrance of Fred Tuck into his chamber accompanied by Mr.
Loudon and the physician; they gathered around his bed
with sad looks and tearful eyes; and Mr. Loudon told him
that his father was no more. To their amazement, he
showed
no surprise, not even grief; and they attributed his
stillness
to weakness and his own near approach to death. Tears
fell from all their eyes but his. Why should he weep? He
had seen his father and knew that he was happy, and he
would soon be with him never again to be parted.
Presently they all withdrew from his sight but Mr. Loudon
and the Physician. The merchant attempted to speak to him,
but his voice choaked and he sat down and wept. Then the
physician took his place and asked his patient if he had any
requests to make in case that he should not recover, and told
him with great tenderness and feeling that he had no longer
power to aid him, and that he hoped his mind had been
reconciled
to a change of scene. Even this announcement that
they had feared to make to him, he heard without emotion.
But he requested that a lawyer might be sent for that he
might dictate a will to him. He had Jeremiah and Fidelia
in his thoughts, and he would not have them think that he
had died forgetful of them.
But before the lawyer came, Julia Tuck was led into the
room by her brother. She had been told that young
Tremlett
must die, and she gave herself up to distracting grief.
She threw herself upon his bed and declared that she would
die with him; and her brother, who had seen her a thousand
times in paroxyms of grief, without being moved, now wept
with her. It was like a leaf from a novel, and it touched his
heart. Suddenly, however, this young gentleman was seized
with an idea that had a most powerful influence in drying up
his tears. Young Tremlett was going to die for a certainty,
but there was no immediate cause for apprehending the
dissolution
of his sister. Why not, then, let them be married
that she might inherit his property, and then if she should die,
he and his brother would inherit it from her. Happy thought!
Most brilliant conception! He could scarce refrain from
laughing, in the ecstacy of his joy, surrounded even as he
was with so much sadness and grief. Full of this grand
idea, he caused his sister to be removed to her own
apartments
,
and went in pursuit of Mr. Loudon who had already
left. He found the merchant on his wharf engaged in
sampling
cotton, but he drew him aside and told him that he had
discovered that a necessity existed for the marriage of young
Tremlett and his sister Julia, to save her family from disgrace,
and begged that he would make use of his influence with the
dying man to bring the marriage about before it should be too
late; he would have offered him a bribe, if he had dared to do
so, but there was no need; his story appeared so plausible to
Mr. Loudon, and he had become so much interested in the
young lady, and perhaps had a shadowy thought that where
so much property was at stake some of it might possibly
fall into his hands, either as commissions or in some other
way, that he listened attentively to the young gentleman's
request
,
and promised to exert himself immediately in his behalf.
As death might interfere and frustrate their project if it were
delayed too long, they resolved to lose no time. So Mr.
Loudon
31
sent one of his servants to Doctor Esyman, the
clergyman
who had already paid John a visit, requesting him to
call immediately at the hotel, where the sick man lay, with
his gown and prayer-book; and then they called together
upon the physician, who confessed, upon hearing the
proposition
from Mr. Loudon, that he had already made up his mind
that a necessity for the marriage did exist, for in no other way
could he account for the young lady's conduct; and having
heard that not only she, but her supposed lover, was
possessed
of a very large fortune, promised to give his aid in
promoting
the marriage. Who could tell what might come of doing
a good turn to rich people. So they took themselves
immediately
to the hotel, reflecting silently as they went on the
uncertainties of life and death, the inconsiderateness of youth
and the chances of getting something bye and bye for their
disinterested
benevolence; the physician regretting that he had
not been the first to propose the marriage, and the merchant
wondering that he had not himself thought of the same thing,
since the circumstances of the case were so very suspicious.
When they arrived at the hotel, they were met in the bar-room
by good Doctor Esyman dressed in his gown and bands, with
his prayer-book in his hand ready to execute any orders in
his line. The good old doctor had also heard that young
Tremlett was likely to fall into a great estate if he should live,
and with that instinctive reverence for the possessor of a
fortune
which all men feel, but no man will acknowledge, he
had moved with a greater degree of alacrity, perhaps, than
he might have done, if the sick man had been a pauper or a
slave. Good old doctor Esyman was as little influenced by
worldly considerations as a man well could be, and we would
not insinuate the slightest word against the purity of his
morals, the soundness of his doctrines, or the benevolence of
his disposition. The doctor's conduct has always been above
suspicion, but he had a large family whose wants had
imperceptibly
led him to look upon the possessor of a fortune as a
being entitled to a good deal of consideration; and there were
the most exaggerated reports flying about the circle in which
the pious man travelled, relating to the dying man's wealth;
some making him worth at least ten millions, whilst others
reduced the amount to less than five. But it is our office to
chronicle men's actions and not to scrutinize their motives.
The fact is undeniable that the merchant and the physician
found the D. D. at the hotel when they arrived there, and
that he no sooner heard their proposition than he declared
that it was a highly benevolent and proper enterprise, and that
he would join them in promoting it, and he undertook to
prepare
the mind of the young lady, while they agreed to arrange
matters with John.
How exceedingly hateful is sin. How universally is
wrongdoing
condemned. It is hard to reconcile the existence of so
much evil as yet remains in the world, with so much
virtuous
indignation towards wrong-doers as finds a place in
every human breast. We doubt if any of our readers ever
knew an individual so utterly abandoned and graceless as not
to reprobate the evil acts of others.
When Mr. Loudon and the physician entered the chamber
of the dying youth on their benevolent business, they
experienced
a kind of conscious integrity that they had not felt on
their former visits, when they did not know that he had
been guilty of a very improper, not to say sinful act; and
they looked upon him, weak and sinking as he was, with
perhaps the least possible glow of indignation for his
youthful
indiscretion; he was by far too well off in the world,
miserable as he appeared, to be despised, let his crimes have
been what they might. Poor youth, it would be doing him a
good service of which he would not perhaps be sensible while
he lingered on the confines of this world, to compel him to
make what reparation he could to an injured fellow mortal,
and that fellow mortal a wealthy young lady too; it was
worth trying for, at least. They stood and looked at each
other for some moments, each waiting for the other to begin,
and at last, the merchant, after clearing his throat with a good
deal of difficulty, spoke to the poor feeble youth, who looked
up with a faint expression of wonder, as if anticipating
something
strange, but was entirely at a loss to conceive its
import
.
Hem! hem! once I was young myself, said Mr.
Loudon
,
and if I had died then, hem! there would have been
many acts, hem! that would have troubled my mind. Here
he stopped as if he expected his auditor to make some reply,
but he only looked up with an approving glance as much as
to say, he had not the slightest doubt of it. The physician
had been sitting during this short address with his hand to his
eyes, but perceiving that his coadjutor had completely run
aground, and that the object of their visit was likely to be
frustrated for the want of a proper explanation, he took up the
subject where Mr. Loudon had dropped it and thus went on.
Hem! Yes. But it is the duty of every one, young and
old, whether in the immediate prospect of death or not, to
make all the reparation in his power to whomsoever he may
have wronged. It is a painful thing to me, my young friend,
to name a subject to you that cannot but cause you much
uneasiness. I would be spared this duty if I could. But,
situated as I am, hem, and feeling a natural desire to promote
the welfare, both temporal and spiritual of those whom
Providence
,
in a manner, brings me as it were, by its inscrutable
ways in contact, I have undertaken as a friend to both parties
to break this subject to you. Hem! The young lady,
possessing
,
no doubt, some of the weaknesses as well as many of
the virtues of her sex, who has evinced such a strong sympathy
for your welfare, bringing in a manner the censure of the
world upon herself and shame upon her friends, and
sacrificing
the proprieties of life for your sake, has established a
claim upon your gratitude and affections; and it appears to
us that it would be making her but a slight return for her
sacrifices to submit to the ceremony of a marriage, that her
reputation and your own conscience may both be washed
from their stains. Hem! Here the orator rested, naturally
expecting a reply. But no reply was made. For the young
man, already exhausted by the events of the day, now
entirely
overcome, had fallen into a deep but quiet slumber. His
breathing was so low and still, that at first they thought he
was dead; and while they were debating whether it were
best to awaken him, and make their proposition to him a-new
in a more formal and decided manner, Doctor Esyman and
Fred Tuck appeared at the door with Julia between them,
and their entrance awoke him. He looked up at them, and
a cold shudder shook her frame as she saw how dim and
lustreless were his once bright eyes. The good old
clergyman
pressed her cold and clammy hands and whispered in
her ear, bidding her remember that a time would come when
she and her lover would meet never more to be separated.
A rumor of the marriage had spread through the house,
and the room was filled with strange people, mostly women,
who would have hesitated through fear to visit the dying
man, but were impelled by curiosity to encounter the risk of
taking his disease. As John saw them crowding about his
bed, with wonder-stricken looks he thought that they had come
to see him die, and this thought was confirmed when the
venerable doctor planted himself near, with his prayer book
open in his hand. But he soon discovered what they were
about to do. Julia was placed close to his side, pale and
trembling, and supported by her brother Fred, who, fearing
that the bridegroom might not live for the ceremony to be
consummated, motioned to the doctor to being the rites;
whereupon the venerable man wiped the moisture from his
spectacles and began the solemn service. There was a
deathlike
stillness in the chamber, which was rendered more solemn
by the suppressed sobs of the bride. John had scarce strength
to oppose the ceremony if he had been disposed to do so, but
as he looked upon Julia, his heart reproved him for his
culpable
negligence in not informing her of the true state of his
feelings, in time to save her from the trial that she was
undergoing
for his sake, and feeling that his end was so near at
hand, it seemed to him of little moment what mere ceremony
were performed over his unresisting body. In a few hours
and all would be over. Mr. Loudon gave away the bride,
and as the reverend doctor pronounced, in a trembling voice,
the closing words of the ceremony; the Lord mercifully
with his favor look upon you, and fill you with all
benediction
and grace, that you may so live together in this life, that
in the world to come you may have life everlasting, she fell
into the arms of her brother and was borne away to her own
apartment with scarce a sign of life. As for the newly made
bridegroom, he had hardly shown any consciousnes, during
the ceremony, and his hand was placed in hers without any
effort on his part either to withdraw it or to extend it; and he
now closed his eyes, as if for the last time, and turned his head
to the wall. The doctor having his prayer-book still open,
and witnessing the extreme case of the poor youth, without
turning a leaf, continued to read on from the order for the
visition
of the sick; Take, therefore, in gentle part, the
chastisement
of the Lord &c.
Fred Tuck soon returned from his sister's apartment with
a written certificate of the marriage which he caused all
present
to sign, who could write their names, and then deposited
it with Mr. Loudon, to prevent accidents. In the flush of
the moment, while his spirits were bright and joyous, and his
heart was overflowing with gratitude, he took out his
pocket-book
and handed Doctor Esyman a fifty dollar bill, assuring
him that it was a mere trifle to what should follow. But we
must be just to the good doctor and bear witness to the fact
that he declared with many blushes that it was entirely too
large a sum, and protested against it, although he made no
motion to return it, but tucked it cautiously under the belt of
his robe.
This marriage was a thing to talk about, and as the
landlord's
lady and daughter, were not destitute of gossiping
acquanitainces
,
there were not many families in Charleston that
had not discussed the strange affair with that kind of freedom
and interest with which affairs are discussed by those who
have no possible interest in them, before they retired to their
beds that night; and the fortunes of the two young persons,
the amount of which they did not know themselves, grew, as
the report passed from mouth to mouth from half a million at
first up to twenty or thirty millions; and every circumstance
attending the marriage was magnified in like proportion. We
do not condemn this very natural inclination of the world to
pry into other people's affairs, for if every man and woman
minded his and her own business solely, and paid no
attention
to their neighbors, who would read this history? We
only regret that there are not more anxious enquiries into
other people's affairs. For some reason that we cannot
clearly
resolve ourselves, there does not appear to be that feverish
anxiety to learn the particulars of our Hero's fate, now that it
may be obtained in an authentic shape, and on reliable
testimony
,
that was manifested by the public when only idle
reports
in relation thereto were flying about from mouth to
mouth. A friend of ours whose judgment we are disposed
to put faith in, tells us it is owing to the want of an
international
copy-right. Perhaps he may be correct; we hope it
is for no worse cause.
The next morning after the marriage, the bride groom
awoke, after a long night's refreshing sleep, such as he had
not experienced before since his illness, and very much to his
surprise felt within him promptings for breakfast. He had
closed his eyes, expecting never to open them again until the
great trump should arouse him, and now he was wide awake
with his thoughts dwelling upon coffee and toast. Marvellous
change! But it was true. His life had been saved by his
physicians giving him up. They had ceased giving him
medicine
,
and Nature had been left free to regain her authority;
his fever was gone, and although he was still exceedingly
feeble, he felt the glow and invigorating influences of
returning
health. The house was still silent although he saw the
sun lighting up the white spire of a church visible from his
chamber window; and his chamber was deserted by all but
his faithful nurse who was sleeping in a rocking-chair near
his bed side.
This woman had watched over him with the tenderest care
during his sickness, and her gentle and affectionate manner,
had won upon his good will; for her attention, though
involuntary
at first, seemed to be prompted solely by kindly
regard
.
He forgot that she was a slave, acting in obedience to
the commands, not of her master, but her owner; and she
seemed scarcely conscious of the relation which she bore to
him. They were both human beings, and why should they
not regard each other with kindly sympathies? She was not
more than twenty-five, although a good nurse, and her form
having been left free to mature without the aid of a mantua
maker, was perfect in shape and as graceful as health and
content could render it. Her complexion though dusky was
warm and glowing, resembling a ripe peach more than any
other object in nature, and told that there was more of the free
blood of the Saxon race in her veins, than of the slave race
of Africa, her hair was black and glossy and her full black
eyes, gave her a voluptuous air that well became her name.
Having always been employed as a house servant, and
enjoyed
priveliges which her faithful conduct gained for her, she
had learned a gracefulness of manner, rarely seen in her
unfortunate
race. But she was a slave, and her present owner
had purchased her at the public sale of one of his neighbors,
effects.
She awoke very soon, and perceiving that her charge was
already awake, and apparently better; she jumped up with
great glee, and exclaimed, O, honey, bless God, master,
you are still there. Are you better, honey.
I am much better Juno, replied John, I feel now as
though I should get well. I want something to eat, Juno.
The faithful creature laughed outright, Bless the Lord,
young master, she said, I'll tell master doctor, and he will
give you everything to eat. But I am afraid to give you
anything
,
honey; it might bring on your fever again.
Then I must wait until he comes; but you can give me
some lemonade, Juno; there that will do. And now Juno
bring me the glass that I may see myself once more. Ah, ah,
I am sadly altered, he said as he surveyed his features in the
glass, do you think anybody will know me after this,
Juno?
O, honey, your wife will know you, she will know you.
O, honey! she turned away her head and wiped a tear from
her cheek as she spoke.
My wife! my wife! Juno! what do you mean by my
wife?
O, blessed Lord, master, do you forget? Have you
forgotten
about last night?
God help me, Juno, he exclaimed clasping his hands
together; Was that real? It seemed like a dream. But I
remember now. O, Juno, I am sick again. O, Juno, I must
die. O, my father! O, Fidelia! God help me, Juno, I am
very sick.
O honey! Wait for master doctor. Wait and see for
him. Blessed Lord, master, you musn't die. She poured
out a tea-spoonful of morphine and begged him to swallow it,
but he refused. He closed his eyes and lay a long while
without speaking; but he was aroused at last by the entrance
of the physician, who was surprised to find him not only alive
but evidently better. He had now considerable fever, but
32
when the physician learned from Juno, that he had asked for
something to eat, he ordered him a bowl of gruel.
So, then I am married, said John, looking reproachfully
at the physician.
Hem! yes, and I ought perhaps, to have informed you
that your lady would not have deserted you at this time, but
she has been, herself, very ill all night. I have this moment
come from her room and I fear that she has taken your
complaint
.
And how did the marriage happen, why was it? Did I
express a wish for it? I am afraid that my poor head has
been disordered.
Be composed, sir, said the physician, be composed, and
we will explain matters to you fully bye and bye. You will
be satisfied when you hear all. Don't be alarmed about
your lady; she is quite ill now, but as soon as she gets better
she shall come to you. And then the doctor withdrew, after
giving some directions to Juno about the gruel.
In spite of John's anguish of mind, which was very intense
when he reflected on the double misfortune of the loss of
his father and his acquisition of a wife, he grew better hourly,
while Julia grew worse; it was very soon evident that her
disorder was
varioloid
, and that she had caught it from
visiting
his chamber there could be no doubt. The symptoms of
the disorder were very alarming in the commencement, and
the increasing heat of the weather made her situation more
precarious. Her brother was unceasing in his attentions, and
as her danger increased and John grew well, he began to
think that he had been digging a pit to bury himself in.
It was the fifth day after the marriage; John had so far
recovered
as to be able to sit up part of the day, and he had
just composed himself in his easy-chair when Mr. Loudon
came into his room with a terrified look, and announced to
him that Julia was dying. Although he was still too feeble
to leave his room, yet he insisted upon being carried to her
bed-side, and he reached there just as she had breathed her
last breath. He looked upon her with a kind of
stupefaction
,
from which he was scarcely aroused by the dismal
moans of her brother Fred, who wept over her with
unaffected
sorrow. All his hopes of wealth were blasted by her
death. He saw in a moment the hopeless and desperate
condition in which he had placed himself and his brother
and mother by causing her to be married. They were all
now at the mercy of young Tremlett, and he dreaded the
reproaches of his brother, and more serious consequences
which he knew must follow this disastrous termination of all
his plans and schemes. But John, who had never thought
about the property which his marriage had given him a title
to, commisserated Fred's unhappy condition and did what he
could to comfort him; but as he did not know the real cause
of his grief, his words had but little effect. For himself, he
was rejoiced that he could hide his real feelings under an
unassumed deportment of silence and seriousness. And he
was taken back to his own apartment where he was allowed
to remain in the undisturbed enjoyment of his own sad
thoughts.
The funeral of Julia was not long delayed, and her brother
Fred returned to give an account of his proceedings to his
mother and brother, leaving John behind him, who in another
week followed, quite restored to health, and with but small
marks of his disorder remaining in his face. His mind had
been awakened to the changes and uncertainties of life, and
as soon as he was strong enough he had his will drawn up
in due form and deposited it with Mr. Loudon, whom he
appointed
his agent for Charleston. The good doctor Esyman,
and his physician, both received handsome presents from him,
and to Juno, his faithful nurse, he would have given the
highest gift that can be bestowed upon the children of God
her freedom. But Mr. Loudon refused to sell her, although
John tempted him by offering a very large sum for her. I
was a point of honor, and he could not insist upon
purchasing
her freedom without offence. He had been indebted
to her owner for her services, which were freely offered, and
it would have been but a poor return for the hospitality of his
friend to deprive him of his slave. The poor creature wept
bitterly at parting with him; she kissed his hand and bathed
it in her tears, and called upon God to bless him and protect
him. The last words that rung in his ears and made the
deepest impression upon his heart was her fond expression,
O, honey, you will never see Juno again, O honey!
He was now returning to New York after an absence of
less than a month, strangely altered in his fortunes. He was
the sole possessor of the entire wealth of Tremlett & Tuck,
but the right which he had acquired to Julia's portion he
determined to relinquish to her brothers. It was a large sum
to give up, but he felt that he had no right to keep it; and as
he had been the means of depriving them of their sister, he
looked upon the money as of trifling importance when
compared
with their loss.
It is proper to add here, that before leaving Charleston, he
made arrangements for a marble tablet to be placed over the
remains of Julia, and entrusted to his friend, Mr. Loudon, the
charge of its execution.
BOOK IV.
CHAPTER I.
YOUNG TREMLETT RETURNS TO NEW YORK AND RECEIVES
AN UNLOOKED VISITOR.
ALTHOUGH John hastened with all possible speed to
New York, anxious as he was to meet the friends that
were still dear to him, and to re-visit the places that had been
sanctified by the presence of his earliest, his first and almost
his only friend;his more than father; he looked forward
with dread to a meeting with Mrs. Tuck, for he had no
consolation
to offer to the proud and bereaved mother; and
though he longed once more to see Fidelia, he hardly dared
to think of her, for what could he say to her, when he had
offered her a free undivided heart but a few weeks before, and
now must come to her in the character of a widower. But
these thoughts gradually gave away to grief for his father as
he approached nearer and nearer to his now sad and desolate
house. It was late in the evening when he reached the hall
door, and as he pulled the bell, he was obliged to lean against
the pillars for support. He found Mrs. Swazey and Jeremiah
sitting in the back parlor, and they both caught hold of his
hands together, but neither could speak a word. All three
sat down and wept in silence. They knew each other's
thoughts well, and there was no need of words to
communicate
them. The servants stood looking in at the door anxious
to speak to young Tremlett, and to tell him how rejoiced they
were to see him again and to condole with him in his
affliction
,
but not knowing how to begin they soon withdrew to
greet Patrick, who now came in with the baggage, and to
learn from him the particulars of his adventures.
Mrs. Swazey was the first to break silence, for having
given the freest vent to her grief it was soonest exhausted.
That dear good soul is gone, said the old lady,
precious
heart, if the dear Lord had only spared him to see you
again, he would have gone as happy as a little child. But
he went off as quiet as a lamb, and talked beautifully. Didn't
he, Jeremiah? O, if he isn't happy I don't know who is. It
will be hard for us if he isn't. And such a funeral, it would
have done your heart good. They say it was the longest
procession ever known, and when they got to the comentary
the minister made as beautiful a prayer as ever was heard.
They say it was lovely. Everybody was there, and there
was a long piece in the papers about it. I've got it cut out to
show you. Dear Lord! And there you was almost dying in
that dreadful place all the time, O, it was too much. Here
the old lady indulged in a fresh flood of tears, when Jeremiah
to save his young friend from a fresh infliction of her
eloquent grief, took a candle and motioned to him to follow
him. They went up stairs into the old gentleman's room
which had not been disturbed since his death, and Jeremiah
proposed that they should strive for consolation and support
in prayer, and he then knelt down and prayed in a low
solemn voice; and his words calmed their feelings, so that
at the end they were enabled to speak together placidly and
without tears. John requested Jeremiah to remain in the
house that night, but begged to be left alone in his father's
chamber, that he might indulge, undisturbed, in the feelings
which a sight of his apparel and the furniture of his room
awakened. They embraced each other, and Jeremiah
withdrew
.
John looked around the room, but he could see nothing
distinctly; his eyes were blinded with tears and he threw
himself upon the bed where he lay a long while, until he
was disturbed by a gentle tap at the door. It was Mrs.
Swazey. Thank my dear God, for this, said the old lady,
as she sat down her chamber lamp, and threw her arms
around him and kissed him, precious heart, I dream't every
night I seen you as plain as I do now; but don't stay in this
room, my child; there is your own chamber prepared for
you. I have had the new chintz curtains put up, and you
will be more comfortable than you can be here.
I must sleep here to night, mother; to-morrow I will
go into the other room, but to night I must remain here.
Well, well; you shall do as you wish; Thank my dear
God! I shall sleep happy this night, and then the old lady
kissed him once more, and bade him good night.
He threw himself upon the bed again where he lay until
past midnight, his mind dwelling upon the past scenes of his
life, and sometimes conjuring up scenes of the future; the
house was still as a tomb, the candle burned low in its socket
and after flickering awhile, seemingly struggling to retain its
hold upon the exhausted wick, at last went out and left him
in complete darkness. Thus he thought his good old father
had died. The thought rather tranquilized than disturbed
his mind, for it suggested no image of pain or violence, and
he might have fallen asleep, had not this quiet thought called
up in his recollection the peaceful happy look of his father's
face as he had dreamed of seeing it while he lay sick in
Charleston. But, was it a dream? No. He now
remembered
how distinct the appearance had been; the impression it
had made upon his mind; and the certainty of its being a
real apparition and not a fantasy of the brain, for the event
which he felt it foretold, had happened exactly at the time
when the shade of his father first appeared to him. He had
forgotten these things until this moment; why, he could
not conceive; for they had made a deep impression upon his
mind, and his blood chilled as he thought of them. He
wished
,
and yet he dreaded to see his father again. He was not
superstitious; he had never been troubled by idle fears; but
the thought of being visited by a disembodied spirit, even
though it was the spirit of one whom he had loved, and who
could only come to him from motives of peace and good will,
terrified him, and his heart beat quick, and the sweat started
upon his forehead, as the probability of the same apparition
again presenting itself occurred to him. All the stories that
he had ever read or heard of spirits, rushed through his mind,
and all the arguments that he had ever heard made use of in
favor of spectral appearances came up fresh in his memory.
And, notwithstanding that he had never been at a loss for a
refutation, he could think of nothing now to urge against their
speciousness. He would have called to Jeremiah who slept
in the next room, but a strange feeling of awe had taken
possession
of him, the very darkness seemed like palpable fetters
upon him, he could neither move nor speak; or he felt that
he could not, at least; and yet he knew of no reason why he
should not. Of one thing he was certain. He was wide
awake, in the full possession of his faculties, and entirely free
from fever. Yes, it might have been a hallucination before,
but now, come what might, he could not be deceived. Hardly
had this thought filled his mind, when his father again stood
by his side. He saw him as plainly as he had ever seen him
when alive; there was no glare of light, nothing strange,
nothing
to affright him; there he stood and gazed upon him
with a fixed, calm, and happy look. Although the
apprehension
of seeing the venerable shade again had filled him with
terror, now that he beheld it, he experienced no fear, but
rather
a holy, calm delight. He knew it was love, that called
him there, love that survives death. He did not speak aloud,
but he seemed to commune with the spirit, and he knew that
his own thoughts were understood. A strange feeling of
numbness suddenly came over him, he lost all consciousness
of thought or feeling; the apparition was gone; he opened
his eyes and it was light. The sun was streaming into his
window, the tread of feet was heard on the pavement, and the
distant rumble of carriage wheels mingled with the shrill
voices of perambulating merchandizers crying their wares,
filled his ears. The old familiar sights and sounds around
him, assured him that he still belonged to the eating,
bargaining
and working world. Presently Jeremiah opened his
door.
What, are you already dressed? said Jeremiah.
I am already dressed, because I have not been undressed,
replied he, O, Jeremiah, I have seen He checked
himself suddenly, and changed his subject. He was afraid
to say what he had seen. And it was a strange thing, but
he thought after all that he might have been in a dream.
The news of John's arrival was soon noised about, not
only among his own immediate acquaintances, but among
the public at large, for his great wealth, and the respectability
of his father, made him a personage of sufficient consequence
to have his arrival chronicled in the public prints; and the
small papers contained the most wonderful particulars of his
history, wonderful from their utter dissimilarity to the truth,
for which they were reproved by the larger papers which
corrected
the errors of their tiny contemporaries by counter
statements
still more wonderfully incorrect. However, these
things all tended to bring him into notice, and he found
himself
beset by a host of particular friends whose existence he
had been living in most unfortunate ignorance of until that
time. Before he left the house Tom Tuck made his
appearance
.
Their meeting was respectful, but solemn. No
allusion
33
was made to Julia, and after a few common-place
observations
,
they parted, promising to see each other in the
evening
.
Jeremiah now informed John that the business of the
house had been entirely suspended, waiting for his return,
and that it was necessary to take immediate steps for the
settlement
of the estate, as many of the holders of the obligations
of the house were impatient for their money. As John was
ignorant of the proper steps to be taken, he called upon his
father's lawyer, Mr. Polesworthy, for advice. And this
gentleman
told him that the estate must be settled by the
executors
named in the will, and asked their names. The will,
said John, where is the will, Jeremiah? But Jeremiah
had not seen it. So they returned together, to the house, and
searched in the desk and private drawers of the old gentleman
but no will was there. They rummaged his apartment
through and through; they examined the pockets of all his
clothes; they broke open chests; they tore open bundles of
papers; they ransacked in the cellar; they searched in the
garret; they left no hole or corner unexamined, but they
found no will. Then they went down to the counting room
and searched all the pigeon-holes of his desk; they untied
all the bundles of old letters and invoices that had been lying
on top shelves and in dark corners collecting dust for years;
but no will was found. Mr. Polesworthy had assisted in
drawing up a will five years before, and two of the students
in his office, one of whom had removed to Illinois and the
other to Arkansas had witnessed it; the other witness was
the Junior partner, Mr. Tuck. Perhaps it had been
deposited
in the Bank, of which the old gentleman had been a
director
,
for safe keeping. But, upon enquiry they found that it
had not been. Then they re-examined all the places that
they had searched before but still without success. The
will could not be found. The whole day was consumed in
this wearying business, and at night John sank down
exhausted
with the fatigue he had undergone, and bewildered at the
strange event. Mr. Polesworthy had cautioned him not to
mention the circumstance of the missing will, but when Tom
Tuck called upon him at night, he told him of it in
confidence
.
Tom was amazed to hear it. And knowing the
prudent
,
methodical habits of Mr. Tremlett, he feared that it must
have been destroyed by accident.
It will be a horrible, wretched, dismal business, if no will
can be found said Tom Tuck, all that money may go to
the people, confound them, and you will be left without a
copper. Something must be done to prevent it.
I do not see what can be done. I will submit without a
murmur if I cannot get possession, in an honest manner, of the
property which I know my father intended for me.
Well, I am no philosopher myself, said Mr. Tuck, and
if I were in your place, I would curse like a pirate about it, if
I did nothing else. But I would be even with the Law, you
know; and when the Law, which is always a villain, and
takes the part of villains, because if there were no villainy
there would be no Law, attempts to cheat me out of my
rights, I am an ass if I don't do my best to cheat the Law.
But the Law is framed on general principles, and is no
doubt correct; if I have to suffer from its operation it is my
misfortune, and not the fault of the Law.
Ha, ha, ha! Excuse me for laughing, said Tom, ha,
ha, ha, but his laughter needed no excuse; there was not a
bit of merriment in it. Your apology for the Law is its
severest condemnation. The devil himself could not quote
his own damnation out of scripture, more adroitly. It
is the curse of the Law that it
is
framed on general principles,
but must have an individual application; and the chances
are, that nine times out of ten it will not meet the merits of the
case where it is applied. So that you see in a government of
laws there will generally be more injustice perpetrated than
in a pure despotism. With us the people are the Despot;
but instead of giving audience to his subjects and awarding
justice according to their varying claims, like other despots,
out of pure indolence, or want of knowing better, he frames
a set of rules, which he calls laws, and compels all his
subjects to be measured by them without any reference to
their peculiar wants. But this is not the worst of it. The
law-makers are not the administrators of the law. One body
makes the laws and another construes them, and as there is
no positive meaning to words, it frequently happens, and
indeed
it almost always happens, that the man who construes
the law, finds in it a meaning very different from what the
maker of it intended. Then look again at the absurd want of
checks and counterbalances in such a system of villany and
fraud; here are about a dozen courts for the commission of
errors and only one for the correction of them. This all
appears
absurd enough, I dare say, even to you who would
apologise for it, but there is something still more absurd, still
more wicked, still more deeply, damnably mulish than all
this. The law-makers themselves know nothing about law
as a study, but those who apply the law must study seven
years before they can be licensed to do so; and what do you
suppose their studies must be? Don't laugh, or rather don't
weep, for only the Devil himself could have the heart to
laugh at such an instance of human folly,why, Greek and
Latin poets; and then after a case has been submitted to all
these hard students in the law, and been adjudged and sat
upon by one Judge after another, going up by regular steps
out of one court into another above, the last place of appeal
is to a set of Judges again who are required to know nothing,
not even their alphabet, much less Greek and Latin, and they
have the power to reverse all the decisions made by their
betters, and from their decision there is no appeal.
But surely you are in error as to the qualifications of a
lawyer, said John, who had listened to this wrathful tirade
with a very serious countenance.
Not a bit of it. I know a gentleman who was what they
call a self-taught man. He began life by teaching a school;
he afterwards became famous as an orator; he was then two
years clerk of one of the higher courts; after this he had a
seat on the bench, where he served four years in the capacity
of a Judge. Afterwards, he became ambitious of legal honors,
and he applied for admission to the bar; the judges of the
Supreme Court, in consideration of the stations he had
occupied
,
decided that he might be admitted to practice as an
attorney
in the lowest courts after four years of probationary
study in a lawyer's office; and at the same time they awarded
three years study to his own son, a boy of eighteen, because
he procured a certificate from his father of having pursued
classical studies under his tuition for four years. The father,
poor man, was doomed to one year more, because he could
produce no certificate, he having been his own instructor.
But, you would not abolish all law? said John.
Yes I would, replied Tom, my friend the great
Jupiter
Grizzle, has been doing a prosperous business for more than
forty years, and he tells me that he has never once resorted
to law during the whole time.
But what would the unprosperous do? How could they
get redress when they had been injured?
Precisely as they try to get it now, but always fail. As
the People are the Despot, as I before stated, they should
always
sit, that is, agents appointed by them, to hear the
complaints
of their subjects and award justice according to the
circumstances of the parties and not in conformity to the
practice
of their ancestors, or of England or Rome, a thousand
years before. Here's a case exactly in point. The brothers
Tuck are indebted to Morphine & Nephews a thousand
dollars
,
for a balance due them on an exchange operation; now,
the money is due, and any two or three intelligent men who
should hear the case from the parties would decide without
hesitation that the money must be paid; but it is not
convenient
for the Brothers Tuck to pay it, so they allow
themselves
to be sued, and the law allows them to file objection after
objection, all based upon some allowable legal lie, by which
means judgement is delayed some two or three years, and
when at last the plaintiffs get their suit, the defendants are
bankrupts, and in addition to the original debt, the Messrs.
Morphine lose a large bill of costs.
Even though we should not succeed in finding my father's
will, said John, who did not appear to have been listening
to this last ingenious illustration, I can appeal to the
legislature
and they can pass a special law giving me possession
of what I should but for an accident have been legally
entitled
to.
Tom shook his head and smiled in his peculiar manner.
No, no, our legislators always look at the wrong side of a
question first. How much will it cost? is the first
consideration
;
is it right and proper? comes afterwards. I am not
much of a politician, and know but little about public affairs;
but this I do know; I have never in any one instance seen
a report of any debate upon any great subject in either the
state or national assemblies, wherein it was discussed
upon
any higher principle than as a mere matter of dollars and
cents. You could have no hope from the legislature. They
would not give up their claim upon half a million of dollars
to render an act of justice to an individual.
Perhaps you are right. I will not allow myself to be
disheartened
even though I do not recover a shilling. My
father commenced life as poor as I can be now; and with his
example before me I have no fears of success.
You can afford to take matters coolly, with my sister's
share of my uncle's property at your command. I should
have no fears of success myself, with such a foundation as
that to build upon.
I had not calculated on that, said John, with a
hesitation
in his manner, I did not mean to claim your sister's
fortune.
Tom looked at him a moment as though he doubted his
seriousness, but showed no surprise himself, although he
could scarce refrain from jumping out of the window, so
excited
did this short speech render him, but said deliberately,
I knew that you would not, and so I assured my mother,
who, it is true, cares nothing for the money, so overcome has
she been since the death of my poor sister. Here he pulled
out his pocket handkerchief and held it to his eyes nearly
five minutes, during which John thought to himself it would
be as well to consult Mr. Polesworthy before he made any
positive declaration of his intentions. So he made no farther
remarks about Julia's fortune.
Poor Julia! said Tom, you must excuse this weakness
but you cannot understand my feelings; you have never
lost a sister. I will try to forget her now. I have a
proposition
to make to you. If no will can be found, it is clear
enough that you will not be able to recover a dollar of your
father's property, and it would be hard to take from you the
property to which you are entitled by your marriage with my
sister, and yet it is hard that I and my mother and brother
should be deprived of it since it, belongs to us by right. Now
if you are willing, we will continue the business of Tremlett
& Tuck, on the capital of my uncle, giving you full claim to
the capital, and dividing the profits, one half to myself and
the other half equally between my mother and brother and
yourself. The house is well known, has an established
credit, good correspondents, and being continued in the same
name, one half the world will not know that there has been
any change; in a few years we shall all be able to retire with
handsome fortunes.
I like your proposition well, said John, but it strikes
me that you make too unequal a division of the profits.
Ah, but consider my experience, and that I shall have
half the business to do myself, if not the whole of it, replied
this singularly modest merchant, and then remember that I
relinquish to you the whole of my sister's fortune.
There is something in that thought John, so he acquiesed
in the division of the profits, but, he said, I should be
glad to include Jeremiah in the partnership, even though I
had to allow him a portion of my own profits.
No, that I won't consent to. Jernegan is a good clerk
enough, but, I wouldn't have such a fellow for a partner.
Well, I will not insist upon it, said John, but it would
gratify me, and I doubt not prove of advantage in the end;
but one thing I must stipulate for, and that is that he be allowed
to retain the situation which he has held in the old firm, and
at the same salary. And I should be glad for all the old
clerks to be retained, who may wish to remain.
We will not quarrel about them, replied Tom, and now
I am so well satisfied with this arrangement, you must go with
me and see my mother; it will be a painful meeting, I know,
but it has got to take place, and the sooner it's over the better
for all of us.
John would have been glad to put off the meeting with Mrs.
Tuck, but it was his duty to go and he could not refuse. So
he accompanied his new partner to his mother's house.
Perhaps our readers will think that the senior Tuck
evinced
a degree of generosity in proposing this arrangement at
variance with his former actions. But no man can act
contrary
to his nature. Tom Tuck knew what he was about,
and his motives will divulge themselves in good time.
They found Mrs. Tuck alone in her parlor, but when she
perceived that John had entered the room, she began a
piteous moaning, crying out, O, my daughter, my daughter,
nor would she lift her eyes or speak a word to him. Tom
endeavoured
to quiet her, but she refused to be comforted, and
continued to exclaim O! my daughter, my daughter! Give
me back my daughter!
This was so distressing to John that he could not remain,
he was touched by her grief, and was forced to withdraw
without speaking to her, so keenly did he feel for her. But
he had no sooner closed the door, than she took her pocket
handkerchief from her eyes, and said,
My son, how could you bring that fellow to me? If you
have any love for your heart-broken mother, never again let
him darken my doors. The sight of him is harrowing to my
feelings. He has deprived me of my daughter, and made us
beggars.
But my dear mother, we must remember that he was
Julia's husband; he is one of our family, and if we would
have him love us we must show some love for him.
Never, never, replied the afflicted mother, he has been
a source of mortification and misfortune to us since the day
when that misguided old man took him into his house. But
the worst has been done, he can injure us no more. He has
deprived us of Julia, and of the fortune which was ours by
right. Love him, my son, never! never! He will know,
before he dies, what it is to rob a mother of her child. O,
Julia
!
Julia!
You must exercise some reason, even in your grief,
replied her son, Julia is gone, rash girl that she was, and,
to be just, we cannot blame young Tremlett, for I know that
he had no agency in her leaving us. As for the marriage,
you know that nobody was to blame for that but Fred, and,
for the property, he has offered to relinquish his claim in our
favor.
But has he done it? said his mother.
He has not, and I will not allow him to do so. I will
make a better arrangement. I have proposed to enter into
partnership with him and use it as a capital, retaining only a
moity of the profits. But we shall get it all in the end.
But, does he know that his father left no will?
Does he know it? said Tom looking at her with
astonisement
in his face. He does, but how did you know it?
I was told of it in confidence, she replied.
It's a strange business, said Tom, and it has puzzled
34
me confoundedly. And now that you know the facts, you
must treat Tremlett with respect, let your feelings be what
they may, I will have it so.
O, my son, you know that I live only for the sake of
you and Fred, and if you wish it, it is enough; but my heart
will always rebel against him.
Mrs. Tuck was as good as her word. The next Sunday
herself and her two sons returned thanks publicly in church
through the Rev. Doctor Misty, for the safe return from
abroad after a dangerous illness of their near relation and
friend.
CHAPTER II.
CONTAINS SUNDRY ITEMS OF BUSINESS.
JOHN consulted with his lawyer, Mr. Polesworthy, in
regard
to his proposed business arrangement, and that
gentleman
recommended him very strongly to accept of the
proposition
of Tom Tuck, for he had formed a high opinion of
his business talents, and knew that he enjoyed a reputation
for financial skill, in Wall Street, superior to that of any
young man of his age. Mr. Polesworthy, though a regular
bred lawyer, one of those who pursue classical studies four
years, but never afterwards take a classic in their hands, was
exceedingly fond of business, and did not dream that half a
million of dollars was of any other use to a young man than
as a capital for carrying on a splendid trade. Therefore, he
was quite sincere in recommending John to embark his
fortune
and employ his precious time in the glorious pursuit of
wealth, by buying at a small price, and selling at high ones,
any thing that could be bought and sold whether rum and
molasses, or cambric needles and chain cables; although an
ill-natured
historian, such as we are not, might insinuate that he
was influenced by a desire to bring corn to his own hopper,
as he had reasonable expectations that all the law business of
any house that his new client might belong to, would fall into
his hands. But this we should be unwilling to believe of Mr.
Polesworthy. A man of his position in society, his great
wealth and standing in the church, could hardly be suspected
of such low motives. His very appearance would forbid
such a thought. He could have no motives for aspiring to
worldly possessions; for he was dispeptic in his habits, and
with the means of living like a prince he was compelled to
eat corn bread like a slave; his drink was water; and his
amusements consisted solely of such pleasure as might be
extracted
from the occupation of overhauling bundles of old
musty papers and inspecting yellow covered volumes of law
reports; his house was furnished in the plainest manner and
its bare white walls were decorated with no flaunting works
of art; children he had none, and his wife's tastes were as
sober as his own; her sole happiness consisted in cleaning
up, and such littering things as flowers she would not allow
to grow near her; what could such people want of money?
It cost them nothing to live; and any one who could look
upon Mr. Polesworthy's spare form, his wrinkled face,
greenish
eyes, and thread-bare clothes, and suspect him of avarice
or worldly ambition, must have a very low and strange
opinion of human nature; furthermore, he entertained no
company, and gave no gifts; his relations were all able to
take care of themselves, except a brother who was fit for
nothing
,
and providentially was provided for by government
with the rank and emoluments of post captain in the Navy,
which he was allowed to enjoy although he had not wet the
sole of his shoe with salt water for almost half a century. It
is true, however, that Mr. Polesworthy got all the money he
could, and kept all he got, but his motives for so doing were
quite inscruptable. He was a good lawyer, that is, a safe one,
and he had no lack of clients. John told him that it had
been his intention to relinquish to the Tucks their sister's
property
,
and that he would have done so had not Tom made
the proposal for joining him in business, upon which he
turned
very pale and told his client that if he ever heard him
intimate
such a thing again he would immediately have him
sent to the insane asylum, until he recovered his senses.
Relinquish
half a million of dollars! Twas a burlesque on
insanity
.
The maddest of all maniacs would sneer at such a
want of sense. It was a proceeding without a parallel. He
did indeed remember something about an Emperor who once
relinquished a crown to his son, or something of that sort, and
of a king who gave up his sceptre to his daughters, but he
had never put much faith in such stories, and even though
they had been true, what was power to money?
John quailed under the vehement reproof of his lawyer,
and began to think that he had been entertaining a very
wicked and ridiculous purpose, and he promised his legal
friend that he would consult him before he made any
important
move in regard to his pecuniary affairs.
The search for the will was resumed, but without effect,
not a scrap of writing could be found among the papers of the
deceased merchant giving the faintest light upon the subject.
It was a strange, distressing matter, and as the chances grew
stronger and stronger that the property would slip through
John's hands, from some cause wholly unaccountable upon any
principle recognised by Christian philosophers; his friends
diminished
exactly in proportion to the need he stood in of them,
instead of increasing as they should have done, in conformity
with the religious philosophy they professed to have faith in.
As for John himself, the one most concerned, he expressed and
really felt very little grief on the occasion. It was a
disappointment
to him, for had been taught to look upon his father's
property as his own, and many generous dreams that he had
indulged in would never be realized, but his personal friends,
and even several editors of newspapers whom he had never
known, expressed a world of pity for him, and some even
went so far as to censure his father for his carelessness in not
executing a will when he must have known that a man of
his age was liable to be taken off at a moment's notice. But
such reflections gave great offence to the one whom they
were intended to gratify. He knew what his father's
intentions
had been, and he had no doubt that some accident had
hindered their execution, but even though his father had
intentionally
left him without a dollar he could not complain;
he was already indebted to him for the recollection of a happy
youth, for a good education, and for many lessons of charity
and meekness. Let what might happen to him, the memory
of happy days in his youth was a stream of sun-shine that no
shadows could ever darken; it was beyond the reach of
chance; sickness, poverty and disgrace could not affect it;
it was a well of living waters, with an unfading margin of
verdant turf; it was a sky without a cloud; a sea without a
storm; it was a sun so bright that it cast no shadow before
him even though it shone upon his back.
In due process of time the public administrator took charge
of Mr. Tremlett's property, but John continued through the
aid of Mr. Polesworthy to retain possession of the house and
furniture, where he continued to live with Mrs. Swazey for
his house-keeper, and slept constantly in the little room next
to his father's that he had occupied during the old gentleman's
life time. He also administered upon his wife's estate, and
the balance sheet of the firm having been made out but a week
previous to Mr. Tremlett's death, and the amount due to her
uncle, carried to her credit, it was immediately paid over to
him by the public Administrator, upon his producing the
marriage certificate, which Mr. London had put into his
hands as he was leaving Charleston. So that he was in
reality precisely as wealthy as he would have been had his
father left a will and he had not been married to Julia Tuck.
Indeed, he was richer, for Mr. Tuck was worth more money
than his partner, their interest in the concern being equal, and
Mr. Tuck's personal expenses much less than Mr. Tremlett's.
Their investments had always been on joint account, and the
only difference in their interests was caused by the difference
in their manner of living. Furthermore, had Mr. Tremlett
left a will, it is beyond a doubt that he would have left a
considerable
amount to his house-keeper, and servants and
clerks; and it would have been contrary to his uniform habit
had he not bequeathed something handsome to several
benevolent
institutions, among the rest the Orphan Asylum from
whence he had taken his son, to which he had given a
thousand
dollars annually for a good many years; these would
have diminished the sum total that the young man would
have to receive, largely, and it would have been still farther
diminished in converting the merchandise of the firm into
cash, and collecting many large debts of foreign houses, all
of which had been taken at their full value by Mr. Tremlett
in making a division of the estate.
It is neither becoming nor necessary in a history like this
to descend to tabular statements; but on so interesting a
subject
as the settlement of a large estate, a portion of our readers
may reasonably expect some definite and positive information
for we are well aware that in a community like ours, and
among a great variety of students of history such terms as
large amounts and considerable sums have no very
significant meaning, since a very large sum to a clerk in
Grand street, would be a very small amount to a broker in
Wall street; and a large fortune in Chatham Square is a
very different thing from a large fortune in Washington
Square. For the sake of precision then, and to obviate all
misunderstandings we submit to the reader the following
account
of the property paid over to John Tremlett on the
but we musn't name dates.
Check on the Treasurer of the Real Estate and State
Stock Association,
$396.840.00
140 Shares of the Stock of the Crescent Fire Insurance
Co. par value $50.00
7.000 00
100 Shares of the capital stock of the Peoples Bank
at 100 dollars
10.000.00
50 Shares of the capital stock of the Grocers' Bank
at 400 dollars
20.000.00
100 Shares of the North American Life, Fire,
Annuities
and Inland Navigation Insurance and Trust
Company
,
at $50.00 dollars
6.000.00
75 Shares of the Hamilton Marine Insurance
Company
at 125 dollars
9.375.00
6 per cent Stock of the City of New York,
redeemable
1920
35.000.00
5 per cent do 1890
40.000.00
5 per cent do of the State of New York, Canal Loan,
50.000.00
120 Shares of the Cranberry Meadow Rail Road at
100 dollars
12.000.00
20 Shares of the Fever Swamp Canal at 40 dollars
800.00
$586.015.60
But as these stocks would average something above ten per
cent premium in the market it will readily be perceived that
the sum total received was equal to six hundred thousand
dollars. The Fever Swamp Canal, and the Cranberry
Meadow Rail Road were at a considerable discount it is
true; but they did not reduce the average below ten per cent.
It is proper to inform the reader, lest he should doubt the
sagacity of Tremlett and Tuck, that these stocks were not
purchased by those prudent merchants, but were received by
them from a Jobber to whom they lent money the day before
he failed, and as he wanted to do the clean thing by his
confidential creditors, so that he might keep his head up
among fair-and-square men, he purchased these stock sat a
very great discount and paid them away at par.
The tranfers of the stocks and cash were completed; the
partnership papers were all drawn up, and the advertisements
announcing the new firm under the old name, were just going
to be sent off, when a very trifling rupture occurred which
threatened for a while to derange the entire plan. Fred Tuck
insisted that the last name of the firm should be changed
into
a noun of multitude,
Tucks
; his brother swore it should
not. Fred swore in his turn that it should. John had no
choice in the matter. The brothers became excited, from
words they threatened blows; neither would give up, and it
being a point of not the smallest importance, it was for that
very reason a point of honor;for all the world knows that
debts of honor, are contracted without any consideration being
given, and that affairs of honor spring out of the very slightest
circumstances, as we have seen one gentleman challenge
another for an insinuation, who received torrents of abuse
from others without winking; the difficulty was at last
happily
settled by John proposing that it should be determined
by tossing up a penny. Heads, cried Fred and heads it
was; so the firm was announced as Tremlett and Tucks,
very much to the chagrin of Tom who could not endure that
any body's name should stand before his own, but he knew
it was for his interest, and he kept his dissatisfaction to
himself
.
We have made an important omission in the above
schedule
,
as regards the property of Mr. Tuck; one half of the
store in South Street, the one occupied by the firm, and the
only real estate that they held, was also assigned to Julia, but
it being real-estate it could not of course be claimed by her
husband, and it fell to her two brothers as her heirs, with the
life use of it to their mother. But this was a matter of but
little consequence to the new firm, since they could still
keep possession of it. The Brothers immediately vanished
from Wall Street and tore down their little tin sign. Tom
took possession of his uncle's old desk and arm chair, and
John, with a sad reluctant feeling took the vacant seat of his
father. The first day he sat in it he burst into tears, and
could do nothing for the remainder of the day. When he
retired
at night, he spent a long time in his father's room, and
wept bitterly when he remembered that he was now without
a friend in the world, at least he felt so, and for the first time
in his life he thought seriously of his own father and mother
whom he had never known. His mother he had been told
was dead, but who she was or whence she had come he had
never known. His father, perhaps he might still be alive,
and he might yet discover him. Wearied at last, and
overcome
35
by his sad reflections, he retired to his own room and
went to bed. But he could not sleep; he extinguished his
candle but his brain was too busy to slumber; all the
incidents
of his life were crowding themselves unbidden before
him, a long, long, distance back farther than he had ever been
able to see before, they seemed like regular links in a chain,
one dragging the other; the most minute events of his
childhood
appeared as distinct as though they had been
occurrences
of the day before; his buffetings at the Asylum, his
escape
,
his detection by Mr. Tremlett, his drowning sensations
when he was upset in the river; they all appeared as real
as though he were at the moment experiencing them; back,
back he went in his career until nothing could be seen beyond;
a dismal, vapory barrier closed up the prospect. O,
Heavenly
Father, he sighed, that I could but have caught a
glimpse of my mother's face! As he said this he turned
upon
his side, and saw again his good old father gazing upon
him with the same happy, calm, contented look. But he was
not alone. A female figure accompanied him; she was robed
in white, and her long hair fell in bright luxuriance over her
shoulders; her eyes were blue, and they gazed earnestly upon
him, but her face was not like his father's, serene and happy;
it looked unquiet and it distressed him. No word was spoken,
but he knew that it was his mother. But was she not happy?
No, he knew that she was not. As they gazed upon him, his
blood grew chill and yet his heart beat with violence; his
eye balls ached as though they would burst, he grew numb,
his senses reeled, he forgot himself, he seemed to struggle to
free himself from a strange influence, at last the spell was
broken; he opened his eyes; it was broad day and his
celestial
visitors had disappeared.
This last appearance troubled him sorely. He now knew
that it was no hallucination, and he grew very serious. To
turn from an interview with the spirits of departed friends
and mingle in the helter-skelter pursuits of a commercial life
was a violent change. He longed for solitude and a friend,
one near and dear, to whose ear and heart he could entrust
the secrets that oppressed him. He knew not what these
visitations might mean; but he hesitated to take counsel of
the world, for he knew that he would meet with derision and
contempt, if he should reveal the secret of his visitants. His
spirits were sad, and he felt but little inclination to bear his
share in the business he had undertaken. But when he
walked
out in the bright sun, and felt the fresh air, and saw
around him so much of life, of activity and apparent
enjoyment
,
and above him the pure blue sky and the glorious
white clouds sailing in their majesty and vapory beauty, he
forgot his melancholy feelings, and long before he had
reached
his counting room, the hearty and cheerful salutations of
the multitude of acquaintances that he met, the hurried gait
of all whom he encountered, and the fresh external aspect of
every thing he saw, completely chased from his thoughts
every vestige of the unsubstantial, yet real forms that had
stood by his bed-side the night before.
CHAPTER III.
WILL BE OCCUPIED MAINLY IN DISCUSSING CERTAIN
AFFAIRS
OF TOO DELICATE A NATURE TO BE EMBLAZONED
AT THE HEAD OF A CHAPTER.
IT must not be thought that John had forgotten Fidelia, or
that his admiration of her had in the smallest degree
diminished
,
because we have made no allusion to her since his
return to New York; he had in reality a greater regard for
her than ever, and he only waited for a decent time to pass by
that he might call upon her, and if it should be necessary,
explain
to her the circumstances under which he was married.
He had heard nothing from her, save only that Jeremiah had
passed her in the street but a few days after his arrival, since
he had written to her; and it was with an unquiet and
doubtful
feeling that he rapped one evening, just after dusk, at the
door of the yellow cottage in the Bowery. Her grandmother
met him at the door, and she and the old sailor gave him a
most hearty and cordial greeting, while they expressed their
sympathy for the loss of his father in sincere and unaffected
terms. He found the old couple exactly as he had last seen
them, quiet, neat and cheerful; but Fidelia! she was not there.
A chair stood by her work-stand as though it had just been
vacated, but it was occupied by a monstrously overgrown
white tom-cat that had lost its eyes in an encounter with rats
some years before, and now in his old age shared jointly
with the drab parrot the affectionate attentions of Fidelia and
her grand parents. These worthy people could not have
lived happily without some such objects to bestow the
over-flowings
of their love upon. They were not contented with
simply making themselves comfortable, and their little income
did not allow them to entertain more expensive pensioners;
although they had besides these two animal pets, sundry
vegetable
favorites such as a bunch of sweet-william, an old
twisted and deformed althea, and a gorgeous sun-flower, that
they regarded with almost as great affection; while a
shepherdess
,
with a striped blue petticoat, a fancy boddice and a
crook in her hand, that stood upon the little black mantel-piece
received a greater number of benevolent and genuine kind
glances from the old sailor as he sat before the fire with his
pipe in his mouth, than any pastoral lady who has been piped
to since the days of Theocritus.
John sat a long while hoping that Fidelia would make her
appearance, but she came not. He made no allusions to her,
although he spoke of her father whose arrival was daily
expected
,
and the old people seemed purposely to avoid
speaking
of her. He felt embarrassed, for he had no doubt that
they knew the nature of the letter he had sent to her, and at
last he enquired if she was well? Thereupon the old sailor
smoked his pipe very earnestly and looked at the china
shepherdess
,
but the old lady replied that she was not very well,
neither was she sick, and suddenly became intensely
interested
in her knitting needles.
John was not slow to perceive these demonstrations, and
they annoyed him more than he cared to show, and after a
moment's pause he enquired if she would be at home the next
evening, and having been informed that it was uncertain, he
bade them good night, and begged to be remembered to Miss
Clearman, and left the quiet little house in a most unquiet
frame of mind. Scarcely had he closed the door, when
Fidelia
made her appearance from up stairs, and throwing her
arms around her grand-mother's neck, burst into tears and
sobbed
like a child.
Never mind my little darter, said her grandfather, your
father will be at home in a few days and he will see that
every thing is fixed in ship-shape fashion. Don't cry about
any man my darter, there's as good fish in the sea as ever was
caught.
My poor child, said her grandmother, as she wiped the
tears from her cheeks, my poor dear child, Mr. Tremlett
spoke as kindly about you as ever. It was no fault of his, I
know. Wait until you hear what he has to say. Don't cry
so, you will break my heart. Your poor old grandmother
cannot live to see you unhappy.
O, let me cry, let me cry while I can, said Fidelia, but
don't name his name to me again. I cannot bear his name.
He cares nothing for me, neither do I for him, and he only
came here to-night to insult us because we are poor
Well, my darter, I am an old man, and an honest man, if
I am a poor one, said her grandfather, but if he or any other
man, I don't care how rich he may be, insults you he had
better
not sail in the same latitude with this here old hulk, I can
promise you, so don't cry for that. Recollect that your old
grandfather won't see his darter imposed upon if he is poor.
No, no.
Here the conversation was interrupted by the ejaculation of
the old bird let us pray, and Fidelia wiped her eyes, but
she could not read, and the Bible being opened upon the little
table, her grandmother read the chapter appointed for the day,
and afterwards they all knelt reverently in prayer, and in
asking
forgiveness for their own transgressions forgot all the real
or fancied wrongs that others had done to them. As for John,
he had only to retire to his lone room, and brood over his
griefs. There were enough who would have been happy to
console him with their condolences, for the rich are never in
want of sympathizers, but he had no heart for their attentions,
and he avoided them all that he could. But it is no use for a
rich man to try to avoid his friends; there is but one way to
be rid of them, which was well and successfnlly tried by
a certain Timon, as our readers remember, and, therefore,
we need not allude to it more particularly.It is a fortunate
thing for an author to have intelligent readers, it saves such
a vast amount of trouble in the way of notes and
pieces
justificatives
;
and that ours are intelligent we have good reason
to infer from their being so select.The next day, however,
he wrote to Fidelia a detailed account of the nature of his
intimacy
with Julia, the reasons of his journey to Charleston
and the particulars of his illness and marriage, and sent it to
her by the hands of Jeremiah, and we shall learn in good time
what effect it had upon that delicately minded and beautiful
young lady.
Hitherto Jeremiah had only guessed at the nature of John's
feelings towards Fidelia, but now the young man made a
confidant
of his old friend, and told him how ardently he loved
her, and of the fears he entertained that his suit would not
be acceptable to her on account of his marriage with Julia
Tuck; and Jeremiah being extremely simple minded and
affectionate
,
and forming all his ideas of a woman's temper from
what he had seen of it in Huldah Hogshart, conceiving in
consequence that the supremest happiness of all young and
beautiful ladies consisted in making their admirers as unhappy
as they possibly could render them, was forced to confess that
he feared John's apprehensions were not without good and
substantial foundations. But he encouraged him with such
philosophical reflections as suggested themselves to his mind;
and ventured to make a confession of his own experience in
verification of Shakespeare's immortal line. It appeared that
Jeremiah's love had been stretched to its utmost tension, and
that it had once or twice been very near snapping asunder,
and if it had done so, it could not, of course, ever have been
fastened together again in this world; for Love is no sooner
broken than the fragments immediately turn to hate; and
therefore, lovers should guard with great care, and not
practice
upon the strength of the cord that binds them together,
lest its tenacity should be overtaxed, and they sundered forever.
Jeremiah's chief trouble arose from the excessive fondness of
Miss Hogshart for worldly things, and the very slight regard
that she entertained for some of his old-fashioned and
ridiculous
notions. However he flattered himself, that for his sake
she would alter when they got married, and she had not the
slightest doubt that she could cure him of all his inconvenient
whims when she once got him entirely under her control.
Therefore they could each of them afford to make small
concessions
,
during their probationary state of courtship, and as
yet they had not indulged in any downright quarrel. But
as the reader will perceive this is not the way in which
the band that is to bind for time and eternity two human
beings, should be formed; their foibles and virtues should
be so mixed together during this period that when the
rivets are finally fastened by the agent of the Law, whether
magistrate or parson, they shall have formed a kind of
concrete which neither years, nor disgrace, nor sickness,
nor wealth, nor poverty, nor separation, nor scandal, nor
friends, nor foes, nor even death itself can ever dissolve or
rend asunder. This is sometimes, but rarely, done after
marriage, but the safest way is to do it before hand; but,
unfortunately
,
marriages take place at that season of life when
advice, though most needed, is least heeded, and we fear that
our good intentions in making these observations, will avail
but little with the students of this history.
As the term of Miss Hogshart's apprenticeship was nearly
at an end, and she would be compelled to return to her
father's house when it arrived, there to practice the sublime
art that she had been acquiring a knowledge of, Jeremiah's
thoughts begun to dwell upon marriage. It is true he had
saved nothing from his yearly salary, and that he could
expect
nothing in the shape of property with his wife, friend
Hogshart having intimated to him that he considered the
personal
charms with which she was abundantly endowed, were
an ample dower, forgetting possibly that personal charms were
as transient and fleeting as even personal property, and that
they should always accompany each other in a bride, so that
when one should chance to spread its wings the other might
be left to atone for its loss; but then he was in a good
situation
,
with a liberal salary and a probability of his retaining it
as long as he might wish to do so. There could be nothing
imprudent in taking upon himself the responsibility of so
prudent
and industrious a wife as he doubted not Huldah
Hogshart
would prove. John agreed with him, and advised him
to get married immediately, and told him to dismiss all
thoughts about the future, so far as mere pecuniary matters
were concerned. Jeremiah felt very happy to hear his own
wishes so kindly responded to by his friend and employer,
and resolved that they should be fulfilled with no more delay
than what delicacy and prudence might require. He was
obliged to acknowledge to himself that he did not experience
that strange, wild, delicious tumult of pleasureable feelings
now when the consummation of his courtship seemed so near at
hand, that he did when he first thought of such a thing in the
earlier days of his acquaintance with Miss Hogshart. But he
looked upon this as a thing of course, remembering the old
saying, that familiarity breeds contempt, and that the fiercest
fires soonest burn out. But he wished, notwithstanding, that
he could know how others had felt in his situation; whether
they had, like him, experienced any diminution of desire, as the
period of gratification drew near. He had no friend, however,
whom he dared to consult on so delicate an occasion, unless it
were Mr. Bates, and he did not consider that gentleman's
opinions
as entitled to serious consideration upon such a subject.
36
CHAPTER IV.
CONCERNING THE BUSINESS ARRANGEMENTS OF THE NEW
FIRM.JEREMIAH IS DETECTED IN A VERY BASE ACT.
THE new firm commenced business under as favorable
prospects, perhaps, as any firm that ever has been
established
in the commercial emporium. With a large capital,
an established correspondence, a good name and multitudes
of friends, success could hardly be considered within the
possibility
of doubt. But it is not every ship that sails on a fair
day that arrives safely in port; and we have known more
than one to set sail in a storm and arrive at her haven in
sun-shiney
weather. We shall know all before long. Let us
hope for the best.
We have already seen taht Tom and John were provided
with desks, but no mention was made of Fred who, although
older than Tremlett, had to take rank as the junior partner,
a position which caused his proud and chivalrous heart to
swell in his bosom, and determined him to make up in
externals
for his lack of consequence in position. He therefore
had a costly and magnificent desk made for his own
accommodation
,
with a great number of drawers, for novels, segars,
perfumery
and brushes, visiting cards, a small mirror, and a great
variety of other articles equally necessary in a merchant's
counting room; it was manufactured of rose-wood and inlaid
with box and ivory in a very ingenious manner, and the
whole was enclosed by a curtain of violet colored silk, so that
he could pursue his important and abstruse calculations
without
being annoyed by his partners or casual visitors. His
chair was a face simile of the senatorial chairs at Washington,
excepting only that the seat was covered with scarlet morocco,
that had been imported from Paris for a Wall Street Broker,
who had the misfortune to run away before it arrived. When
his brother saw this elegant adornment of the counting room
brought in, he ripped out an oath in his coarse manner, but
John barely smiled, and continued writing his letter. The truth
is they were neither much versed in sthetics as Fred told
them, and for which reason he held them both in very hearty
contempt. Most of the clerks of the old firm were retained
by the new one, although, for reasons well known to himself,
Tom had contrived that no one should retain his original
position except the book-keeper, Mr. Bates, and the foreign
corresponding clerk Mr. Keckschnipen, who was quite a
miracle of a linguist, being able to write French like a
German
,
and English like a Frenchman, and Spanish like a
Swede, and Swedish like a Spaniard, and as they had
correspondents
in all those languages, his services were
indispensable
,
and he received a round salary for them. Tom assumed
the financial department, his fitness for which no body
ventured
to question; John was to superintend the purchases and
sales and go on `change' Fred had the agreeable duty,
generally assigned to junior partners in large houses, of
entertaining
the foreign correspondents who might visit the city,
and doing the agreeable to bearers of letters of introduction;
generally gentlemen of a
distingu
air with moustachios
and dirty linen, and a great profusion of diamond bosom studs
and prodigious finger rings. Jeremiah at first held on to the
cash-book, but a circumstance, which our candor as an
impartial
historian will not allow us to keep from the reader,
caused him to be removed from that important station, and the
domestic correspondence was placed in his charge. The
very morning after the partnership was formed, the porter
brought in a large number of letters from the post office,
mostly
addressed to the old firm, and among them was one for
John, with the Charleston post mark, directed in a strange
unmercantile hand, and sealed with a very broad seal, bearing
a great profusion of heraldic scrolls and figures, and a latin
motto. Jeremiah's curiosity was so strongly excited by this
strange looking missive, that he was tempted to take it up, and
endeavor, by holding it up to the light and peeping in
between
the folds, to discover who it was from, and while he was
engaged in this very wicked and disreputable act, Mr. T.
Jefferson
Tuck came in. Jeremiah blushed at being caught in
such an act, and hastily threw the letter on John's desk and
was about to withdraw to hide his confusion, when Mr. Tuck
called him back.
So, Mr. Jernegan, said the upright financier, with a
frown of indignant honesty, you open other people's letters,
do you sir?
I never did such a thing, said Jeremiah, while a blush
of shame suffused his pale cheek.
You never did such a thing! repeated the financier, with
a sneer, how dare you say so to me, sir, when I saw you
trying to peep into that letter, sir; trying to steal a secret, sir,
which you must have known was never intended for you.
I did not suppose there could be anything wrong in it.
You did not? Well, sir, that aggravates your fault.
What security have I that my letters will not be opened, with
a man who does not think it wrong to do such things, about
me. You don't think it wrong, sir, at which of your
churches did you hear that doctrine preached, sir?
I frankly confess that it was wrong, and that I am very
sorry for it; it was thoughtlessly done, but it was not your
letter, and I will take the consequences from Mr. Tremlett,
who alone has any right to speak to me about it; the letter
was for him said Jeremiah.
Gracious God, exclaimed the financiering partner in
amazement, how dare you make use of such language to
your employer; you reprobate, I will have you turned into the
street for your audacity, and I will see that you enter no
counting
house in this city. You have not got energy enough to
do a bold deed of villany like a a man, but you must go
prowling
about like a mousing cat prying into other people's secrets,
you feline scamp. Give me your cash-book, sir, and close
the door.
Jeremiah did as he was ordered, and had the pleasure of
being sneered at and hissed by the other clerks in the outer
office, who were not only shocked at his want of moral rectitude
but absolutely and thoroughly disgusted at his want of courage
two qualities so peculiar to the whole human race, and
particularly
to clerks in counting rooms, that they well might be
indignant; but they did, nevertheless, out of pure good nature
and kindly regard, one and all advise him to go in and give
Mr. Tuck a flogging and then resign his situation. This
they considered more incumbent upon him to do, because
the financier was tall, stout, and active, and he was himself
extremely weak and slightly built, and altogether a stranger
to the noble art of flogging. As for Mr. Bates, it made him
really sick to see such a craven spirit as Jeremiah manifested,
and he felt in a hurry to get home to tell his wife about it.
Jeremiah did not exactly enjoy the thing, although he said
nothing to the contrary, but he bit his lip until the blood
trickled down upon his shirt-bosom. He had resolved not to
open his mouth until he saw John, and it was a great effort
not to do so.
The financier felt extremely pleasant at having had so
good an opportunity to show the clerks, and Jeremiah in
particular
,
what kind of materials he was composed of, that they
might know what their fate would be if either of them should
ever presume to cross his inclinations. He took up the letter
that had excited Jeremiah's curiosity so strongly, and tried to
decipher the motto on the seal, but he could only make out
one word
libertas
and something like
cara
or
caria
,
or both; the crest was a bunch of feathers, and some other
device peculiarly democratic which he thought too lightly of
to inspect closely. It was evidently not a business letter and
there was something about it strangely stimulating to his
curiosity. He locked the door of the office on the inside and
very ingeniously by means of an ivory paper cutter turned
the letter inside out without breaking the wax or tearing it in
the smallest manner. It was an art that required great
practice
to enable one to reach perfection, and by long practice
he had become very expert. As the letter contained no
secrets
,
we give it to the reader, although it will scarcely repay
a perusal, as it relates solely to private matters in no manner
essential to the advancement of our history.
It read thus:
Charleston
My dear Young Friend,
It is with emotions of peculiar gratification to
our Heavenly Father, and his son, the Lord Jesus, that I take up my
pen to address you a few lines; as, but for his merciful interposition
in answer to the prayers of his servant, his unworthy servant, there is
but too much cause to believe that you would now be lying in the dark
prison house of death, where, by his inscrutable Providence, she that
should have been the sharer of your troubles and the promoter of your
pleasures now lies. Blessed be her spirit. But it is my office to heal
and not to open up afresh the wounds of my people. I bless God that
you arrived safely at home, and I trust my very dear young friend, that
your thoughts will be directed to the church, that you may be inclosed
in its broad fold, and that you may be made free by its bondage. For
the blessed privilege that we enjoy in this land, where there is none to
make us afraid, and where we have liberty in Christ, in his church and
ourselves, always excepting the slavery of sin, let us be ever grateful
and magnify his name.
My object in troubling you with these lines will not, I sincerely hope,
be unpleasing to you. I am now well stricken in years, and my
children
are many (thirteen) and the estate that I can leave them, will be
small; therefore I have made it my practice for some years past
whenever
I could spare a sufficient sum from my more immediate wants, to
make an investment, for the benefit of each of my children, that I may
not leave them destitute, by purchasing for each of them a likely young
negro; they are now, blessed be the giver of all good things, all
supplied
except my youngest boy for whom I am in treaty with one of my
vestry men for a likely wench, about sixteen years old. As the
liberality
of your brother-in-law and yourself will enable me, through the
Providence of God, to make this purchase, my family and myself are
desirous to pay you the tribute of calling the wench by your deceased
lady's name, but we would not venture to do so without the
permission
of that good gentleman, her brother, and yourself.
If it should be agreeable to you to gratity us in this particular, it will
be an additional pleasure to us to learn your acquiescence from your
own hand.
With many good wishes,
Your sincere friend,
Fabian Esyman
.
We should be extremely sorry to encumber our page with
the coarse expletives of Tom Tuck as he refolded this pious
letter and threw it upon John's desk. What he could have
discovered in the feeling and respectful letter of the good
doctor
,
to cause him to apply to that excellent divine such terms
as the old sinner, the beast, and many infinitely worse
epithets is in truth a matter of mystery to us. But it
appeared
to be a peculiarity of the financier's mind, to apply to all
who were elevated by virtue or piety above him, the terms
which should of right have been applied to himself. It may,
perhaps, be proper to state in this place, that, for some reason
of which we are ignorant, John never answered this letter,
and whether or no the wench were called after Julia, we
have never been able to learn. If any of the doctor's children
are living, and will inform us of the facts, we will state them
in our next edition.
Tom Tuck having satisfied his curiosity, proceeded to tear
open the business letters which lay upon his desk, and before
he had finished reading them, John came in. The financier
told him in part what had occurred between Jeremiah and
himself, and added that either he or Jeremiah must quit the
concern.
Very well, replied John, if that is your will, the firm
is dissolved. I will have no part or lot in the business unless
he is employed. And he said this in so firm and positive a
manner, that Tom was confounded, and fearing to persist lest
his partner should carry his threat into execution, he at last
compromised, after some sharp words, by agreeing that
Jeremiah
should take the sole charge of the domestic
correspondence
of the firm, and that he would himself, to save the
expense
of another clerk, assume the duties of cash-keeper. But
this was, in fact, all he had aimed at in the first place; like
the majority of smart fellows from the days of the somewhat
noted treasurer of the twelve, down to the present time, he
aimed at the possession of the bag, and he obtained it. But
he did not, therefore, forgive Jeremiah for the offence he had
committed, because he had himself gained his point, and he
concentrated his wrath and kept it close, so that when an
opportunity
should occur for pouring it out, it might descend
with greater bitterness and force. His brother was full as
hostile to Jeremiah although for different reasons; he hated
him because he never read novels, because he had no spirit,
because he never smoked, and he despised him for his ugly
face, his low connexions, his want of taste, and because he
had no appreciation of the beautiful, and knew nothing about
sthetics, not so much as the meaning of the word. Fred
Tuck was a great patron of the arts, and a very great favorite
with artists, he had in fact been elected an honorary member
of the Academy, and it was one of the finest things
imaginable to hear him talk of the old masters, and the
antique
.
He had even written critical notices of pictures for the
papers, and had, therefore, almost as good a claim to be ranked
among the literati as among the cognoscenti. That a person
of his superior taste and critical acumen, should have a
thorough and hearty contempt for such a low-minded being
as Jeremiah was not only perfectly natural, but almost
unavoidable
.
The first letter that Jeremiah wrote was criticized
in a very severe manner by the Junior partner, he discovered
several
t
's that were not crossed and more than one
i
that was
destitute of its most essential feature, a dot, besides a redundant
preposition; but the greatest error of all, one that he swore
he never would forgive to his dying day was the omission of
an
s
in the last name of the firm, for Jeremiah signed
p. p.
(per procuration) and he could not convince the offended
gentleman
that he had not omitted the letter on purpose. It
happened
,
unfortunately, that John was not present, or the matter
would have been very soon disposed of; and the
corresponding
clerk after enduring a torrent of abuse, was dismissed to
his desk with a caution to be careful in future.
Having thus seen the new firm in operation, we will leave
the partners to conduct their business while we look after
those matters which in the out-door life of a man are supposed
to be of no possible consequence, but which are, in reality, the
only things in life worth the serious notice of human beings
we mean the issues of the affections.
37
CHAPTER V.
GLADNESS AND SADNESS.
THE evening had arrived when John had appointed an
hour for calling again at the little yellow house in the
Bowery, and happily for him, before he left his office, the
Boadicea, the ship of which Fidelia's father was master, was
reported below the Hook. So he could be the bearer of
happy
news, and be welcomed for that reason if for no other.
When he reached the quiet little dwelling, it was lighted up
with the bright rays of a full moon, and it looked to him so
lovely, so pure and holy, that he thought the passers by must
think as they caught transient glimpses of its sober gable, that
it was the dwelling place of good spirits; but this thought
might have owed its existence to his previous knowledge that
an angel had in reality made the humble dwelling her home
rather than to any supernatural appearances likely to attract
the attention of Bowery passengers. When he entered, he
found the little family in their usual state of quiet and good
humor, each employed about something, and yet seemingly
happy and composed. No fluster, hurry, weariness or
yawning
.
'Twas a strange family. They had the good luck
always
to be engaged in what was pleasantest to them, never
to have more work than they could do, nor more time than
they could happily employ; and yet they smoked a vast deal,
they read more than most families, they eat their three meals
daily and prepared their own food; they sang even, and
prayed
night and morning; yet they had always leisure to
entertain
a friend, and they were never obliged to be `out' because
they were not in a condition to be seen. It was a very strange
family, and we fear there were not many such in the Bowery.
It was a blessed thing to alight on such a nestling. So John
thought as he drew his chair to the little work-table where
Fidelia sat plying her needle. He noticed her changing color,
first white, then red, and then white again, for his eyes were
fixed full upon her face; but he did not notice the glances,
full of meaning of some kind, that passed between her
grandparents
,
She answered his questions slightly, but there were
whole volumes of meaning in the tones of her voice, and
when she did raise her eye-lids so that he caught a glimpse
of her bright eyes, O, he read there more than we could write
in a whole year. So eloquent is the soul when it speaks
without
affectation, so rapidly can she communicate her thoughts
when one is disposed to read them aright. What happened
on this particular visit, what words were said, what looks
were looked, what vows were vowed, is not absolutely
essential
to be known. Love, like murder, will out, it is one of those
things that cannot be hidden, and it will be enough to relate
that John and Fidelia knew that each loved the other, and
that they each vowed in their souls to be as true as truth,
and henceforward there was to be no happiness but in each
other's society, excepting only in the society of each others
thoughts, which may not after all be an exception. But
there were no vocal promises made, no writings drawn up and
witnessed, no appointments about marrying, all these things
were to be delayed until the approval of Fidelia's father could
be asked, and they were all happy beyond expression; the old
man and his wife and the daughter to hear that their long
absent son, father, and protector had arrived within sight of
home, What a joy. After a long absence from all that is
dear upon earth, sailing over unknown seas, encountering
pamparas and whirl-winds, water spouts and lightnings, all
the dangers of the deep; the perils of pestilent atmospheres;
the spear of the savage, the stiletto of the pirate, he had arrived
at last. Do they forget God in their gratitude? No, it is his
goodness that has done it, and to him they give thanks.
John did not prolong his stay beyond the usual hour, but
he would gladly have done so; and when he left the little
quiet court, it was no longer illuminated by the moon's rays,
but it lay wrapped in darkness: scarcely could he mark the
outline of the modest gable against the dull leaden clouds
that hung above it in the sky. He had the least possible touch
of superstitious feeling, and he could scarce help thinking
that there was something ominous in the different aspect that
the house wore now to what it did when he entered it; but
this feeling did not last long, the clear, soft, sweet good night
of Fidelia still sounded in his ears and seemed to creep into
his heart and vibrate along its chords, so that he could soon
think of nothing else. But when he lay down upon his bed,
in the deep stillness and darkness of night, his father came
and gazed upon him again, and that other form, robed in
white, that he knew to be his mother's; he fancied there was
a sadness in their looks now, but how could that be? Before
they disappeared from his sight another joined them, whose
sad look made his heart almost burst, and caused the cold
sweat to start from his forehead. It was Julia Tuck, she did
not look angry, but troubled and grieved. Her sad pale face
and mournful eyes, were too much for his strength, he
swooned
and lay a long, long while, sinking, as it seemed, through
deep, black and bottomless abysses until he was aroused, and
he opened his cyes, and the phantoms were gone. It was still
dark, and he lay with a beating heart a leng time before he
fell asleep.
He awoke in the morning with melancholy thoughts. The
rays of a bright summer's sun made his chamber as cheerful,
as lively and as pleasant as it could be, and a thousand
familiar
substantial things surrounded him and gave him, in some
degree, an carthly and composed feeling; but one who
communes
with the invisible world over night cannot in a
moment
discover sufficient importance in mere earthly particles,
let them be presented in never such winning shapes, when he
awakes in the morning, as to forget that there are spirits about
us, once of us, who cannot but look upon such things with
disdain if they even look upon them at all. We all pretend
to believe in our own spirituality, and that when the essence
which keeps our bodies in motion shall be dead, we too shall
still exist somewhere and somehow, but how many, like him
have ever known this fact, and looked upon the faces of the
departed ones whom they had communed with in the flesh?
Doubtless there are many of whom the world has never
heard, to whom this privilege has been granted, for men keep
their most important secrets always to themselves. There
are few persons who would care to be distinguished as Ghost
seers. Such an unhappy notoriety would tend but little to
advance a man's interests in the world, and those who
converse
much with spirits would do well to keep their own
counsel. So thought John, and therefore when he was
questioned
as to the cause of his melancholy, his afflictions, of
which the world knew, were sufficient causes to assign. But
these visitants disturbed him not a little. Why should he
above all others be selected out to receive calls in this
manner
?
It was true they were his own friends, by whom he had
been caressed and beloved, while they were living, but there
must be a serious meaning in their visits which he had yet to
learn. Perhaps the missing Will had something to do with
them? But it could not be. He could ask advice of no one,
for who could penetrate the veil that hangs between Time
and Eternity; therefore he resolved to wait patiently and see.
And as he knew that he was watched by those whom he had
known here, and with whom he must dwell hereafter, there
was a continual feeling of restraint in all he said and did.
The open air, the blue sky and the bright sun, exerted the
most potent influences in dissipating his sad feelings and
strange forebodings, and, by the time he had reached his
counting room, he was alive to the world again, and all the
phantoms of the night were forgotten, but not the bright
vision
of the Bowery cottage; and his first enquiries were about
the Boadicea and her master.
But the master of the Boadicea was dead. He had sickened
and died on the passage home, from Manilla. This news
was a terrible blow to John, for he knew how severely it
would be felt by his new friends in the Bowery, and he
determined
to be the bearer of it himself, that he might, if possible,
by rendering any service in his power, mitigate its severity.
We will not accompany him upon his melancholy errand,
to witness the effect of the news that made the old couple
childless, and their grand-daughter an orphan. There is
sadness
enough in the world that we cannot shun, and if
happily
any of us have not yet tasted of sorrows, they will come
full soon; there is no need to partake of those we can avoid.
CHAPTER VI.
WILL BE DEVOTED TO BUSINESS.
THE merchants of old times held their fortunes by most
ticklish tenures, and what with water rats and land rats,
water thieves, and land thieves, merchandising was an
uncertain
business enough as we know; but the cords which
fastened
their purses then, when every man was his own banker,
were chain-cables compared with the cob-webs to which a
merchant
of our own day must trust for security. The new firm
had been in operation less than a month when they lost nearly
one half their capital by the faliure of the Real Estate and
State Stock Banking Association. Tom Tuck had selected out
this Bank for keeping their principal account, upon a secret
arrangement with the president of it that he should be chosen
a Director to fill the first vacancy that should occur in the
board, and before they had had an opportunity, or occasion, to
withdraw a quarter of their funds, the bank failed, and its
affairs
were placed in the hands of receivers appointed by the
Chancellor. In addition to this very serious loss, the
Financier's
Wall street speculations had turned out badly, and to
make good his deficiencies and sustain his credit in that
quarter
,
he was forced to draw largely from the funds of the firm,
which he had no right to do; but as he had entire control of
the finances, he kept this a secret, and that he might retrieve
his losses, entered into new speculations, buying and selling
stocks on time to a frightful extent. But still the capital of
the firm was large, even with these deductions, and amply
sufficient to meet all their engagements, and better than all,
their credit was good for a very large amount. John was
frightened at their loss by the failure of the Real Estate and
State Stock Association, and cautioned his partners to be
prudent
in their private expenses, and requested the Financier to
distribute his deposites among four or five banks for fear of
accidents.
But their great loss and the caution of his partner had but
small effect upon Fred Tuck. A young gentleman of his
elegant
tastes could not curtail his expenses; it was a low-lived
and vulgar thought, and he contented himself with the
reflection
that when the worst did come, he would marry some rich
girl and live upon her income in a genteel quiet way in the
country. For the present he was amusing himself by
building
a little box on Long Island, for a summer residence for
himself and a few of his elegant friends; he called it a box
merely because it is a grand thing to apply diminutive
epithets to such great affairs as common people would
distinguish
by magnificent names, but his architect, a gentleman
of distinguished taste, who had been to Europe and was
consequently
au fait
at everything, called it the beau ideal of a
gentleman's villa. It was in the Gothic style, built of brown
free stone, and decorated with fine carvings and a great
profusion
of stained glass. Very Gothic indeed. It was fit for
almost anything but the purpose for which it was intended.
The cost of this box was very great, and as Fred could not
pay for it by making direct drafts upon the firm he raised the
the money by discounting the notes of the firm, through a
broker in Wall street, and paid them when due by renewals, at
an exorbitant rate of interest. He also kept a carriage, three
horses, a groom and a tiger, besides other necessaries that we
must not name, and defrayed the cost of them in the same
manner as he paid for his box. Then he bought a pew in a
fashionable church, became a member of the jocky club, and
took an interest in several joint stock companies, of which he
was made a director. He was first on the list on all
complimentary
benefit occasions, and never failed to do the genteel
thing whenever his name could be put into the papers. His
mother idolized him, and did what she could, in her womanly
way, to stimulate and emulate him, but his brother Tom had
no sympathy with them. He was devoted to business, and
the only change that he made in his manner of living was to
keep a saddle horse and a valet; but his private speculations in
Wall street continued to make losses, and all the purchases for
account of the firm had left heavy balances on the wrong side.
They had a ship bound from Malaga with an entire cargo of
fruit abandoned in mid ocean, she having sprung a leak; she
was insured at the Occidental Office, but before the insurance
fell due, the company broke, and the insurance was lost.
This was a small matter, however. They shipped a cargo of
cotton to Liverpool, upon which they received an advance
of two-thirds the amout of the invoice, and were afterwards
drawn upon for something more than eight thousand pounds
sterling to make good the deficiency in the nett proceeds
short of the advances. This was a serious loss, and what
made it worse, was the fact that it was reported on `change,'
and cast a slight shade upon their credit; and they had the
mortification to hear that their paper had been refused at
one of the banks. As soon as the financier heard of it, he
immediately offered to discount it for less than bank
interest
,
his offer was greedily accepted, and it being a large
note they had not sufficient money to pay it; they were
obliged therefore to submit to a shave, and it fell to John's
turn to negotiate a loan. Tom directed him to the
Brothers
Mildmen, a pair of the smoothest, plumpest, and best
dressed gentlemen in Wall street, who occupied a little dark
office in the base ment of a very high brick building, and
38
by some unseen means, grew rich and maintained themselves
in the quietest, genteelest, and most comfortable manner
conceivable
.
It so happened that they were the very brokers
who had been employed by Fred to dispose of his
accommodation
notes, and therefore they were well acquainted with the
paper offered, and were able to state without hesitation the
terms on which it could be done. John felt himself
peculiarly
fortunate in having fallen into their hands, for it is
assuredly
better to be shaved by a keen smooth razor than by a
rough and rusty one, but when brother Peter, the oldest
and portliest of the Messers Mildmen, named nine per cent
per month and one per cent commission, he started back with
amazement, and returned to the financier and told him that
they must not submit to such extortion. But his partner
convinced him that it would be to their advantage to do so;
for it was not to be debated that their credit was of infinitely
greater importance than the comparatively trifling loss they
would sustain by paying even so large a discount to sustain
it. So John returned to the Brothers Mildmen, and the
negotiation
was completed on the terms named by brother Peter.
Resorting to bad expedients to maintain either your
character
or your credit must always hasten on the catastrophe you
would avoid. This is a rule that has no exceptions. Let no
one, therefore, flatter himself that his case will prove one.
There is no man so cunning, so experienced, or so fortunate,
that he can with impunity violate a law of Nature; integrity
is the one necessary ingredient in busines without which
success
is impossible; it is as essential as light and heat to
vegetation
.
But these common-places are already familiar to you.
We know that they are; but alas, and alas, that there should
be any necessity for repeating them.
Unfortunately for the credit of the new firm, the same
merchant who held the note which they had made so great a
sacrifice to discount, had purchased their other note through
the agency of the brothers Mildmen, and by this operation,
made for the express purpose of hiding their necessities, their
financial resources became known at the Bank of which the
accommodating merchant was a director, and from thence
was whispered around from one friend to another, in a
confidential
way, until the circumstance was known to all the
monied men in Wall street. And, to their utter dismay and
disappointment, the new firm found that their stability was
suspected, in spite of their great exertions and sacrifices to
keep their credit unsullied. It chanced to be one of those
unlucky years when every body loses money, and a
poverty-struck
feeling, for some unaccountable cause, pervades the
community. Prices of every thing fell; they were forced to
sell their stocks at a discount, and some of them proved
nearly
worthless, such as the Cranberry Meadow Rail Road, of
which they held twelve thousand dollars, and the Fever
Swamp Canal, of which they luckily held but eight hundred.
Their shipments almost all turned out disastrously, and they
made many bad debts by failures at home. John grew
alarmed, for he saw his capital melting away at a fearful rate
but the Financier encouraged him, and proposed, by some
grand operation, to retrieve their losses. After much
discussion
they at length agreed to make a speculation in coffee,
and having ascertained the precise number of bags in the
market, they determined to get the control of the whole, and
by that means raise the price; and by close figuring, Tom
demonstrated to his own satisfaction, and in a degree to the
satisfaction of John, that they could realise a profit nearly
equal to all their losses. Fred approved the scheme highly;
and he was anxious to have it carried into immediate
execution
,
for he began to experience some difficulty with the
Messrs. Mildmen in negotiating his accommodation notes, and
his gothic villa was not more than half completed. Money
he must have by some means or other, and his brother had
restricted him to an allowance immensely short of his wants.
He had serious thoughts of undertaking a speculation on his
own account, by giving the paper of the firm, and
monopolizing
all the brandy and champagne in the country. These
were articles of which he considered himself a very competent
judge, but he found upon making an attempt through the
agency of a broker, that time purchases could not be made to
any great extent and he abandoned the idea. The brothers
Mildmen positively refused to renew any more of his notes
without an endorser, and he was in an agony of apprehension
lest a knowledge of his transactions should reach his brother.
But he continued his building and contracted new debts, and
by some means succeded in getting his notes renewed by the
brothers Mildmen, and was as gay and as elegant as ever.
The coffee speculation was entered into as deeply as their
credit and means would allow, but in order to obtain
possession
of certain small lots, they were compelled to pay very
high prices, and obtain the money by more discounts through
the agency of their gentlemanly friends, the Messrs Mildmen.
Other plans were projected and partially entered into, but the
coffee speculation was the great scheme upon which their
hopes chiefly rested, and as so large an operation took a long
time to carry out and wind up, before we acquaint the reader
with the result of it, we will return to other matters that
require
our attention.
CHAPTER VII.
BUILDING COTTAGES AND MAKING LOVE.
THE death of Fidelia's father had changed the quiet happy
home of the old sailor into a house of mourning, but
the visits of John were not the less frequent therefor; he was
unwearied in his attention to the old couple, and strove, by
all the means in his power to make them forget their loss.
He promised to be to them a son, and doubtless Fidelia's grief
was greatly mitigated by his tender solicitude for her welfare.
At the request of the old sailor he had administered upon her
father's estate, and had taken possession of the property left
by him, some five or six thousand dollars. The sad event
that had thrown them all in mourning, had prevented any
arrangements for the marriage, and the day that he so
anxiously
wished for, was deferred until time should dry up their
tears. In the mean time he was preparing a little surprise
for them, or rather for Fidelia, for she filled his mind to the
exclusion of almost every body besides. He had purchased
a few acres on the sunny side of Staten Island and had built
a cottage that he meant to present to her as a bridal gift. It
stood on a gentle eminence, overlooking the sea and the
highlands
of Neversink, but was screened from the Northwest by
lofty hills, whose tops were fringed by cedars, and hardy
evergreens. It was the greenest and sunniest spot in the
world, and as you looked around, the eye could not detect an
object to cause an unpleasant sensation. A little grave yard
lying near, with its white slabs and mossy tomb-stones
peering
above the rich verdure, and gleaming among the trees,
rather harmonized with the quiet and peaceful scene, and
gave to it a sentiment of repose, than awakened a sad or
gloomy thought. The blue sea, gleaming beyond rich fields
of ripening grain and luxuriant verdure, was a source of
unfailing
freshness and beauty, while the white sails of
innumerable
ships, gliding like spirits over the bosom of the vasty
deep, and sailing away into the blue depths of the horizon,
disappearing so gently that you scarce knew when they
were gone, imparted a strange feeling of mystery and
romance
.
Then at night the bright beacons on the Hook and
upon the brow of the highlands, glimmered and sparkled
cheerfully, and seemed like stars, always rising, and yet fixed
in their spheres. And yet they did not seem like stars;
there was such a look of good-natured humanity about them,
a kind of winking intelligence, which seemed to say, here
we are, always on hand of a dark night; let the wind howl
ever so loud, or the rain and sleet drive as hard against us
as it can, we never close an eye or turn back from the
storm, but always keep a sharp look out for homeward bound
sailors. We love to wink at them as they draw towards
home and wish they may find their sweet-hearts and wives
as they left them. Never fear us. One of them was indeed
a regular flasher, and stood higher than the others, and
seemed
to lord it over them, sometimes looking dim and sulky,
like a proud beauty, or a great man in a pet, and then again
bursting out with such a rich stream of light that it dazzled
your eyes to behold it.
In addition to these pleasant sights, the landscape was
dotted
all over with low-roofed stone farm-houses, that glistened
in the sun shine, they were so white and neat; but being
half hidden in the shade of lilacs and horse-chestnuts,
and old apple trees, they did not glare upon you, like the
house of a rich lawyer who showed the fruits of his four
years of classical studies by putting up a clap-board copy of
the parthenon on the tip top of a high hill close bye as
though he would challenge the admiration of mankind. He
had emerged from a narrow dirty street in the city, and
perching
on the top of a high hill he called retiring from the world.
A huge unseemly thing the building was, the very
embodiment
of ostentation, ill taste, and four years of classical studies.
And yet we are in candor compelled to acknowledge that it was
not so strictly classical, but that Ictinus of Athens, the
architect
of the original Parthenon, might possibly have discovered
some trifling deviations from his model, if he had inspected
it with an eye to criticism. But it was not too near to be
disagreeable
,
and, indeed, helped at the distance of John's little
cottage, to variegate the scene, and as you looked around of a
bright day, you saw only a vast picture of green, with
patches of silver, and dusky gold, partially bound by a belt of
azure in the distance. The cottage itself was neither in the
Gothic, Greek, Italian, or Chinese style, but of the
Yankesque
,
as a friend of the owner's called it; it belonged to the
soil and climate, and seemed to have grown there, like the
sycamores and chestnuts, and broad spreading elms which
stood around it; it had a low sloping roof terminating in a
piazza, and every thing around it seemed rather to have been
suggested by the wants and tastes of its builder, than to have
been formed after the whimsical fancies of some architectural
jack-a-napes living three thousand miles off. It was not in
the smallest degree bookish, nor deformed by any Walter
Scottisms, to make plain honest men feel like cuffing the
proprietor's
ears for his affectations. There was nothing about
it for show, but everything for comfort, and in the early part
of June it was almost smothered in roses; they climbed up
against the windows, with their white and damask cheeks, and
breathed into the rooms from their dewy lips the most delicious
perfume. It was the only cottage that we have ever seen that
exactly realized the wish of lady Mary Wortely Montague,
being
in summer shady and in winter warm. It was a source
of great delight to John and he loved to anticipate the
surprise
and happiness of Fidelia when she should first see it. And
he half wished that he had not embarked in business, that he
might spend his whole time there, for the cares and anxieties
of his present way of life, were beginning to weigh heavily
upon him and oppress him sadly. By insensible degrees he
had been led by his partner to take part in some transactions
that troubled him to think of. He had been visited more
constantly
than ever by his father's form, sometimes alone and
sometimes accompanied by his mother and Julia. These
appearances
made him sad at times, and cast a shade of gloom
over his thoughts and feelings that he could not always
dissipate
by mixing in company, and he thought that he might be
free from them if he were to change his residence. He had
given up all hopes of ever finding his father's will, but the
thought sometimes occurred to him that if he could but
communicate
with him by speech, when he appeared to him, he
might be directed to it; but whenever the venerable form of the
old man looked upon him, all mercenary thoughts were chased
from his mind, and he could not have spoken, even though
he had wished to do so. It would have been a great relief
to his feelings if he could have brought himself to make some
friend a sharer of his secret; but he felt a repugnance, which
he could not account for, to divulging a word in regard to his
spiritual visitants. Their mission was to him alone, and he
felt bound to silence. If he could have spoken out, Jeremiah
would have been his confidant. But he could not. He felt
that a spell was upon him.
Jeremiah was not unmindful of a change in the aspect of
his friend, but he attributed it to other causes than the right
one; he knew that John had causes enough for sadness, and,
though he was himself of a hopeful temper, as all good and
sincere people are, he never lacked a reason for a downcast
look, and he did not marvel greatly at the melancholy of
others. But he was full of business at this time, of a strictly
private nature, that left him but little leisure to think of
anybody's
affairs but his own. Miss Hogshart's time was up, and
in a few days she was to return to Berkshire county with her
father, that exemplary friend having come down to yearly
meeting with his eldest son, and Jeremiah had ventured to
talk of marriage. It was a tremendous subject, and when he
spoke to the young lady in rather plain and direct terms, he
thought he had accomplished a great feat; his heart beat
terribly
at first, and his tongue stuck to the roof of his mouth;
his knees trembled, but fortunately for him, they were sitting
on one of the benches on the Battery, and his trepidation was
not discovered by her. But when he found that she listened
to him, not only without laughing at him, but actually with
fondness and apparent pleasure, and that she seconded all his
propositions with great good nature, and allowed him to put
his arm around her waist without flinching or making any
ado about it, a desperate and tumultous energy suddenly
inflamed
him, and before he had time for a second thought, he
clasped his arms around her neck and ravished her lips of at
least a dozen warm delicious kisses, ere she could exclaim,
What is thee doing, Jeremiah? Thee musn't, thee musn't.
But the deed was done; and instead of apologising for
his rudeness, he was half determined to repeat his offence.
In truth we are not certain that he did not before he escorted
her home. A new relationship rom this moment sprung up
between them. He no longer had any doubts of his love for
her, and as she sat in the moonlight with a little bit of her
dove-colored slipper peeping out from beneath her spotted
muslin, he thought her the most bewitching object that the
moon had ever shone upon; he could have fallen at her feet
and kissed them, so full of love was his soul. And she was
to be his forever! Happy, happy, Jeremiah! The world is
not all a fleeting show, after all. They sat a long while on
the Battery benches, watching the moonlight as it flickered
among the trees, and fell in broad sheets of silver upon the
bay, and whispered the most surprising things into each
other's ears, which prompted them ever and anon to a gentle
39
pressure of the hand; and then they told such amusing stories,
and laughed at each other's pleasantries as freely and as gaily
as though there was nothing but laughter, and kisses, and
moonlight in the world. But Time travelled on, wholly
regardless
of them and all the other innocent hearts that were
unfolding themselves, and revelling in the rays of that bright
moon which was fast sinking behind the blue hills of New
Jersey, and Jeremiah, who would not have been guilty of an
indecorum under the influence of fifty moons, proposed
returning
home; and they arrived there in good season,
although
Mr. Bates was just in the act of blowing out the hall
lamp as they entered the door. The hall being dark, a
playful
little scene, mostly pantomimic, was performed by the two
lovers which ended in Jeremiah's catching Miss Hogshart's
pocket handkerchief and bearing it off in triumph to his room,
where he placed it beneath his pillow and was visited by
pleasant dreams while under its potent influence. There is
great witchery in a pocket handkerchief which has once been
handled by one's mistress, as every body can testify who has
been in love; but whether it be in consequence of the aura
which it imbibes from the lips, or fingers of its wearer, we are
unable to state with precision, having never met with any
new-auric professor willing to hazard an assertion upon the
subject.
Jeremiah arose the next morning a new man, neither better
nor worse, perhaps, than he had been, but still a different
being
.
He felt himself capable of greater things; a new life
had been infused into his veins; the earth and its inhabitants
had a new look; there was a broad bland smile upon the face
of nature that he had never seen before. He called upon
Huldah's father with a bold assurance that surprised nobody
so much as himself, and demanded of that smooth, yet
formidable
personage, his daughter's hand. Considering that
Jeremiah
had never worn a drab coat, and that he did not esteem
it essential to salvation to say
thou
when the rest of the world
said
you
, this was no small proof of courage; for friend
Hogshart
was not a man to encourage presumption, even when
habited in his farmer's suit of linsey-woolsey, but attired as he
was now, in his yearly meeting coat and breeches, his fine
portly figure set off to the best advantage, and his
authoritative
,
yet broad and healthful countenance, shadowed by his
immense broad brim beaver, to make such a demand of him
with tolerable composure, required a set of nerves equal to
great undertakings. But Jeremiah approached him with a
stout heart notwithstanding, and we have no doubt felt a glow
of pride in contemplating such a fine looking old fellow as
his future father-in-law.
He looked not much unlike, saving color, the portly bronze
figure of William Penn which delights the eyes and hearts of
the Philadelphians. He condescended in the most gracious
manner to encourage Jeremiah's addresses, but declined giving
a direct assent to his wishes before he had consulted his wife,
Thee shall have my consent, Jeremiah, said the worthy
old soul, provided my wife don't say nay; we must be
consistent
,
thee knows, in all things, and it is but right to consult
her, because I require her to consult me in all that she
undertakes
.
But as Huldah seems to have a strange disposition to
follow the ways of the world, I think it will be best for her
to remain a season under discipline in Berkshire; a change
of pasture, thee knows, sometimes has a good effect upon
stock.
Although Jeremiah was dreadfully shocked by the old
gentleman's
figure of speech, and deprecated the idea of their being
any necessity for such a change as it implied, he made no
objection
to the proposal. He left his future father-in-law with a light
and happy heart, and feeling as proud as his meek and gentle
spirit would allow him to do. It was a whole week before her
departure, and he was determined, in his own phrase, to
redeem
the time, by which he meant, no doubt, taking
moonlight
walks upon the Battery; for so pleasantly had the last
evening's enjoyments impressed themselves upon his memory,
he almost wished that life was but one long moonlight night
and that its chief employment was sitting under the shade of
green trees by the side of Huldah Hogshart. Why should he
not? His hardest duties now appeared but mere pastime to
him, and his deeds of kindness and charity, heretofore his
chief pleasure, were now performed with a new delight;
even Tom Tuck appeared like a gentleman in his eyes, and
F. Augustus almost a man.
CHAPTER VIII.
DIFFICULTIES IN BUSINESS.
WE know not what temptations may beset the paths of
other historians, leading them off from their legitimate
labors into dismal swamps of digression, but the
will-o'-the-wisp
that most frequently flashes across our path, is a
disposition
to sermonise as we hurry along. We see not how it can
well be otherwise, since every act of a man's life would
furnish
a text for a discourse as long as an Oxford tract; and we
who write the histories of mankind, with their lives spread
before us like a map and know in the beginning to what
catastrophe
or good fortune each particular action will lead, how
their most serious interests will be travestied by themselves or
their decendants, and their loftiest aspirations soonest tumbled
into the dust, above all others, might preach with good effect
on the uncertainties of human labor if it were our vocation to
do so in direct terms. But the sermons that men find in
stories must be like those which the exiled Duke found in
stones, unwritten and unspoken. Our privilege is limited,
we must teach by example only; but, were it otherwise, we
should be tempted past resistance to dilate at some length on
the vanity of human calculations when we took note of the
remarkable manner in which the wishes of those hard
working
and thrifty merchants, Hubbard Croaker Tremlett and
Griswold Bacon Tuck, had been thwarted in the disposition
of that property the acquisition of which had cost them so
many years of their lives and so many of the world's pleasures.
Mr. Tremlett had been forty years in accumulating his
property
;
the anxieties, the sleepless nights, the heart burnings,
the unwholsome labor, and the waste of thought it had cost
him, were vastly disproportioned to its value, but he repined
not at these things, because, at last, he could enrich with it one
whom he loved; and yet, by some slight accident, his wishes
were defeated, the object of his affections received not a penny
of his earnings, and his life and his labors had been spent in
vain. But still worse did it happen to Mr. Tuck, for those
who were the especial objects of his dislike, whom he had
designed to cut off from the least participation in his wealth
were the complete masters of his earnings, and made
themselves
drunk with the sweat of his brow, while they despised
him for his labors. Poor man, he had been hoarding up
dollars
all his life for his worthless nephews to squander, when
he would not while living have given them a shilling.
If departed spirits ever do look upon the earth, what a
perturbed
condition must the unhappy ghost of poor Mr. Tuck
have been in, had he chanced to be regarding his two nephews
one morning, when seated alone in their private office, the
following conversation passed between them.
Tom
.What, does that scoundrel Jacobs ask for more
money?
Fred
.Yes, and he must have it. Listen to his
unconscionable
demands. The low wretch; the ungrateful tiger! I'll
kill him. If there's any virtue in lead or steel he's a dead Jew
Tom
.Don't trifle about the matter; read the letter.
Fred
.(Reads) Friend T. (the rattlesnake,) I want
a trifle to help me out of a little difficulty which I got into
about something which I got accused of, and which I am
innocent
as the child unborn. Friend T. you must send me
this or I shall be down upon you like bricks. I'm sorry it's
so much, but it can't be helped, I want five thousand six
hundred dollars ammediently, and you must send it. I say
nothing, but you know what I mean; you must send the
money. I want the dust and no mistake. You have always
been a trump card, so am I. Times are hard. I have been
unfortunate in my speculations, and if you don't send it you
know what will happen. I can give you my word and honor
as a gentleman. But send the money and there's no mistake
in me.
Your Ob't S'vt and esteemed friend,
S.
Jacobs
.
P. S. Don't mistake about the amount, five thousand six
hundred (5,600 dollars,) if you don't send it there's no Texas
about me, and you know what comes next.
Tom
.Curse him, the Iscariot wretch; I wish there was
an Inquisition for his sake and that I was grand Inquisitor, I
would tear his dog's flesh with hot pincers for this. The
whelp, he has already spent almost half of old uncle Gris's
earnings, and but for the miserly old hound I should not have
got in this villian Jew's clutches.
Fred
.That's true, confound him, if he had left us his
money in a gentlemanly decent manner, as he should have
done, we should never have been compelled to make a league
with this Isrealitish devil to secure our own rights. However
it's done now, and there's no help for it. He must have the
money. One thing I will swear to, I will never take a rogue
into my confidence again. I would sooner make a contract
with the old boy himself than with one of his agents. Curse
every body and every thing. To be threatened by a
scoundrel
Jew. I am half resolved to go to Europe.
Tom
.Stop. You talk like a woman. The man must
have the money and we will dispose of him afterwards. It
will be the last. And now for the means. Our account at
the Bank is already overdrawn, so you must shin for it. I
will send him a check, and I must trust to you to provide for
it. I have got other matters to attend to.
The great coffee speculation had been entered into so
deeply
that the entire funds of the house were absorbed in their
purchases; they had got the sole control of the market and
their venture promised to return them a profit nearly equal to
all their losses, when a cargo unexpectedly arrived from
Sumatra, and the owners of it, knowing that our firm would
be compelled to purchase it or lose the advantage which they
had gained at so great a risk, refused to sell it, except for cash
and at a very great advance on the current price. The
resources
of the financier were already exhausted; all the paper,
stock, and merchandise of the House had been hypothecated,
and their credit exhausted, in making their purchases; they
had sold all their negotiable notes to the Brothers Mildmen,
and used to its fullest extent the line of discount allowed them
at the Banks, and the only possible means by which they
could obtain more money was by procuring good endorsers to
their notes. They had already used the names of their friends
to as great an extent as they could be procured, but there was
one name, if they could by any means get it, that would
enable
them to procure the sum they needed. This was the
name of Andrew Kittle, a Scotchman, who had once been in
the service of the old firm of Tremlett & Tuck as a porter,
and who had saved up enough from his monthly salary to
establish himself in a grocery in the Five Points, and had
there made money enough to enable him to set up as a jobber
in Front Street, where he had become very rich, and was
looked upon, not without good reason, as the very staunchest
merchant in his line of business in the city. The financier
proposed to John to call upon Mr. Kittle and offer him a share
in the profits of the coffee speculation, for the use of his name
to the amount of twenty thousand dollars. But John refused,
knowing the cautions and griping disposition of the grocer,
until at length, overcome by the persuasions of his partner, he
consented to make the application, and entertained some hope
that the favors which his father had done for Mr. Kittle, in
his outset in business, might induce him to comply with their
proposition.
It was dark when John called at Mr. Kittle's store, and he
found the rich old grocer busily engaged in mixing liquors
with the aid of a young lad whom he was instructing in this
lucrative part of his profession. But the old gentleman
dropped
his proof-glass, and invited John into his back office, when
he began to talk about the money market and the prospects
of trade, for these were the only subjects upon which he was
ever known to converse, excepting only church affairs, which
occupied his attention on Sundays. John made known the
object of his visit, but did not at first offer him a portion of the
profits in the speculation.
Well, and what good will it do me to endorse a note for
you? replied Mr. Kittle.
It may not do you any good, sir, said John, but it will
do me and my partner a great deal of good.
But that's nothing to me. My money is mine, young
man, mine, mine, said the old man, striking his breast
vehemently
,
to impress the idea more forcibly upon his auditor's
mind that he meant himself and nobody else. It was an
intensely
selfish motion. My money belongs to me, myself. I
made it and I mean to keep it, young man. It belongs to me.
I did not ask you for money, sir, but your signature,
which will cost nothing.
Ha, ha, young man, my signature, what shall I get by
that?
Do you never do anything, but for a consideration? said
John, would you refuse to save a man from drowning
because
you were not paid for your labour?
Ah, ha, said Mr Kittle, you will never get rich, young
40
man; my credit is for myself, I can't lend it to my neighbors,
it's against scripture. I earned it and I mean to keep it good;
always above proof. You won't find old Kittle's paper flying
about in the market; that's the way to have a credit.
I proposed offering you a per centage on the profits
growing
out of this operation, said John, and besides, we will
guarantee you against loss in the case of any accident.
You can't afford it; it's not safe; no, no, your father
wouldn't have done such a thing. It's too much. I can't. It
won't do. I'm principled against it. You have no right to
ask such a thing of me.
I know I have no right, but
Well, well, then don't do it; don't do a thing you know
to be wrong, said the grocer, impressively, at the same time
taking hold of the candle-stick as though he was impatient to
return to his brandy-pipe, I am afraid, young man, you don't
go to church on Sundays. You musn't do things that are
wrong. It's no way to get along in the world. Do as I have
done, and as your father did before you; keep your own
money
and ask no favors, and then you'll not be obliged to grant
them to others.
Good night, said John, making no other reply to his
excellent
advice but hurried out of the store.
Good night; be careful of the skids, said Mr. Kittle, as
he held the candle above his head to light the young man
out. Now Jake, take fifteen gallons out of that new pipe
of Otard Dupuy and fill it up with pure spirits.
Mr. Kittle having delivered this order to the lad, returned
to his little back office and took a large yellow pocket-book
out of the iron chest, from whence he drew a huge bundle of
notes and selected four bearing the signature of Tremlett and
Tucks. His hand trembled as he made a minute of their
amounts. It was a large sum, so large that it frightened him.
He had bought these notes of the Messrs. Mildmen at a very
large discount, and the application for his name alarmed him
and as ill luck would have it, the next day was Sunday, and
he would not be able to sell them. Unhappy Mr. Kittle.
After a week of contention and turmoil, one day of holy peace
was necessary to a pious soul like his. Let us hope that the
thoughts of his doubtful paper disturbed not on the morrow
the comforting exercises of the blessed Sabbath, and that he
enjoyed, in his velvet cushioned pew, his accustomed hour of
repose, under the soothing influence of Doctor Slospoken's
drowsy discourse and the slow and solemn chaunt of Mr.
Parsnip, the precentor's voice.
John returned from the grocer's to his own counting room,
and reported his ill success to the financier, who thereupon
gave utterance to prodigious volumes of abusive epithets, not
only upon the head of Mr. Kittle, and the whole Scottish
people, but upon the respectable fraternity of grocers
throughout
the world. It was a strange peculiarity of the elder
Tuck's, that when an individual offended him his displeasure
included every possible person and thing in the most remote
degree connected with the offender, extending even to all of
the same name, profession or country. He was, indeed, the
most thorough and complete hater that ever lived, and yet he
never allowed his dislikes to interfere in any manner with
what he conceived to be his interest. To do so would have
been to do an injury to himself, and not to the object of his
hatred. And we must not deny him the justice to admit that
he was a person of such strict impartiality that he had as
little scruple in sacrificing a friend as an enemy, when
either stood in his way. He was one of those people whom
it is dangerous even to know or be known by; and if he did
not do you an injury, it was because it was inconvenient.
And yet, in spite of these singularities, the financier was a
very adroit person in making friends of those from whom he
wanted favors; he had two winning qualities, which are
very serviceable in giving a man a quiet passage through
life; he could always laugh when he thought it necessary,
and he never did think it necessary unless something was to
be gained by it; and he could lie without blushing. He was
a true laughing philosopher, not one of those merry cackling
creatures who are forever throwing away rich streams of
mirth upon promiscuous witticisms, and so exhausting their
powers that when anything is to be gained by laughing at a
dull story, or a stupid practical joke, they cannot command a
smile to save themselves. No, he was none of those vapid
minded ne'er-do-weels, not he. His mirth was always
sincere
;
he meant something by it.
It was Saturday night, as we have already stated, and on
Monday the bargain for the newly arrived coffee must be either
closed or rejected. Upon this one transaction depended the
result of their speculation. If they could obtain possession
of this one cargo the market would be in their hands, and a
magnificent fortune would be the result; otherwise, the
issue of their extensive and hazardous enterprize would be
extremely doubtful. They required but a small sum of
money
compared to the whole amount they had embarked in
this speculation, but they had exhausted all their resources,
and there was no way by which it could be obtained but by
a good endorser, and this they had in vain tried to procure.
The two partners parted for the night, with their minds full
of the matter, and John had been so absorbed in it, that he
could think of nothing but coffee; everything that he saw or
heard, or smelt, was tinged, or scented with coffee; and even
when he fell asleep he dreamed that he had stolen a sack of
Mocha and was pursued over the desert by a horde of wild
Arabs; then again he found himself in that place bargaining
for a cargo of it with an unmentionable prince, where the
Haytien President said that you might lure a Yankee
merchant
with only a bag of the berry. As for Fred, the junior
partner, he had selected out a bag of the finest old government
Java from all their purchases, and had sent it over to his beau
ideal villa, where he was entertaining a small party of
foreigners
,
consisting of singers, authors, and actors, to whom he
swore that his coffee was the genuine Mocha, imported in one
of his own ships direct from the Red Sea.
Let us leave them all to their cares and revels, and give
ourselves up to the refreshing quiet and repose of the
blessedest
day of the seven, ere we enter upon the exciting and
eventful week which is to follow.
CHAPTER IX.
MONDAY.
WHETHER Mr. Kittle had allowed his mind to dwell
upon mere worldly matters during the Sabbath just
past, or not, we have no means of knowing, and as he
attended
with his customary strictness to all the duties of the day,
we have no right to believe that he did; but we have the
best reasons in the world for presuming that with Monday's
light his thoughts reverted back to the subject which had
occupied them on Saturday night, as earnestly as though no
Sunday had intervened. For no sooner did he reach his
store than he grasped the notes of Tremlett & Tucks which
he had bought of the Messrs. Mildmen, and hastened with
them to those gentlemen, and gave orders for their sale at a
larger discount than that at which they had been purchased,
which was a very large discount indeed, for they were some
of Fred's renewal notes. Mr. Kittle did not give any
explanations
,
but merely said that he was in want of the money,
which the brothers Mildmen understood in a figurative sense,
for they knew that Mr. Kittle was a moneyed man, and that
he could procure as much as he might want at legal interest;
therefore they inferred that he had discovered something
unfavorable
in relation to our new firm, and as they held some
of Fred's notes themselves, as collateral security for a
temporary
loan, they resolved to protect their own interests first
by making sale of the notes in their possession, and offer those
belonging to Mr. Kittle afterwards. Mr. Kittle could very
easily have obtained the money for the notes by offering them
at the Grocers' Bank of which he was a director, but as he
would in that case have been obliged to put his own name
upon them, he would have gained nothing by the operation.
While the Brothers Mildmen are running about trying to
make sale of their securities, we will look in upon the new
firm and see how they succeed with their suspended bargain,
upon which their own fortunes, as well as the fortunes of
many who do not as yet dream of danger, hang. Tom and
his brother met their partner when he came into the office
with a pleasant smile, and shook him cordially by the hand,
an unusual demonstration of good feeling, and then rubbed
their own hands as though they were excessively happy; and
they well might be, the mails had brought them intelligence
from every quarter of a rise in coffee, and they informed John
that they had completed the bargain for the new cargo that
had stood in their way. He enquired upon what conditions,
and they, or rather Tom, informed him, after locking the
door, in a whisper, that they were to give endorsed notes at
ninety days, upon condition that the notes should not be put
into the Banks and that the terms should not be made public.
And who is the endorser? asked John.
Who? replied the financier, ha! ha! ha! old Kittle,
of course.
But he has refused; and I will sooner forego the whole
profit of the speculation than ask him again, said John.
Never mind; a bird that can sing, and won't sing, must
be made to sing, said the financier, leave him to me. I have
got his name, and all that I require of you is to complete the
arrangement with the owners of the coffee, and keep the
transaction
to yourself. Ask no questions.
But I must ask one question, and it must be answered,
said John, by what means did you gain Mr. Kittle's consent
to this arrangement?
I see no necessity for your asking such a question, said
Tom, and I have already told you that it is a private
arrangement
,
and it must remain so.
It takes Tom to do the financiering, said the junior
partner
,
with a knowing wink.
But in a matter like this, said John, you have no right
to have any secrets, you must not forget that I am a party
interested
,
and I shall consent to no arrangement so important
as this, unless I know all the conditions of it.
Then you may go to the financier checked himself
suddenly and gulphed down whatever word it was that he
was going to utter. Do you doubt my honor? he
continued
,
more mildly, but still with an angry flash of his grey eyes,
do you leave me to do all the business of the house, make all
the contracts, write all the letters, and after you have
yourself
failed to complete a negotiation for an endorser, insist on
breaking the contract when I have succeeded in arranging for
one through the aid of my personal friends and my own
personal
influence? To gratify your stubborn whims, myself
and mother and brother must be ruined, when we gave you
an interest in the concern out of charity to you.
You have said enough, replied John, I will destroy
nobody's property or happiness to gratify my own feelings;
but bear in mind that you and I are no longer as we were.
I will ask for no explanations; complete the arrangement that
you have begun and when this speculation has been closed,
we will revert to this morning's talk again.
Just as you please, replied Tom, but henceforth I am
going to be head of this house, whether my name stands first
or not.
We will not quarrel about that now, said John, and one
of the clerks coming in just at that moment, put an end to the
conversation, and when they were left alone again, the
financier
requested John to call upon the managing partner of the
house of Madden & Co., the owners of the Sumatra coffee,
and tell him that they would complete the bargain for the
entire cargo by a delivery of the notes the next day, to the
estimated amount of two-thirds of its value, according to
agreement.
Curse him, said Tom, as his partner closed the door,
we will have him now, and if he doesn't repent of the day
that he was dragged from the pauper's nest where he belongs,
my name is not Tom Tuck.
But this hideous speech called forth no remark from his
brother Fred, who sat behind his violet curtain reading the
last new novel; nor was it in truth intended to do so, it being
a kind of soliloquy in which the financier indulged too often
to excite any particular remark when he was overheard,
as he was not in this instance. Fred was deeply engaged in
in the midst of one of those delicious bits of description which
the fertile pens of the great geniuses in Great Britain are
constantly
throwing off for the benefit of our young ladies and
gentlemen, and steam presses and paper makers and
literary
street hawkers and pedlars, and he had become quite
oblivious to coffee speculations and ninety days notes, being
employed much more to his liking in cramming himself with
such interesting facts as these:
The round red sun was fast sinking like a weary and
battle-stained knight, far into the distant west, while a gor
geous canopy of glorious clouds, bathed in streams of fiery
gold, hovered around him as though they were the hangings
of the violet-colored bed in which he was about to stretch
his mail-covered limbs, when Sir Reginald halted on his
coal-black charger before the quaintly carved oaken gates of
a somewhat dilapidated baronial castle of the olden time.
On either side might be seen clumps of England's glorious
trees, while above the distant coppice a light blue smoke
arose in the air, like some gentle spirit just exhaled from
the earth. In front was a terrace flanked with quaintly
carved flower-pots, and beyond that stretched a lawn several
41
possed to the eyes of all who looked upon it. Beyond the
lawn again were seen the lines of a distant city, apparently
of considerable extent. Winding along at the foot of the
hill and making the commencement of what might be called
a plainthough to say the truth, the wide space to which
we must give that name, was broken by many undulations
appeared a hard but sandy road, from which a carriage
way led by a circuit up to the mansion. In some places
high banks covered with shrubs and bushes, &c.The
Castle itself had nothing very remarkable in its appearance
and therefore we give a particular description of it. The
middle part consisted of a large square mass of stone
masonry, rising somewhat higher and projecting somewhat
farther than the rest of the building. On either side of this
centre was a wing flanked with a small square tower, and
in each wing and in each tower was a small door opening
upon the terrace. Manifold lattices, too, with narrow panes
set in lead, ornamented these inferior parts of the building
in long strait rows, and chimneys nearly as numerous tow
ered up from the tall ivy-clad gables, not quite in keeping
with the trim regularity of the other parts of the building.
It had in the centre a large hall door with a flight of stone
steps, and on each side of the entrance were three small
windows in frames of chisselled stone, &c.
He had already read near two hundred pages of similar
description about distant copses, quaintly carved pots, lattice
windows, and England's glorious clumps of trees; and he
had in the course of his life read some millions of pages of
similar powerful writing, by the same eloquent and prolific
author, who had for twenty years produced his three or four
novels yearly, to the utter amazement and great delight of
hosts of readers on the American Continent, who never could
cease wondering at his amazing fertility; although, had they
ever looked through a kaleidiscope and noticed what an
infinite
number of shapes may be made by shaking together half
a dozen bits of stained glass, and then remembered that there
are some forty thousand words in the dictionary, it strikes us
that their wonder need not have been so excessive.
The splendid production from which the above glowing
extract was made, was a novel called Sir Reginald, a Tale
of other days, which at this time was in everybody's hands;
and everybody was fired with a noble emulation to see who
should read it through first, so that when the question should
be put, have you read Jones' last novel? they could say,
yes. But we doubt not Fred Tuck had left every body
behind him, unless indeed it were the Editors, who have a
wonderful faculty of reading through all new books the same
day that they are issued, provided they be re-publications from
the English Press and issued here by some wealthy
publishers
who has grown rich by pilfering the fruit of other
people's labors. And then these patriotic Editors relieve their
overburdened hearts and enlighten their readers by bringing
out their most exciting expletives, powerful, brilliant,
splendid, glorious, profound; and the literary circles,
and the literary street hawkers are in a state of most brilliant
excitement for at least two days. Our main object, however,
in making this extract was not for the purpose of stating
these grave facts, but that our readers might know what it
was that so fascinated the junior partner of the firm of
Tremlett & Tucks, and diverted his mind from the really
grave and important cares which should have pressed heavily
upon him; which gave his mind that romantic tinge so
remarkably
developed in his beau ideal villa, and the
general
style of his conversation and dress. It was owing to this
very Sir Reginald, that he forgot to make provision for the
check which his brother had sent to Mr. Jacobs on Saturday,
in consequence of which that gentleman had became involved
in a most unpleasant dilemma, that cannot but lead to the
unhappiest results.
Mr. Jacobs had been so imprudent as to join an association
of gentlemen who were extremely averse to eating bread
which was savoured by their own sweat, probably from an
ignorance of the fact that such food was conducive in a high
degree both to sweet sleep and healthy digestion. The means
adopted by these gentlemen for making a genteel living, was
by circulating very exact resemblances to bank notes, which
were in truth, so far as intrinsic value was concerned, in
every particular as valuable as the originals, being composed
of exactly the same materials, and quite as creditable as works
of art. And no doubt these financiers looked upon
themselves
as very honest people, and entertained a proper degree
of righteous indignation towards those unworthy men who
circulate counterfeit coin, which is a very different thing from
what it appears to be, and will not bear the test of analysis;
whereas a counterfeit bank note will. We do not intend to
defend these associates in their bad practices, but we are
unwilling
to judge any man harshly, and therefore we give the
best construction to their motives which they will bear.
Furthermore
,
they had each made a private resolve, unbeknown
to the others of course, that in case of difficulty by coming in
contact with the law, they would turn state's evidence, and
get clear of imprisonment themselves by informing against
their associates, and therefore they were not troubled by any
of those hideous fears which often, perhaps always, afflict
those who indulge in solitary crimes. But if this feeling of
there being a secret passage of escape in time of difficulty
tended to make their lives more pleasant and comfortable, it
had a counterbalancing ill effect by rendering them more
careless in their operations, and consequently more liable to
detection than they would otherwise have been. And in
consequence
of this very resolve, Mr. Jacobs had the ill luck to
be detected in attempting to pass a ten dollar note in payment
for a bowl of oyster soup at a cellar in Mulberry Street. The
proprietor of the establishment, the Mulberry Oyster
Saloon
chanced to be a good judge of bank-bills from the fact
of his having been engaged in the manufacture of them once
himself, and he knew that Mr. Jacobs' tender was a
counterfeit
the moment he put his eye upon it, and guessing the
character of his customer, he leapt over his bar and caught
the unfortunate gentleman in his brawny arms before he had
a chance to escape.
Mr. Jacobs was vehement in his protestations of innocence,
and swore that he had just received the note from the teller of
the Bank. But the Mulberry gentleman knew something of
the worldat least the worst part of it, which is alone called
The World
, by the worldand, to use his own expression,
he read Mr. Jacobs like a book, which, in justice to him, we
acknowledge was a very bad simile, since his manner of
reading
a book was the very reverse of facile, while his reading of
his prisoner was very neat and precise. Therefore he turned
an adder-like ear to all his oaths and protestations and
dispatched
his colored assistant to the police office for his old
acquaintance and chum, Cornele Racry, into whose hands he
meant to deliver Mr. Jacobs with an understanding that they
should share in whatever emoluments might arise from his
arrest. But no sooner had the black emissary left the saloon
than Mr. Jacobs became alarmed for his personal freedom and
offered the oyster proprietor a very large sum if he would
allow
him to escape. And we are by no means positive that he
would not have overcome his captor's scruples, but,
unfortunately
,
the gross amount of real money which he had in his
possession did not exceed four and sixpence, and the honest
gentleman remained as inflexible as Brutus.
When the police officer arrived, who, of all other men, should
he prove, but the very individual that had arrested Mr. Jacobs
before on the complaint of Jeremiah. They knew each other
at a glance, and the prisoner made no attempt at concealment;
but knowing that police officers and proprietors of oyster
saloons
were possessed of like feelings with other men, he made
his captors a plump offer of a thousand dollars, if they would
let him go as soon as it should be paid. Now, as this was a
much larger sum than they could hope to gain by delivering
him into the hands of Justice, they would have accepted his
proposition without hesitation had they not thought, from his
making so handsome an offer at first, that they would get
more by holding off. Therefore they made a great parade of
their indignation, which they did so well that even Mr. Jacobs
was deceived by it, and he kept increasing his offer, five
hundred dollars a bid until he reached five thousand dollars,
when they gave in; although the sum appeared to them so
preposterously large that they had scarce a hope of its being
paid. Had Mr. Jacobs been possessed of that magnificent
sum himself, it is probable that he would not have parted with
it to purchase his neck from a halter, but as he meant that
somebody else should pay it, he cared less about it, although
his instinct made him higgle for a good bargain. He had, as
he thought, exhausted the Tucks long before, and he would
not, under ordinary circumstances, have dared to apply to
them, but now there was no other resource for him, and he
sent them the threatening letter which the reader has already
seen, and increased his demand six hundred dollars that he
might have something in his pocket when he got clear of his
present difficulty.
Almost as much to his own surprise as that of his captors,
he received a letter from Tom Tuck, with a check enclosed,
for the required amount. As the police officer could not be
known in this transaction without injury to his professional
reputation, he was obliged to entrust the check to his chum
to get it cashed; and this gentleman had no sooner got it in
his possession than he conceived the brilliant idea of keeping
the whole amount, and not returning to his saloon. But he
was prevented from carrying out this idea, for the Teller of
the Bank refused to pay the check, alledging as a reason that
the account of the firm was not good for it. But Mr. Jacobs
assured the exasperated gentlemen, when they threatened to
hurry him off to prison, that the check would be paid on
Monday, and begged them to furnish him with refreshments
becoming a person of his station while they kept him in
confinement
.
And the proprietor of the saloon, with great good
nature, allowed him to call for the choicest refreshments in
his establishment.
When Monday arrived the check was again presented, and
again refused; and as the Teller eyed the holder of it very
suspiciously, he began to fear that Mr. Jacobs had been
playing
a foul game, and he retreated very precipitately from the
Bank, and called at the office of Tremlett & Tucks to enquire
whether the check were genuine or not. Unluckily both the
Tucks were out, and as John, on referring to the check books
could find no entry of such a check, and none of the clerks
knew of any such payment being made, he pronounced it a
forgery, although the filling up and signature so nearly
resembled
his partner's hand. He was about to question the
Mulberry gentleman as to his becoming possessed of it, when
that personage took flight, lest he should be arrested as an
accomplice, and ran with all his might until he reached the
saloon, when, not content with heaping all the abusive epithets
of which he was master on Mr. Jacobs' head, he had the
meanness to bestow upon him some pretty severe kicks. It
was in vain now, that Mr. Jacobs begged for more time, both
the officer and the saloon proprietor were so exasperated that
they would listen to none of his explanations and promises,
but after they had emptied his pockets of everything of value
that they contained, they hurried him off to the house of
detention
and cursed themselves for putting any faith in the
representations
of a rogue.
Mr. Jacobs' reflections when he found himself in prison
were the very reverse of agreeable, as may well be conceived;
'twas a strange fact, considering the risks which he
voluntarily
encountered, but he had a horror of confinement
amounting
almost to mania. Indeed, it might have been owing in
a great degree to his love of freedom, that he had never
adopted any regular business, but preferred the uncertainties
and dangers of the lawless life he had led, with its sweets of
liberty, to the irksome confinement of a profitable profession.
He could hardly believe that the Tucks had intentionally
deceived
him, although he had not formed a very high opinion
of their morals from his intercourse with them, and yet it was
evident enough that they had treated him with neglect and
allowed him to be sent to prison; and he felt bitterly disposed
towards them. If he did not render them a greater disservice
than they had done him, it would be rather out of
consideration
to his own happiness than theirs. He paced up and down
the narrow apartment in which he was confined, debating in
his mind whether or not the pleasure of ruining two persons
would be a sufficient compensation for bringing ruin upon
himself, when the grated door of his prison was unlocked
and another subject was thrust in. As the new-comer was
decently dressed, and wore altogether a respectable rather
than a flashy air, Mr. Jacobs felt happy in the prospect of a
genteel companion, for he hated low company with all his
heart, probably from never having been familiar with any
other. So he advanced towards his new companion and held
out his hand in a frank and agreeable manner, but, as he took
a nearer look he started back with unfeigned amazement and
consternation, as we doubt not almost any other person would
have done under similar circumstances. The new prisoner
was Jeremiah Jernegan.
CHAPTER VI.
WILL EXPLAIN THE CAUSE OF JEREMIAH'S CONFINEMENT,
AND CONTAIN A REMARKABLE CONFESSION BY MR.
JACOBS
.
AS our motive in writing this history is not to tantalize our
reader by exciting his curiosity without satisfying it at
the first convenient moment, we hasten to narrate the strange
events which led to the incarceration of Mr. Jernegan, and
also to remove any unjust suspicions which that
unlooked-for
circumstance may have awakened in the reader's mind.
Although we commenced our last chapter with the events
of Monday morning, we must now revert to Saturday night,
and happy should we esteem our lot, could we, consistently
with our duty, avoid the narration of certain facts which
have so important a bearing upon the fortunes of the main
personages of our history as to forbid their suppression. The
reader will bear witness to our constant aim to represent
human
nature in its very brightest aspect, but he cannot know,
of course, how often we have sacrificed a thrilling and
startling
incident, lest we should, by the exhibition of it,
undermine
his faith in the dignity of humanity and give cause to
ill-favoured minds to sneer at human nature; and if our
narrative
appears dull and tame, when compared with other
histories
,
justice to our subject compels us to aver that it is rather
owing to what may be deemed by some a too fastidious
temper
in the author, than to any want of exciting interest which
42
the materials placed in our hands intrinsically possessed. But
of one thing we can boast, with a consciousness of having
performed our duty, that where necessity has compelled us
to spread before the reader an unworthy action, we have
endeavoured
to find some palliating circumstances to screen the
perpetrator of it from the contempt which a virtuous mind
must always feel towards a vicious man. It is a foul bird
that defiles its own nest. Truly it must be an ill-ordered
mind that finds gratification in underrating its own nature;
that can only see in mankind the evil which cannot,
unhappily
,
be hid; that shuts its eyes, like a moping owl, to the
brightness and beauty of day, but opens them to the night
only to howl at the darkness which it would be better to
endure
in silence, like the other fowls of the air whose notes of
gladness make even the brightness of day more cheery and
pleasant.
As the time was so near at hand when Miss Hogshart was
to leave for Berkshire, Jeremiah had asked for a few days
leave of absence from the counting room, that he might be
able to spend more time in her society, and also to show her
more of those little attentions, which are so pleasant to give
and receive, than he had before done. In conformity with his
resolution to redeem the time, he had invited her to
another
walk on the Battery; and to that pleasant spot they had
betaken themselves; and beneath the green boughs of a huge
sycamore, through whose motionless leaves the stars were
shining like golden fruit upon the wide spread branches, they
sat down and re-enacted some of those thrilling and never
forgotten
passages which are common in the lives of almost all
lovers
,
but which had been exceedingly rare in the lives of
Jeremiah
and Miss Hogshart. As their occupations had
detained
them until after dark, the evening was nearly spent before
they reached this pleasant resort. They sat as long as
prudence
would allow, and just before they were to return,
Jeremiah
took a little Bible from his coat pocket, and opening it,
somewhere in the middle of the old Testament, held it upon
his knee, while he and Huldah clasped their hands across it,
and repeated together the vow of the Moabitess. Whither
thou goest I will go and where thou lodgest I will lodge;
thy people shall be my people, and thy God my God; where
thou diest will I die, and there will I be buried; the Lord
do so to me and more also if aught but death part thee and
me. Although the stars glittered brightly through the trees
and besprinkled the turf around them with faint rays of light,
yet there was not enough to enable them to read the small
print of Jeremiah's pocket bible, but he had the words by
heart, and she repeated them after him. Never were words
repeated with a more devout feeling than were these by
Jeremiah
,
and at the end, as if not satisfied with their solemn
meaning
,
to make them still more binding he put his arms around
her neck, and sealed his vow with an earnest and hearty kiss
upon her lips.
But while they were thus yielding themselves up to these
tender, yet chaste dalliances, a scene was enacting in their
boarding house which was to turn all their bright
anticipations
into dark and gloomy forebodings, which was to change
confidence into suspicion, love into hate, and hope into
despair
.
Alas for earthly anticipations! Alas for human frailty!
Scarcely had the two lovers left their boarding house when
a four wheeled cab stopped at the door they had just closed,
and a very magnificent lady accompanied by a splendid
gentleman
,
rang the bell and inquired for Mrs. Bates. Mrs. Bates
made her appearance and invited the lady and gentleman,
into
her parlor, where some remarkably genteel courtesies were
exchanged by the ladies and some very stylish bows were
made by the gentleman, all in the strictest fashion and
according
to the latest advices from Paris. The magnificent lady
was tall, thin and genteel; she was dressed
en rigeur
, and
perfumed
merveille;
her jewelry was
recherch
, and every
thing about her was Parisian except her tongue and her taste,
both of which were indigenous to the soil; her name was
Madame Grandemaison, and she was the proprietor of the
Parisian
Rooms, and the boss of Huldah Hogshart. The
gentleman
was Monsieur Grandemaison, her husband, some fifteen
years her junior, and the proprietor of a pair of coal-black
mustaches
and a glossy imperial, which he kept in very perfect
order. These were his possessions and his employments. It
may not be uninteresting to the reader to know that Monsieur
was a count in his own country, and that he had in his
possession
,
or rather his wife had in hers, undoubted testimonials,
which she sometimes showed to an intimate friend, in proof of
the fact. But it is very much to the credit of Madame
Grandemaison
,
that she never allowed herself to be called by her
proper title of countess, except in sport, alleging what was no
doubt true, that she was well satisfied with the title of an
American lady, although she had told some of her more
intimate
acquaintances that when she went over to Paris with her
husband she should of course, stick up for her rights, and
Madame Grandemaison's friends commended her spirit and
intimated, though not in direct terms, that she would create
quite a sensation at the French court.
My name, Madam, said the lady as soon as she had seated
herself is Madame Grandemaison, and this is Monsieur, my
husband.
Yes'm, replied Mrs. Bates holding her head very stiff
lest Madame Grandemaison should flatter herself that she was
in the slightest possible degree overcome by the announcement.
I have seen you in your store when I have called to look at
your hats'm.
Hem! hem! ejaculated Monsieur, and his lady felt a
tingling in her cheeks, although there was no visible evidence
of an unusual sensation in that part of her system; it being
many years since the habit of blushing had fallen into
desuetude
with her.
You keep a boarding-house, I believe, Madam, said
Madame Grandemaison, while her greyish eyes twinkled with
malicious pleasure.
I accommodate a few of my friends, if you please, 'em,
said Mrs. Bates, straightening herself up into a more erect
position
.
I believe that one of my workwomen by the name of
Hogshart, or something of that kind, boards with you,
Madam
?
A young lady of that name, a friend of the South street
merchants, Tremlett and Tucks, is staying with me, 'm,
replied
Mrs. Bates with dignity.
A quakeress, I believe, madam? said Madame
Grandemaison
.
A friend, replied Mrs Bates.
It's all one to me, only I never could see the propriety of
calling those people friends; they are no friends to my business,
I am sure I should be forced to shut up my store if all the
ladies dressed like quakers, Mrs. Bates. And as for the young
person that I have been enquiring about, she has been a
miserable
friend to me, I assure you; she has proved my greatest
enemy, said Madame Grandemaison, who, finding that Mrs.
Bates was not a person to be awed by her grandeur, easily fell
into a very natural and colloquial style, which was
immediately
assumed by Mrs. Bates who exclaimed in great
consternation
,
Good Heavens! Mrs. Grandmason, what is it you
mean?
I have just discovered, Mrs. Bates, that that minx, Miss
Hogshart, that demure creature which I have nourished in the
bosom of my business like a daughter, has robbed my
showroom
of hundreds of dollars.
Hundreds, tousands! said Monsieur Grandemaison.
Hush my dear, don't open your lips, said his lady, the
ungrateful minx has ruined me, Mrs. Bates, and ruined
herself
too. Here Madame Grandemaison sobbed hysterically,
and said she actually shed tears; not so much for her own
loss, as for the poor girl's sake.
Impossible! exclaimed Mrs. Bates, it cannot be; such a
sedate young lady; one of the society of friends, who never do
anything wrong, and her father a public speaker too.
Impossible
!
impossible!
Ah! you will see, said Monsieur Grandemaison.
My love, will you hush, or must I quit my business! said
the excited lady. It's true, Mrs. Bates, I assure you. I wish
it was not. Whole dozens of the finest gloves, and such laces
and scarfs, O! it's incredible.
Be careful, Madame Grandemaison, be careful, said Mrs.
Bates.
I wish I had been more careful, Mrs. Bates, said Madame,
if I had I should not be a ruined lady as I am now. Lace
veils, and French slippers without number, and the very best,
too; such an avaricious creature, and I so good to her too;
many's the lunch of cold fish cakes that I have given that
girl. I will never again believe there is such a thing as
goodness in the world, Mrs. Bates.
Have you any proof, Mrs. Grandmason? said Mrs. Bates.
Proof! Lead me to her room and you shall see, Madam.
By all means, replied Mrs. Bates, for she was curious to
know herself what truth there might be in Madame
Grandemaison's
charges, and taking the candle she led the way
towards
Huldah's apartment, followed by the magnificent
milliner
and her husband. But Madame Grandemaison, thought
that a young lady's chamber was not a proper place for
Monsieur
to visit, and she ordered him back into the parlour where
he sat in the dark and whistled a fashionable waltz until his
wife returned.
The two ladies having reached Miss Hogshart's room,
locked
themselves in, began their search; the first object that
arrested
their attention was a plethoric looking band box tied up
with scarlet ribbons; this they tore open without hesitation
and discovered a very curious collection of Parisian gew gaws,
which being turned out upon the floor caused both ladies to
lift up their hands in amazement.
My richest satins, exclaimed Madame Grandemaison,
here's a dozen of my fifty dollar pocket handkerchiefs. O,
heavens, the lace caps! Merciful powers, the gauze scarfs!
O, mon Doo, mon Doo! what bunches of orange blossoms!
Five dozens of kid gloves. Goodness, goodness, what
remnants
of shot silks.
Next they examined a clothes press, from whence they
drew broch shawls, lace scarfs, and stockings innumerable;
under the bed they found another band box with a similar
assortment
of finery, together with bottles of orange water, a
collection
of pearl hair pins, mosaic broaches and a box of
genuine
Farina cologne, and lying upon the bureau, Madame
Grandemaison found a gold locket of very red hair, at the sight
of which she came very near fainting away. It was a present
from her first husband and contained one of his precious
curls; and her own initials were marked upon the back of it,
or rather letters intended for that purpose, U. A. for
Eunice
Allen. She had missed it for months, and she declared
that she valued it more than all her goods. Other articles of
less value were discovered in the bureau drawers, which
Madame
Grandemaison recognized as her property, and increased
the heap upon the floor to a frightful size. It was so
astounding
that Mrs. Bates ran down to call her husband to look at
it, and Madame Grandemaison went for Monsieur. It was a
curious sight, and we wish that all young ladies who indulge
in an inordinate love of dress could have seen it. We do not
wish that they could have seen the unfortunate Huldah, when
a few minutes after the ladies had retired with their husbands,
she came home with Jeremiah, and finding no light in the
parlour thought that Mrs. Bates had gone to bed, and so
bounded lightly up to her own room, where as she burst open
the door she uttered a terrible scream and fell senseless upon
the floor, because we would not that anybody should have
witnessed her melancholy condition, and therefore we shall
not describe more particularly what took place, excepting to
state that Jeremiah heard the scream and hastened up stairs
when the dreadful truth was told him, and he was so much
overcome that he sat all night in his chamber unable to speak
or even to pray.
Monsieur Grandemaison and Mr. Bates took up the finery
in their arms and loaded the cab with it; and then Mr. Bates
went in pursuit of friend Hogshart, whom he found at the
house of a rich quaker in Beekman street. And the old man
came, thinking that his daughter was suddenly taken ill, but
when he saw her, and was told the cause of her distraction,
for she lay upon the floor uttering the most piteous moans, it
was the most heart-breaking sight that ever was witnessed,
to see him as he knelt over her and wept. Poor old man!
He uttered no reproaches to her, but he reproached himself
for having exposed her to such cruel temptations.
It was past midnight before the house had regained its
usual quiet. Before Madame Grandemaison left, Mrs. Bates
fell upon her knees and begged that out of regard to the
character
of her establishment, she would not make the affair
public; and the magnanimous milliner promised to exercise a
proper degree of Christian forbearance. The next morning
was Sunday, but Mr. Bates thought that the strange affair
would be so gratifying to Tom Tuck, inasmuch as Jeremiah
was a party concerned, that he hastened off before breakfast
and related all the circumstances of the case to that
gentleman
.
What the exact motives were which influenced Mr.
Bates, we know not, whether he thought that the Financier
would make more mischief out of it than any body else, or
that he would contrive some very ingenious plan to heal up
the wounds that were now bleeding in many bosoms in
consequence
of the unhappy event, we have no means of
knowing
to a certainty, because he never made any declaration on
the subject, but the fact is undeniable that he could not have
made a confident of a more improper person, as will appear in
the sequel. If he had gone to John, some good might have
come of his errand, but he had gone out of the city to remain
until Monday, or he might have done so.
It so happened that Mrs. Tuck and Madame Grandemaison
were on very intimate terms; the ladies bore, indeed, some
resemblance
morally to each other, although physically they
were quite dissimilar, and an acquaintance which was formed
in the first place, in the way of business, for Madame
Grandemaison
furnished Mrs. Tuck with her dresses, had ripened
into a friendship. They were members of the same church,
sat in adjoining pews, wore the same dresses, partook of the
same communion, slept under the same sermons and subscribed
ed to the same articles. They always met at the church door,
and Mrs. Tuck, to show her Christian humility and let the
world know that she was not too proud to speak to her
dressmaker
in public, would sometimes condescend to stop and
talk as familiarly with Madame Grandemaison as though she
had been the wife of an importer or jobber. And in these
little conversations Mrs. Tuck would sometimes gather
information
in regard to the cost and texture of half the ladies'
dresses in church, which was mutually comforting and
pleasant
,
one lady taking as much pleasure in imparting as the
other did in receiving such knowledge. The next morning
after the exposure of poor Huldah's crimes, the two ladies,
were so impatient to see each other and talk over the awful
affair, that they never nodded once during the sermon,
although
we are by no means sure that they imbibed more of
the blessed words of the good doctor than they had usually
done. As they emerged from the wooden portal of the Gothic
temple in which they worshipped, they drew towards each
other as if one were a magnet and the other a bar of steel.
Being in the shadow of the church their thoughts were, of
course, far removed from the sublunary sphere in which they
dwelt. Their salutations were simultaneous.
What an excellent discourse, said Mrs. Tuck.
What a beautiful sermon! said Madame Grandemaison.
43
Such language!
Such sentiments!
So orthodox!
So high church!
I could have listened forever.
I could have sat until night.
Do tell me, Madame Grandemaison, what frightful thing
has Mrs. Peter Smith got on her head?
Don't ask me, Mrs Tuck, I beg of you. You know I am
bound not to divulge my customers' secrets; but as 'tis you,
and it will go no farther, its a poult de soie, made up a la
Duchesse
d'Orleans, cheap and out of date.
How like her! But what a dreadful affair that is of your
young quakeress, Madame Grandemaison. What
wickedness
there is in the world!
Awful, Mrs. Tuck, but as I told the count, what can you
expect of a society that wears mob caps and has no
ministers
.
But have you recovered all your goods, Madame
Grandemaison
?
All! O, mon doo, mon doo! Mrs. Tuck, not half. But
what I regret most, is a splendid camel's hair shawl, which
was part of my trousseau when I married the count. I lost it
months ago, and I supposed at the time that it had been stolen
out of my hall.
Well, Madame Grandemaison, let me give you a piece of
advice; get a search warrant to-morrow morning and search
that man's premises who is engaged to Miss Hogshart. My
son knows him well, and he says that he has no doubt of his
being a particeps criminis.
Indeed, and what is that, Mrs. Tuck? said Madame
Grandemaison.
O, a partner in the robbery, of course.
Ah! but that cannot be, he is said to be such a pious
creature
,
replied Madame.
Pious! O, he is a dreadful infidel. My son says he is not
even a member of any church. He's dreadful loose in his
morals.
Not a member of any church, Mrs. Tuck? You amaze
me. I had always supposed him to be an excellent man.
What a wretch!
Birds of a feather, Madame Grandemaison.
True. I am greatly obliged to you, Mrs. Tuck, I will send
the count after an officer to-morrow. Good morning, madam.
Good morning, Madame Grandemaison, said Mrs. Tuck
sweetly, and thus the ladies parted; Mrs. Tuck stepping
into
her carriage which had been waiting with a driver and a
footman, while she was at her devotions, and Madame
Grandemaison
,
taking the arm of Monsieur, who had been waiting
for her at the corner.
The next morning an officer, accompanied by Mons.
Grandemaison, made his appearance at Mrs. Bates' door,
and demanded admittance to Jeremiah's room, which was
not denied him, of course. Jeremiah was still in bed, for
he had not closed his eyes during the night, but he got up
and told the officer to satisfy himself. The first place they
examined was the clothes-press, which was found to
contain
nothing but old coats and pantaloons, and a bundle of
religious tracts; the officer was about to close the door when
Monsieur Grandemaison discovered a drawer which had not
been opened, and requested Jeremiah to unlock it.
Ah ha! thought monsieur, you blush eh?
What makes your hand tremble so? said the officer.
Nothing, replied Jeremiah.
Nossing! exclaimed Mons. Grandemaison, as he sprang
two or three feet from the floor, Nossing. You rascal tief,
here's my wife's shawl. Sacre non de Dieu!
That looks bad, my man, said the officer, as he turned to
Jeremiah, whose face was redder than any scarlet. But
stop Mr. Grandmason, how do you know that that's your
wife's property?
Monsieur could swear to it; Madame could swear to it,
and the importer from whom he purchased it could swear
to it.
They examined still further but found only an old bonnet
which Monsieur could not identify as his wife's property, but
under the bolster of the bed they found a delicatecambric cambric pocket
handkerchief with Madame Grandemaison's initials
embroidered
in the centre. They could find nothing more. But
they had found enough for a commitment. Jeremiah
confessed
that the articles had been in Miss Hogshart's
possession
,
although he said that she had not given them to him,
and in his confusion told such a crooked and improbable story
that Monsieur Grandemaison and the officer both believed
that he had stolen them himself. He was terrified beyond
expression, and the whole proceedings were so unlooked for
and astounding that he knew not what to do. He saw that
appearances were against him and knew not how he could
possibly establish his innocence, but he requested that Mr.
Bates might be sent for, who, when he came, could afford no
other comfort than to shake his head and say that he was sorry
to have his house disgraced by such ugly work. Monsieur
Grandemaison ran immediateiy to his wife to report progress
and ask what her pleasure was, and she insisted that Jeremiah
should be sent to prison and tried for theft, or for receiving
stolen goods at least; and on his way back to Jeremiah's
room, he encountered Tom Tuck, who, on being informed of
the affair, advised him to have Jeremiah committed without
delay.
So Jeremiah was thrown into prison where he encountered
Mr. Jacobs as we have already seen in the last chapter.
He was not possessed of that refined and fastidious virtue
which causes its possessors to shrink aghast from a suspicion
of guilt or from the haunts of vice, lest their morals should be
tainted by their persons coming in contact with one a little
less righteous than themselves, and therefore when he fonnd
himself in the same apartment with Mr. Washington
Mortimer
instead of flaring up on the score of his greater
respectability
,
when that person addressed him he returned his
salutations
in a very civil manner, and told him he was sorry
to meet him in so bad a place. As we have before stated,
Jeremiah's early education had been sadly neglected, and he
had fallen into a loose habit of looking upon all men with
nearly the same feelings; regarding none so bad but there
might be some extenuating circumstances in his conduct, nor
no one so good that he might not be a good deal better.
Although
he never allowed himself to underrate the good
qualities
of others, or question one's motives when his actions
were in themselves proper. For himself, if he could preserve
his own self-respect he cared but little for the opinion of the
world, but he was not by any means indifferent to a good name,
although he would not have sacrificed a hair's breadth of his
conscience to gain one. In the present case he felt guilty,
not of the wrong of which he was accused, but of having
practiced deceit, of acting a lie, when he took the shawl, to
screen himself from ridicule; and he felt that his punishmet
was just, while a consciousness of having intended no wrong
nerved his soul to endure whatever degradation he might be
compelled to suffer. In his present frame of mind, induced
by the revelation of Miss Hogshart's crime, the walls of a
prison
were more congenial to his feelings than any other place,
save the solitude of the country, would have been. He knew
so little about criminal courts, or of their manner of dealing
with offenders, that he never dreamed of such a thing as being
bribed, or he would have sent for John, who would gladly
have been security for him. He did not know that a wealthy
rogue could commit crimes with impunity for which a poor
one would have to endure the rigors of the law. It had never
entered his simple mind that the law could be mollified with
money, or that a criminal could purchase himself clear of its
penalties; for he thought, simple creature, that the law of
the land was as impartial and exacting as the Law of Nature.
If it is not presuming too much, said Mr. Jacobs, may I
take the liberty to enquire what you are box'd for?
I am accused of stealing, replied Jeremiah, but I hope
it is not necessary for me to assure you that I am innocent of
the charge.
Ho! ho! ho! roared Mr. Jacobs so loud that all the
prisoners
crowded to the grated windows of their cells to learn
the cause of such an unusual explosion, ho! ho! ho! O, of
course not. But Mr. Jacobs could not sufficiently express
his admiration of such an exquisite bit of humor without
throwing his arms around Jeremiah's neck, and hugging him
close to his bosom. Of course you are not guilty. Nobody
is guilty in this place. Of course not, Mr. Jernagen. But,
I say, I always thought there was something deep under that
sober face of your'n. You're a sly one. How much did you
get, hey? how was it?
Ah! replied Jeremiah, I got nothing; I have wronged
no one; but it's right that I should suffer. It's all right.
So, you got cotched before you got hold of anything?
Well, that's bad. You'll do better next time; but, I say,
mister
,
you won't go to blabbing about that business of mine and
those scamps of Tucks?
If I should be called upon to tell what I know about you
I shall do so, of course.
What, when you and I are chummys? said Mr. Jacobs,
turning his protuberant black eyes insinuatingly up to
Jeremiah's
face, come, come, let's be friends. If you'll keep dark
about me, I'll get a fust wate witness for you. Come, Come.
I would not do you any injury, said Jeremiah, if I
could avoid it, but you have
Good! I knew you was a true card! you're a weg'lar fust
wate twump.
I beg you to believe me in earnest
Oh, I do, said Mr. Jacobs as he grasped him by the hand.
If I were called upon to give my testimony against you
I would not hesitate if you were my brother.
What a malicious wascal, said Mr. Jacobs flinging away
Jeremiah's hand, you owe me a gwudge because I kept that
old watch; but, if you'll agwee to keep dark about that, I'll
give you one worth two of it.
You wrong me, indeed you do, I forgive you with all my
soul; I know how easy it is to err, and as I hope to be forgiven
for my own misdeeds, I do not harbor an ill feeling against
you; but when you ask me to deny your crime, you would
make me a partaker of it, which you have no right to do.
You're a weg'lar fool or a weg'lar methodist, said Mr.
Jacobs, sulkily, but never mind, old fellow, I'll fix you for
it, Parson Gummigum.
There's no need of anger or abuse, replied Jeremiah
mildly
,
I have done you no wrong, nor threatened any. What
reason have you to fear my evidence? I have made no
complaint
against you.
I am afwaid of you hypokwits, I know.
Well, well, I am sorry for you. You are right. I am a
hypocrite, I fear. Those who have caused me to be brought
to this place, have seen something in me worse than I thought
I could be guilty of. Ah, my friend, we are all hypocrites:
we all strive to appear better than we strive to be. But if it
is not an impertinent question may I ask for what you are
imprisoned
.
Ah you may well ask that. I am here for somebody
else's villany. I am empwisson'd for fogewy.
And you are not guilty!
Are you?
No.
No more am I. Is it a likely story that I would commit a
fogewy?
Well, it's a crime of frequent occurrence in all
commercial
communities, replied Jeremiah, but yours is a hard case
indeed, my friend.
It's pwescious hard, and I am a good mind to tell all about
it too. It's all of them scamps of Tucks that has done me up.
But you have no right to complain of them for doing their
duty, said Jeremiah, if they caused you to be arrested it was
because you had been guilty of an outrage upon their uncle,
or they believed so, at least.
An outwage upon their uncle! exclaimed Mr. Jacobs in
undissembled alarm, and with a scowl which made Jeremiah
start, do they say that, the wetches?
Undoubtedly, and they must have believed you guilty or
they would not have caused you to be arrested.
They cause me to be awested! when? when? The
scamps! when?
When you got clear for lack of evidence before, replied
Jeremiah.
What, the Tucks! Tom and Fwed! exclaimed the Jew
with an incredulous whine. Enough said. Say no more.
Their names is Goslins. If I don't blow them they'll blow
me. I told 'em to look out, and now they've went and cheated
me with a bad check, and got me into this scwape. I'm
despwate at those wascals.
You talk strangely my friend, I do not comprehend you.
You don't? well, keep your ears open tight, and I'll tell
you something stwanger yet. Those scamps are the lyingest,
cheatingest, murdwingest wascals alive. Tom is the biggest
wogue, but Fwed is the biggest fool.
Hush, hush, said Jeremiah, you know not what you
say; wait until you are less excited. Be quiet.
Don't be fwightened at me, I won't hurt you. But
Jeremiah
was frightened, for the Jew's face assumed a look of
ferocity
that startled him, and his large black eyes glared fiercely
at him.
Stop, don't wun, said Mr. Jacobs as he caught hold of
Jeremiah's
collar, there's no harm in me now; but it was I that
killed their uncle. I gave him laudanum. Yes, it was I.
Let go my collar, gasped Jeremiah, let me go, I am
choking.
Not yet; not till you hear more. It was they that hired
me to do it; yes it was them, and they pwomised to pay me
well for it, which they would'nt do, because I got the wong
will for them; and now they've gone and sent me a good-for
nothing check. Now I'm even with 'em, I'll turn states'
evidence
,
and we'll see who'll hang now. Now I am easy, I've
got that off my mind, and I want a cigar. What, fainted at
that. Poo! You've got no gizzard.
Jeremiah's face grew pale, his knees tottered, and he fell upon
the stone floor of the prison. Upon which Mr. Jacobs gave
him a look of proud contempt, and walked away and left
him to recover at his leisure.
44
CHAPTER VII.
CONTAINS SUNDRY EVENTS INDICATIVE OF OUR HISTORY
BEING NEAR ITS CLOSE.
When the financier returned to the counting-room he
reached the notes intended for Madder & Co., with the
endorsement
of Mr. Kittle to John, and requested him to deliver
them himself in the morning. John promised to do so, but
as he put them in his pocket he saw his father's spirit standing
by his desk, gazing upon him with a sad reproving look, such
as he had never worn before.
At sight of this apparition he grew sick at heart, his hand
trembled violently and his face turned deadly pale. The
financier
noticed the sudden change in his countenance, and asked
what ailed him.
Did you see nothing? said John.
Nothing, replied Tom, with a slight trembling of his
voice, did you? he added, looking keenly into John's face.
I thought I did, but I was mistaken. It was the fault of
my eyes. I must go out and breathe the fresh air. He rose
from his desk, but suddenly fell back in his seat; his father's
form again stood before him and seemed to bar his way.
What is it? What ails you? said the financier.
A slight giddiness, said John, it will pass off soon.
He sat a few minutes, and again rose to go, and again fell back
in his seat, for the same appearance seemed to float before him.
Are you subject to fainting fits? asked the financier.
No, but I have been subject to turns like these ever since
my father died; poor old man! Would I had been near him
to close his eyes!
Aye, and to enquire about his will; I do not wonder at
your faintness when you think of him.
You do not understand me. I care nothing about his
will, except that I fear his wishes have been thwarted, and
that it causes him unhappiness now.
Ha! ha! excuse me for laughing. I can't help it, you
must excuse me.
I excuse you, replied John seriously, you need not
repress
your mirth, it does not annoy me. But I shall be unfit
for business to-day, and you must excuse me. I must go
home.
Very well, but give me back the notes; they will not be
safe in your pocket.
John returned the notes to him, and after sitting a moment
longer, rose from his desk and left the counting-room without
again being crossed by his spiritual visitant.
Jeremiah having obtained leave of absence for a few days,
John had made no enquiries after him, and neither of his
partners
,
nor Mr. Bates had told him of the events of Saturday
evening
,
or of Jeremiah's subsequent arrest, doubtless influenced
by a benevolent wish to spare him the painful feelings that
they must have known such news would have caused him;
at least we can conceive of no other motive that could have
induced them to keep silent in regard to that unhappy
circumstance
,
for they knew that he would immediately procure the
poor fellow's release, if he were aware of his arrest. He had
hardly left the counting-room when a note was brought in for
him, which the financier perceived was from Jeremiah, and
with that peculiar readiness to serve a friend which had ever
been a prominent feature in his character, he tore it open and
read it, and then tore it up and scattered the fragments upon
the floor. The contents of the note were as follows:
City Prison
,
10 o'clock.
My Dear Sir:
Will you have the goodness to call and see me at the earliest
moment possible? I have something to communicate of great
importance
to yourself and others in whom you are interested. Do
not fail to call.
Your unfortunate friend,
To Mr. J. Tremlett.
J. JERNIGAN.
Business before friendship, said the financier, as he took
up the note, Mr. Jeremiah must wait his time.
Had Tom Tuck known how nearly Jeremiah's note
concerned
himself, it is probable that he would have treated it with
vastly
greater consideration. But we grope about in the darkness
of our misdeeds, little dreaming what important results will
grow out of our most trifling errors; and forgetful of that
important rule which never can be safely forgotten, of doing
unto others as we would be done by.
When Jeremiah had recovered from the shock which the
confession of Mr. Jacobs had given him, his first thought was
to convey a hint to the Tucks of their danger, that they might
be enabled to make their escape before the Jew could cause
them to be arrested, and for that purpose he had addressed a
note to John, thinking him th emost suitable person to be put
in possession of the secret; for he had no doubt of the guilt of
the brothers, and his kindly feelings towards them and their
mother, entirely destroyed his sense of what was due to the
Law. Indeed, he was so much in the habit of regarding the
law of God as paramount to all others, that we are by no
means certain that he ever thought of what was due to the
criminal code, or reflected on the enormity of his own guilt in
trying to aid a criminal to escape from the gallows; thereby
depriving
one of his fellow citizens of the privilege which the
law allowed him of putting a human being to death in a quiet
business like manner, by hanging him up in the presence of a
select party of friends, assembled for the express purpose of
witnessing so comforting and exhilarating a ceremony.
So completely had his feelings become enlisted in behalf of
the guilty but unfortunate brothers, that he entirely forgot his
own misfortunes, and only lamented his confinement, because
it prevented him from serving them as effectually as he wished
to do, and he walked up and down the little space allotted to
him for exercise in an agony of suspense, wondering that
John did not make his appearance, and watching Mr. Jacobs
narrowly to see that he had no communication with the
keepers of the prison. Some of the other prisoners noticing
his anxiety, and naturally supposing that he felt the pricks of
a guilty conscience, very kindly offered their condolence, and
tried to keep him in heart by bidding him keep a stiff upper
lip, and using many similar comforting expressions, for which
he thanked them civilly; but his anxiety increased and his
uneasiness
became more manifest as the day wore away, and no
one came to see him. At sunset he was locked up in a
narrow
little cell by himself, and it was a relief to him to fall upon
his knees and pray for those who were regardless of
themselves
.
And he did not forget Huldah Hogshart, but prayed
for her with greater earnestness than he had ever done before,
when he believed her to be innocent of crime or evil thoughts.
He could no longer love her, but he could pity her. Those
who did him a kindness were sure of his gratitude, but those
who wronged him gained his pity and his prayers. The blow
that inflicted a wound in his heart, opened a stream that washed
away the guilt of the hand that struck it, like the sacrificial
blood of a Jewish altar.
But Jeremiah was not forgotten, although he was not cheered
by the face of a kindly visiter. When friend Hogshart heard
that he had been carried to prison on a charge of being an
accomplice of his daughter, he was grieved beyond measure, for
he had no doubt of his innocence, and upon questioning
Huldah
,
she made the most solemn protestations to that effect and
begged that her father would obtain his release from prison.
But she declared that she would sooner die than ever have him
speak to her again. The old man found means, through the
influence of one of his yearly meeting friends, a rich jobber in
Pearl street, to obtain sufficient money to satisfy Madame
Grandemaison for all the damage she had sustained by the
depredations of his daughter, and having taken her receipt in
full, he addressed the countess milliner in this manner:
Well, friend, thee says thee is satisfied?
O, perfectly, replied Madame Grandemaison, in a very
sweet and bewitching manner, or at least in a manner meant
to be sweet and bewitching, perfectly; and allow me to ask
you to accept this mosaic pin as a slight memento of my
respect
for
you
. I am sure I did not know that there were such
gentlemanly people among the friends. These words were
uttered with such a genuine air of admiration that we wonder
much at the reply which they elicited.
Woman! said friend Hogshart, as he put on his broad
brimmed drab hat, I despise thy gew-gaws and trinkets.
Does thee wish to tempt me to ruin, as thee did my daughter?
Is thee satisfied when thee lies down at night to remember that
thy vain and worthless merchandise has drawn an innocent
and simple-minded girl from the paths of honesty and
godly-mindedness
,
that thee now seeks to lure my feet to perdition?
Keep thy finery for such as thyself, I wish for none of it.
Thee has caused enough of grief and shame already in one
family. I weep for my poor child's sin, but I reproach
myself
for placing her in the way of temptation. Thee must not
allow thee self to boast of thy own honesty when thee tells of
my poor daughter's fall. She was tempted to take thy painted
baubles with the idle hope of making her person more comely,
but thee takes the money of vain people by overcharges for
thy trumpery goods that thee and thy idle husband may riot in
vain-glorious show; and thee has no longer youth as an
excuse
for thy wickedness!
Madame Grandemaison lost all her native sweetness and
dignity of manner long before friend Hogshart arrived at the
end of his speech, and her face would have turned to the color
of parchment but for the rouge on her cheeks, so great was her
indignation; she stamped on the floor with an energy
peculiarly
her own and screamed in the highest tone of her fine
voice, to Monsieur Grandemaison, to come up stairs and kick
friend Hogshart down. But the old quaker was not one of
those slight subjects that a person of Monsieur Grandemaison's
physical pretensions would care to exercise his powers upon,
and therefore he was cautious to make his appearance just in
time to be too late to execute his wife's wishes, although
unhappily for him, not too late to receive the full force of the
indignant feelings that belonged of right to friend Hogshart.
He having secured his daughter and Jeremiah from the risk
of further annoyance by Madame Grandemaison, and
delivered
his sentiments to the great relief of his overburdened mind,
walked deliberately down stairs with the calm air of a man
conscious of his own strength of limb and rectitude of
purpose
.
He then proceeded to procure the release of Jeremiah,
which he accomplished with but little difficulty, although not
in time to save him from a night's lodging in prison. Having
no longer occasion to remain in the city, he departed
immediately
for Berkshire county, taking his unhappy daughter
with him, and shaking the dust from the soles of his feet, as
he entered the steamboat, with a firm, though silent resolve
never again to venture within the influence of the city's
temptations
.
The next morning, at the usual hour of bringing the
prisoners
out for examination, Jeremiah was told that he was at
liberty to go where he pleased. But he almost felt loth to
go, overburdened as he was by a knowledge of the guilt of
the Tucks, and doubtful in what way to discharge the
fearful duty imposed upon him of making it known. It
would have been a relief to him had he been kept in close
confinement where he could neither see the guilty men
themselves
,
nor hear of the distress which a knowledge of their
crimes must occasion. But he was sure of one friend, who
would bear with his weakness and sympathise with his
feelings
,
and in pursuit of him he immediately went. As he
entered the counting-room there was a general commotion
among all the clerks, except only Mr. Bates, who with a
loftiness of manner that conscious dignity and merit could
alone impart, turned over the leaves of his ponderous ledger
without even deigning to look at the culprit. Let Mr. Bates
have been possessed of what weakness or evil quality he might,
he had a grateful heart, and he never saw a transgressor in
the toils of the law but he thanked his God he was not like
other men.
Jeremiah replied to the enquiries of the clerks as to his
confinement
,
and how he had effected his escape good-naturedly,
but without giving them any positive information on the
subject
,
and then passed into the private office where he met the
financier and the junior partner, John having just gone out to
deliver the note to Madder & Co. At sight of the brothers
Jeremiah gave an involuntary start, which they were pleased
to consider an evidence of his guilt.
What do you want here? demanded Tom, with a stern
look.
I am looking after Mr. Tremlett, replied Jeremiah.
Out of prison, are you? said Mr. F. Augustus, looking
over his violet curtain, so, you were apprehended for
stealing
shawls and pocket handkerchiefs. A remarkably nice
cashier you would have been.
Who bailed you out? asked Tom.
I do not know, and I do not see that you have any right to
ask. I presume that I am not indebted for my freedom to your
good will, replied Jeremiah, and the next moment his heart
smote him for his rudeness to a man who was in his power.
Out of this you insolent thief, cried the financier as he
leaped up from his desk, do you presume on the friendship
of my partner to insult me? Leave the office, sir.
Kick him, Tom, said F. Augustus, as he threw down
the last volume of Sir Reginald, for he had that moment
devoured the last word of that splendid production, kick
him.
But Jeremiah wished to avoid any disturbance, and he
retreated from the office before the financier had time to
improve upon his brother's hint.
We must be rid of that fellow, said Tom, he's a
sneaking
treacherous snoop, and if there is no other way of getting
him off, I will dissolve with his friend, Mr. Jack Tremlett, as
soon as this coffee speculation is closed.
How will it turn out?
Well. Better than I could have expected. I shall clear
a pretty penny by it, but I am resolved that that fellow
Tremlett shall not finger the first cent of the profits. I will
have a settlement with him and turn him over the stock of
the Cranberry Meadow rail-road. He means to get married
soon to somebody he has met in his rambles through the
Bowery, but he shall spend no money of my earning upon
his Bowery beauty.
Good, capital! exclaimed Fred in his joyous
light-hearted
tones, but hush! Here he comes.
Have you delivered the notes? asked the financier, as his
partner entered the office.
I have, replied John, and now we must make some
arrangements for sales.
Leave that to me, said the financier, I will make the
sales and you Fred, go and
But Fred was already gone; he had promised to drive a
distinguished artist, just returned from Europe, over to his
beau ideal villa, to show him the conservatory, built, as his
architect assured him, exactly after the Duke of Devonshire's,
at Chatsworth, and he had contrived to slip out, unperceived
by his brother, as John came in.
Gone, is he! said the financier, then I must go myself.
The brothers having left the office, John remained alone.
He was unusually serious, and his face looked care-worn and
his eye heavy; and instead of the clear ruddy complexion
natural to his face, it looked pale and bilious. During the
past night his father's form had been constantly present to
him; and even on his way to the office of Madder & Co.,
the same appearance seemed to float before his eyes, as if to
45
hinder him from his errand. But since he had delivered the
notes the apparition had ceased to haunt him. He was
perplexed
at this unnatural visitation and harrassed at the
recollection
of the great extent of his business obligations, and the
risk he had encountered in the coffee speculation; if it should
prove disastrous, he would not only be reduced to absolute
beggary himself, but those who had intrusted their property
to his management, with no other security than his honor,
would be ruined with him and by him.
While he sat at his desk reflecting on these things, old Mr.
Clearman, the grandfather of Fidelia, called in and asked for
the money which was due to her from her father's estate.
One of his neighbors had been talking to the old man and had
pursuaded him that his grand-daughter's money would be safer
in the Savings Bank than in the hands of a merchant. Never
before had the old sailor's visits been ill-timed; his rough,
honest face was a very sun of good humor which had never
failed to light up a pleasant smile on whatever object it shed
its beams, but now John was annoyed at the sight of him,
and his hearty careless laugh increased his sadness. It was
impossible to comply with his request, and John told him
that the next day or the day after, the money should be paid.
As the old sailor withdrew, Mr. Kittle came in.
Young man, said the grocer, abruptly, you asked me
to endorse your notes.
Well? replied John sternly, for the unceremonious
manner
of the grocer offended him:
Well! but 'tis not well. You wanted to swindle me,
sir; yes, you wanted to swindle me!
Be careful, and do not presume too much upon your grey
head, said John.
I defy you, I say you did, sir, I say you did, repeated
Mr. Kittle, his carbuncled face growing redder than any red
substance that we know of, you have got no credit in the
street, sir, your paper isn't worth a fig, sir, here's your notes,
take them and give me my money back, sir; my money, sir,
mine, mine; not yours, mine.
I owe you nothing, said John, calmly, for the old grocer's
passion rendered him so ridiculous that it was impossible to
be angry with him, you have got no notes of mine.
What, do you deny your own paper sir, are you going to
plead usury against me? Come, give me my money, my
money that I worked for, not yours.
If I owe you anything I will pay you, but not a minute
sooner for your ill mannered abuse; I know nothing of these
notes, they were not given by the firm; they are in the
handwriting
of Fred Tuck who is not authorised to give a note.
Ah, ha, young man, ah, ha, so, that's your game, that's
the way you mean to cheat me, I know. Come give me my
money, mine, mine; give me fifty per cent. Come, be a man
and don't cheat a hard-worker like me; give me my money.
I know nothing about these notes, and I care not how
you obtained them, replied John, but they are not yet due,
and you have no right to ask for your money until they be.
Now sir, I should be sorry to be guilty of a rudeness towards
you for the sake of your grey head, but more for the sake of
my father, who once employed you, and trusted you, and
enabled you by his generosity to grow rich, and I beg you
will save me the shame of putting my hands upon you, by
walking out of my office.
Do you know who I am, sir, do you know how much
I am worth, sir? do you know I could count out dollars for
your cents, sir, exclaimed the enraged grocer, snapping his
fingers and dancing furiously round the counting-room, me
me, yes sir, me, Andrew Kettle, sir; I made it myself, sir,
it wasn't left to me, sir, I made it myself. It's my money;
mine, mine, and again Mr. Kittle beat his breast violently to
impress the young man that he meant himself, Andrew
Kettle, and no mistake. I could buy a dozen of you, with
all your dandy clerks and blue curtains. Yes, you were
forced to come to me to endorse your notes to keep up your
credit, and you wanted to cheat me, but you could'nt. There's
your paper, I won't have it; plead usury and cheat me out of
money; take 'em, I won't have 'em! so saying he rolled up
the notes and threw them at John's head, who thereupon
jumped up from his desk, and pushed the old grocer out of
the office. He repented of it the next moment, and would
willingly have called him back and apologised to him, but it
was too late.
John had scarcely resumed his seat, when Mr. Teunis
Mildmen, the junior of the brothers Mildmen, made his
appearance, and although his countenance was as smooth and
as placid as a new cheese, and every particular hair of his
glossy head occupied its accustomed place, and a perfect
serenity reigned over his shining black suit, it was easy to
perceive, from a peculiar cast of his keen black eye, that the
broker had some weighty business on hand. He sat down
close by John's desk and took a deliberate pinch of snuff, as if
to fill up an awkward pause that necessarily occurred while
he was gaining entire possession of himself.
How is money with you, plenty? said Mr. Mildmen.
No, replied John, you know it is not, or we should not
have applied to you for a loan.
O, yes, ah, very true, yes indeed, I remember, said Mr.
Mildmen, as though he had forgotten the circumstance, when
in fact he had remembered nothing else for the last hour or
two, I didn't know, however, but you might have received
a remittance. It's confounded tight with us, confounded
tight, and he took another pinch of snuff and looked John
steadily in the eye while he held open the box.
I never snuff, said John.
O, ah, indeed? Is it possible! You don't. You are one
of Colonel Stone's men; you don't smoke, perhaps? Well
they are both bad habits, I suppose, but there are worse, and
again he looked steadily in John's face.
That may be, but there are none nastier or more
unnatural
,
answered John, with a strong expression of disgust.
Yes indeed, ah, very true, I don't know about that, I
suppose
so; I like a cigar, myself, sometimes, and a pinch of
snuff is company to me when I am alone.
Very fit, thought John although he did not say so. A
man may do a worse thing than take a pinch of snuff,
continued
the broker, at all events, and he looked steadily in
John's face as he uttered the words, it harms no one, sir.
Excuse me, said John, a little disconcerted at the
broker's
earnest stare, perhaps I expressed myself with a little
too much emphasis, but tobacco is particularly offensive to
me; it is a nauseous thing in any shape, and I have known
some dealers in it who were such dirty contemptible fellows,
that I have, perhaps, imbibed an unreasonable dislike to it.
I hope I have not offended you.
O, no indeed, not at all, don't mention it, said he, as he
knocked off a scarce perceptible particle of dust from his black
satin vest, not in the least, by no means, I wouldn't have
you think so. So, then you are not flush to-day. I must
have some money. Must. I'm short as pie crust.
I am sorry that I cannot help you. But how much do
you want?
Not much; a trifle; just the amount of those last notes
that I did for you. But you look ill, anything the matter?
I have slept badly of late, but I am well, replied John.
O, ah, indeed, is it possible? well, I shouldn't wonder.
That's bad though. You must take more exercise. Brother
Peter, he has been quite sick with the gout in his toes. And
you don't sleep well? Something on your mind perhaps?
And again he looked seriously into John's face as though he
expected to find something very strange and startling there.
A good many are disturbed in their sleep about these times;
money is so tight! the dry goods men suffer some now. I
must have some money. You must squeeze me out something.
I cannot.
You must, I am in earnest; I must have it.
I assure you it is impossible; and it strikes me that you
are a little too pressing, sir.
O, ah, does it, indeed; well, come, but I am in earnest.
Credit is a slippery thing, now; just reflect a moment; here's
the three last notes that I did for you, come, give me your
check for them, and take off a commission, come.
I have already told you that I cannot do it, said John,
furthermore, the notes have a long time to run, and you told
me that they were sold to a third party.
O, ah, yes indeed, well, that's very true, but it's for a
friend, your friend as well as mine. I won't say too much,
but let me tell you, I am in earnest, it will be for your interest
to cash up. You can trust me, I am your friend. It's not
necessary to tell all I know.
Keep nothing back if you know aught that can affect me
or my firm; speak out, I neither understand your dark sayings
nor like them.
O, ah, very true, yes, but I think I had better not now.
But let me see, by the way, you are not the financier of the
firm I believe?
No, replied John.
Ah, well, very true, by the way, perhaps you give out the
notes.
John signified that he did.
Ah, very well, you do, perhaps then you have seen that
note before? and Mr. Mildmen held up to him one of the
notes that he had passed to Madder & Co., but a few hours
before.
Certainly I have, I delivered it myself, and I am surprised
to find it in your hands.
Ah, very likely, very likely indeed, and I dare say you
would not care for anybody else to see it?
I should not, indeed.
Well, let me see, by the way, just hand over the money
for these three pieces of paper, and it shall go no further.
You understand?
No, I do not understand, and I promise you I shall give
you no money before the time agreed upon.
Ah, indeed, perhaps you will change your mind. Talk to
your partner about it. I'm in earnest, I am, indeed; I shall
wait in my office until three o'clock; but remember! I must
have my money back again. Good morning.
John was completely confounded at the strange behavior of
Mr. Mildmen, and as he had regretted his rudeness towards
Mr. Kittle the moment the old grocer had quitted the office,
he now regretted that he had been so civil to the broker and
had half resolved to follow him and pull his nose, when
Jeremiah appeared before him.
What has happened, Jeremiah, and where do you come
from? he exclaimed, not a little moved by his downcast
looks.
I came from prison, but I cannot tell you, in this place
all that has happened. You must go with me to your own
room where we shall not be liable to interruptions.
From prison, Jeremiah, and have you been visiting the
prisons with friend Hogshart and his daughter?
Surely you knew that I have been in prison on charge of
stealing! said Jeremiah with a blush.
Stealing, Jeremiah! you are jocose.
Ah, I thought you could not have heard. And you did
not receive a note from me yesterday?
Indeed, I did not; explain this riddle to me. I have
lived in the midst of mysteries to day, and this is the strangest
of all. Explain, Jernmiah, explain.
I will, but not here; go with me to your house, there's no
time to lose; I have something to tell that I wish I had never
lived to know.
I will go with you this moment, said John, and having
given some orders to Mr. Bates, the two friends left the
counting-room together.
CHAPTER VIII.
A SUDDEN DISSOLUTION OF THE FIRM OF TREMLETT
AND TUCKS.
THERE is no need that we should follow the two friends
and listen to the narrative of the one and witness the grief
and amazement of the other. Horror-struck at the dreadful
crime of the Tucks, John could think of nothing at first
but the shame and disgrace that must attach to himself from
his having been associated with the brothers in business; and
his first impulse was to screen them from exposure as much
for his own sake as for theirs. The world only knew him as
their partner and brother-in-law, and how should he free
himself
from the suspicion of having been polluted by his close
connexion with them. He shuddered at the thought, even,
of suspicion attaching to his name. He had kept it unsullied,
and he meant for the sake of him from whom he received it
without a blemish or a stain, to preserve it pure while he
lived. Disgrace appeared to him a thousand times more
terrible than death; he knew how sensitive his father had been
on the score of integrity and mercantile honor, and he had a
feverish fear of being suspected of unfair dealing in the
smallest trifle. Although conscious of his upright intentions, he
had, perhaps, too little reliance on his own integrity and
feared too much the appearance of evil. As to seeing the
brothers again, he felt it was impossible; the thought of
meeting
them or their mother completely unnerved him and he
resolved never again to hold intercourse with them in any
manner. After some discussion with Jeremiah, he at last
determined to endeavor to bribe Mr. Jacobs to silence that the
brothers might have time to escape. Unhappily it was an
emergency in which they could not ask advice, or they might
have been cautioned against pursuing a course that would be
attended with so much difficulty and peril to themselves.
In pursuance of this plan, however, Jeremiah started
immediately
for the prison to make overtures to Mr. Jacobs, and
John agreed to remain in his chamber until he returned to
report the success of his negotiation.
In the mean time, Tom Tuck was working out his own
destruction, and bringing ruin on the heads of those who
were periling their lives for his sake.
The firm of Madder & Co. had agreed not to offer the
notes of Tremlett & Tucks, with the endorsement of Mr.
Kittle, at Bank, and the financier in making this
stipulation
,
supposed that he had a sure warrant of their being
kept in the hands of that firm, for he knew them to be exact
and conscientious merchants, and by the term offering at
Bank, he meant offering them for discount in any manner;
and he thought that he was so understood. But the
managing
partner of the house of Madder & Co., like other
merchants
,
was satisfied if he kept to the letter of his agreement,
which, it must be owned, is the only safe rule for a merchant,
and being in want of money he did not scruple to offer the
notes for sale to the Brothers Mildmen. Mr. Teunis Mildmen
had been tempted by the very liberal offer of Fred Tuck, to
discount some of that young gentleman's renewed notes, with
his own private funds, unknown, even to his brother Peter;
although he had reported the sale as to a third party; and
when Mr. Madder brought in the note of Tremlett & Tucks,
with the endorsement of Mr. Kittle, he became dreadfully
alarmed, for that prudent grocer had but a few moments
before
returned three of Fred's notes with orders for them to be
46
sold at any sacrifice. Mr. Mildmen perceived at once that
there must be something amiss in regard to the endorsement
of Mr. Kittle, and in strict obedience to his instincts, although
directly opposed to his professions and principles, he resolved
to get rid of his own notes first, and then save his employers
if he could. Brother Peter was confined to his room with an
attack of gout, but Mr. Teunis was fully equal to his position.
He had not the slightest doubt that the endorsement of Mr.
Kittle
was a forgery, and he thought that by hinting as much to
John Tremlett, and promising to keep it secret, he might
induce
him to repay the money which he had given for Fred's
note. But in this he was disappointed, as we have already
seen; and, in fact, the coolness with which John had received
his hints, led him to believe that his suspicions were
unfounded
.
But to satisfy himself, he showed the notes to Mr. Kittle,
who pronounced his signature a forgery. The old gentleman
was still inflamed with anger against John, and swore that
he would cause him to be immediately arrested; but Mr.
Mildmen knowing that such a course would endanger the
payment of the note which he held, prevailed upon him to
restrain his passions and allow him to try to get some security
from the firm before he made the arrest. Mr. Kittle
reluctantly
consented and the broker hastened back to the office of
Tremlett & Tucks, where he found Tom Tuck alone, and
without much delicacy of expression accused him of uttering
forged notes, and told him that unless a certain sum of money
were paid on the spot, a complaint should be lodged against
him.
The financier heard the accusation without other emotions
than such as were perfectly natural to indignant innocence.
He swore in the most solemn manner that the notes had been
brought to him by his partner with the endorsement of Mr.
Kittle, and that believing them to have been properly obtained,
he had asked no farther questions about them; and to
substantiate
his own assertions he referred to Messrs. Madder & Co.
who stated that the notes were brought to them by the
senior partner of the firm. Mr. Kittle also stated that John
had called upon him and tried to procure his endorsement.
These facts, when put together, seemed to confirm the
statement
of Tom Tuck, and fasten the guilt of forgery upon John,
but Fred Tuck coming into the office while the broker and
Mr. Kittle were in conference with the financier,
unhesitatingly
swore to all his brother had said, and to manifest his
abhorrence of his partner's crime, insisted on his being
immediately
arrested. The financier made a solemn promise
that the claims of Mr. Kittle and Mr. Mildmen should be
secured
the next day, and though he entreated that his partner
might not be arrested, confessed that his crime deserved the
utmost rigor of the law.
But Mr. Mildmen, having, as he thought, secured the
payment
of his claim, felt extremely loth that so dangerous a
person as John should be allowed to roam at large through
the world, and he insisted on having him arrested without
delay; Mr. Kittle also had so keen a sense of his obligations
to society, that he refused to listen to any delay. The senior
partner of the firm of Madder & Co. was sent for and
informed
of the forgery, and he confirmed the suspicion of
John's guilt by stating that himself and his partner had
noticed
a very strange expression in the young gentleman's face
when he delivered the notes, and that he trembled and looked
pale when he took them from his pocket. Indeed, Mr.
Madder
was so entirely convinced of the innocence of the Tucks,
and that they had suffered from an unworthy partner that he
consented to hold to his sale of the coffee, and allow them to
secure the payment of their notes at their leisure. He then
proceeded to the office of a magistrate, accompanied by Mr.
Mildmen, to procure a warrant for John's arrest, after which
Mr. Kittle and the brothers were to accompany them, to aid,
if necessary, in securing him.
Not satisfied with the harm they were doing to their
innocent
partner, the Tucks persuaded Mr. Madder to include
Jeremiah in their complaint, for they knew that he would be
very likely to frustrate their ultimate plans if he were left at
liberty. It so happened that just as they were about to leave
the magistrate's office with the warrant, Jeremiah passed
by on his way to the prison. Tom Tuck saw him and
dispatched an officer after him with orders to keep him until
they returned with John, that they might be both examined
together. This was an exceedingly unfortunate move for the
Tucks; for Mr. Jacobs, having been in a state of great
uncertainty
as to the proper course for him to pursue in regard
to them ever since he had discovered that Jeremiah had been
released, had just resolved to make a confession of his crime,
partly out of revenge and partly through fear; and had sent
for the keeper of the prison for that purpose. But had
Jeremiah
been allowed to proceed on his benevolent errand, he
would have arrived in time to have prevented the
unfortunate
disclosure. But affairs were differently ordered. Mr.
Jacobs made a full confession to the keeper of the prison,
who lost no time in making the matter known to the district
attorney, and that indefatigable officer was not long in
deciding
upon his proper course of action.
Mr. Madder and Mr. Mildmen proceeded in a cab to the
house of Mrs. Tuck where they were joined by the two
brothers in their own carriage, who took up Mr. Kittle on
their way and they all proceeded to John's house together.
They found him in the hall pacing the floor with impatient
strides, and his countenance wore a pale and haggard look,
such as it had never worn before. He was hardly startled at
sight of his visiters, although he shuddered when he saw his
partners.
Poor fellow, whispered Mr. Madder to Tom Tuck, he
evidently knows what we have come for.
Sit down gentlemen, said John, sit down; but he
averted his face from the brothers, for the sight of them
chilled his blood, I would I could have been spared this
painful scene.
It's too late to hope now, growled Mr. Kittle, you
should have thought of this sooner.
I did not intend it, replied John, but the bungling of
Jeremiah I suppose has imposed it upon me.
Don't try to put your faults upon other people, replied
Mr. Kittle.
That Jeremiah's a deep fellow; it's well we caught him,
observed Mr. Mildmen in a whisper to Mr. Madder.
My dear sir, said John to Mr. Kittle, I regret that any
harsh words should have passed between us; perhaps I was
too hasty. O, if you knew what cause I had for irritation
you would not think ill of me! I beg your pardon, for what
I said and did; he reached out his hand to Mr. Kittle, but
the indignant grocer held back his own.
This is an awkward business, sir, said Mr. Madder.
O, it is terrible, replied John with a shudder, none of
you can feel it as I do.
No, I dare say not, remarked the broker, with a faint
smile, as he glanced towards the financier, who stood with
his arms folded, quite confounded at the strange dialogue that
was going on.
What have you done with Jeremiah? continued John,
speaking at large, for he could not discover who was
conducting
the proceedings.
Jeremiah? O, ah, very true, well, yes, said the broker,
Jeremiah is safe; he will be kept at the magistrate's office
until we return.
Poor fellow, said John, it's a painful duty for him; he
would gladly have avoided it.
He might easily have done so, remarked Mr. Kittle,
those that sow the wind must reap the whirlwind.
This ambiguous remark was rather puzzling to John, but
after a whispering between Tom Tuck, the officer and Mr.
Madder, he was still more puzzled at a speech of the latter
gentleman.
The officer is in a hurry to be off, he said, and if you
have any little arrangements to make about your family it
will be well for you to attend to them immediately. We
must return to the magistrate's office; he is waiting for us.
I have no arrangements to make, replied John, and I
beg that I may not detain you, for every moment that you
remain is extremely painful to me; but you must excuse me
from going with you; I can be of no service and my feelings
have been painfully excited already. You must excuse me.
The gentlemen all exchanged glances, and just the faint
shadow of a smile crossed the features of Mr. Madder.
Singular remark, that! said Mr. Kittle.
Well, yes, rather, I must say I think it is, said the broker.
You do not misunderstand me, I take it? said Mr.
Madder.
No, no, replied John, but, indeed, this matter is too
painful, for me to speak in more definite terms. I feel more
keenly than you can conceive of.
Tut, tut, said Mr. Madder, this is the merest folly.
We do not doubt the keenness of your feelings; indeed, we
only wonder at your moderation; but we cannot consider
feelings
in such a case as this. You have put it out of our power
to exercise our own discretion in the matter. If you want
any legal advice we will send for your lawyer to meet us at
the magistrates, but really you presume too much on our
good nature by obliging us to wait here.
I know not what you mean, replied John, I have taken
no part in this thing, and my attendance cannot be necessary.
Jeremiah will answer all your purposes; and once more I
assure you that I cannot go with you. Believe me, I am in
earnest.
We would not make use of force if it were possible to
avoid it, replied Mr. Madder, but you compel us, and the
consequences be on your own head. Officer, do your duty!
What's the meaning of this? Am I to be treated like a
criminal! exclaimed John as the officer grasped him by the
collar.
The meaning of it! exclaimed the grocer, the meaning
of it, indeed; ah! my young fellow, it is too late to give
yourself airs now; little did your old father think that you
would ever come to this. The meaning of it, indeed! The
meaning of it is that you have been forging my name; mine,
mine, mine, young man, mine, injuring my credit in Wall
street! and you are caught and must go to prison for it.
Shame on you, you turn an honest man out of your
counting-room
,
when he civilly asks for his money; yes, you! Ah,
you look astonished; well, well, I hope you will repent of
your roguery.
That's a little too hard, said the broker.
Do I understand that you have come here to arrest me,
for forgery?
I am sorry to say that we have, replied Mr. Madder
and although I am willing, for my part, to allow you all
the benefit which your denial of the charge may secure to
you, yet I would advise you as a friend to make a frank
confession
of your crime. You will stand better in the
estimation
of business men for doing so, I assure you; and it is no
use to deny the charge; the evidence against you is so direct
and positive, that you can have no hope of acquittal. I
received the notes from you myself, Mr. Kittle here says
that you tried to procure his endorsement, and both of your
partners, who came very near being suspected of a
participation
in your crime, swear that you brought the notes to them,
and told them that you had procured the endorsements by
paying a commission. It is a very clear case and I see no
possible chance for your escape. I do not wish to give any
distress that can be avoided, for I doubt not that you had no
expectation that any harm would come of the act, but you
see how impossible it is to do wrong with impunity.
Somebody
must suffer, and it is well when the chief aggressor is
the chief sufferer.
Ah, yes indeed, that's the ordering of Providence, said
Mr. Kittle.
Do my partners swear as you have said?
They do, replied Mr. Madder.
O, how can I repel this! Have I no friend among you,
gentlemen? Will either of you believe me? As he turned to
them he burst into tears and exclaimed, if there is truth
in Heaven, they lie; I am innocent of all knowledge of the
forgery which you say has been committed.
Come, come, young man, cried Mr. Kittle, don't add to
your fault by perjury. Your partners are well known in this
community as smart fellows.
O, O! ejaculated the broker, quite overcome at the
enormity
of the young man's hardness of heart.
Let him go on, said the financier his abuse can do me
no harm, I expect it as a matter of course.
So do I, said Fred with an air of determined resignation,
but I can endure his abuse so long as all is right here, and
he put his hand to his heart.
O, God! O, God! exclaimed John, I little dreamed of
this! I see that I am ruined. O, that I should have lived to
be accused of a crime like this. I cannot look upon my
friends in this world again, but those that look upon me from
the other, know that I am innocent. My partners, gentlemen,
have done this thing themselves; it is true that I delivered
the notes myself, but I received them from the financier who
refused to tell me how he had procured them. But, you do
not believe me, I see; it is idle to declare my innocence.
O, it is cruel! cruel! I cannot speak to my partners, I
cannot
appeal to them, I have nothing to hope from them; they
are murderers, I dare not look at them; the crime of which
they accuse me is a righteous deed compared with that of
which they are guilty.
Let me come at the villain, cried Tom Tuck, while his
brother stood gasping, as if for breath.
Shame! shame! cried Mr. Madder, as he held the
financier
back, we must not allow this. You only aggravate
your crime, Mr. Tremlett, by conduct like this; your
partners
have already suffered too much from your bad acts.
I can wait no longer, said the officer; if you wish to
take a valise with you, I will go with you to your chamber
to get it, or you can send for it, but I must go right off.
I will not detain you long, said John, this will soon be
over. Be so kind as to call my house-keeper. I must see her
before I go. The officer stepped into the next room and
returned in a moment with Mrs. Swazey.
O, my dear God, what is the matter? exclaimed the
housekeeper;
Mother, said John, these gentlemen have come here to
carry me to prison. They say that I have committed a
forgery
;
but you know that I am innocent, do you not?
Know it! Precious sweet, aye; who is it says so? Do
you? do you say it? do you? No, nobody shall say so before
me!
Be quiet old lady, said Mr. Kittle, I know my own
business.
I am innocent, mother, innocent of this crime as my poor
father; and so is Jeremiah; he knows nothing of it; tell me
again, mother, that you believe me innocent.
Help me God! my dear God, I know you are. I do
believe it, I know it my precious child!
And will you tell Fidelia so, will you tell her I say so,
tell her to believe so, for my sake?
Precious, precious soul, I will; but why should I, sobbed
the old woman.
Do not weep, I beg of you. There is no need of shedding
47
a tear for me, they cannot harm me. Kiss me mother again.
Now, let me go; God bless you, mother! They are waiting,
O, take her from me, gentlemen, and I will keep you here no
longer. Will you allow me to go to my room one moment,
I will not detain you?
I will wait for you at the foot of the stairs, said the
officer, but I can't wait long.
Thank you, thank you, and he pressed the officer's hand
and hurried up stairs.
Remember, it is at your peril, said the financier.
I know my duty, sir, replied the officer.
Don't be too harsh, said Mr. Madder, as he wiped his
eyes. And even the broker and Mr. Kittle were obliged to
look out of the window to hide their emotion; but the
brothers
stood apart, pale and apparently unmoved by pity.
John's footsteps were heard a moment in the room above
them, but suddenly it was still as though he had sat down.
Mrs. Swazey had retired to her own apartment, and the
gentlemen
in the hall looked at each other in silence. It was
awfully still for a few minutes, and the officer began to look
uneasy.
He is gone a long while, said Mr. Madder.
I will hasten him, said the officer, and he leaped lightly
up the stairs; we are waiting for you sir, said the officer
speaking through the key-hole of the chamber door, we can
wait no longer. But there was no response. He knocked,
lightly at first, and then louder, but there was still no reply.
There is something wrong, I am afraid, said the officer.
Knock down the door, said Mr. Kittle, he may have
fainted.
Wait, wait, said Mr. Madder, let me speak, perhaps he
will reply to me, but still there was no response.
Well, upon my word, it is strange, however; what must
we do, officer? said Mr. Mildmen.
There is but one way, sir, I must force open the door,
replied the officer; and after two or three attempts the door
flew open and they all rushed in, but started back with an
exclamation of horror.
God of Heaven! What a sight! said Mr. Madder.
Sitting in an arm chair, with his head resting on the side
of the bed on which his father had died, they found the
unfortunate
young man with a frightful gash across his throat and a
stream of thick black blood running upon the floor; an open
razor lay on the bed beside him. The wound was very deep,
and he appeared quite dead; but they sent off the officer for a
surgeon and tried to stop the effusion of blood. But their
efforts availed nothing. He was dead.
Plain proof of his guilt, said the financier.
I am by no means sure of that; it strikes me differently;
there has been foul play somewhere, said Mr. Madder.
Poor fellow! poor fellow! said Mr. Mildmen, what a
rash young man; well, ah, indeed, but its a bad business.
I hope he thought nothing of my remarks; for I liked
the young man, after all; I meant nothing, said Mr. Kittle,
and his carbuncled visage changed to a dismal blueish hue.
This is too much for us; my brother and I must retire,
said the financier, you know where to find us. My poor
mother will be prostrated by this sad news.
The brothers hurried down stairs together, and leaping
into their carriage, which stood at the door, drove with all
haste to their mother's house. They found her in her dressing
room alone, just prepared to go out to a dinner party.
My children! my children! What ails you? How
dreadfully pale you are. You tremble, Fred. What has
happened to you? Tell me quick?
Ask no questions, I have no time to talk; I am off on a
journey, and you musn't know where, said Tom.
My son! my son! you will kill me!
I cannot help it, I tell you I am off, and you must not
know where.
My dear, dear Fred, tell me what has happened, or I shall
die. You will not leave your poor mother!
Nothing has happened to speak of, only we are ruined;
it matters not how; it is better for you not to know.
O, my children, if you are ruined, if you have failed, don't
let that trouble you. I can get money for you.
You can?O, yes, I dare say.By stealing, I suppose.
said the financier.
Ah, now, my son, how can you say such a word to your
dear mother?
Dear
mother! yes, you have been a dear mother to me;
and dearly am I paying for you now. Come, don't stop to
cry. Don't you see we are in earnest? If you know of any
way of getting money, let us know it. I am serious. I must
have some money.
O, my children, O, my son, if your poor father could
have heard that speech
Will you leave off with your trifling, and if you can help
us to anything, let us know it, said Tom.
My dear son; be patient, and you shall know. But don't
reproach your mother, remember that I have lived only for
your sake, and what I am going to tell you was done for
your good
Well, well, let us hear it, then, said Tom.
The day that old Mr. Tremlett died, said Mrs. Tuck, I
watched by his bedside, and while I was engaged in changing
his pillow, I discovered a small package lying under the
bolster; I had a curiosity to look at it, and being left alone
in the room a few minutes after he died, I slipped it into my
pocket
Stop! stop! cried Tom, while large drops of sweat ran
down his face, don't tell me it was his will,don't tell me
that!
It was, my son, it was. I have got it now. He bequeathed
all his money, to that bad fellow who robbed us of our Julia,
and our property. I was resolved to be revenged for the
wrong he did us, and I kept it to spite him. But, now that
you are in want of money, my children, you shall have it;
he is your partner and you can, of course, share with him.
O, mother, mother, why did you not tell us of this before!
said Fred.
He our partner! said Tom with a sneer, he's in Hell;
The will is worth nothing to us, nor to him.
O, my son, you affright me, what is it?
It is this; he cut his throat not an hour since, and he
now lies drowned in his own blood.
O, horror! horror! but do not blame me my son, do not
blame me, it was done for your good; love me still my
children; do not forget that I am your mother.
Love you, said Tom, as he shook his clenched fist at
her. I hate you! see what you have brought us to. I tell
you I hate you. Yes, I am in earnest. You have ruined us,
you have learned us to. But never mind, you will know
in the end. Love you! I tell you I have not so much love
for you as could fill the space which a needle's point would
occupy on the surface of my heart. Now let me go, I have
no time to waste.
Never, never, shrieked the wretched woman, as she fell
upon his neck, and clasped her arms around him, never
shall you leave me until you recall those words and tell me
that you love me; never! never! until you tell me that you
forgive me!
You will strangle me, you will murder me, exclaimed
Tom as he struggled to free himself from her, you will
repent this; let me go, or you will murder me; but she
clung to him and shrieked wildly, while Fred sat pale as a
ghost and trembled as though he had been shaken by an
ague.
While this terrible struggle was going on between the
mother and son, the sound of men's feet was heard on the
stairs. The brothers started at the sound.
Hush! mother! hush you will destroy us, said Fred,
there was no way of escape, and he crept into a clothes-press
and hid himself beneath a heap of clothes.
Mother! mother! let me go, I will do anything, I will
promise anything, cried Tom as he struggled in vain to free
himself from her embrace.
The sound of footsteps approached nearer, the door was
forced open and three men made their appearnce. They
started back at the strange sight that presented itself, but
immediately re-entered.
You are my prisoner, said the foremost one.
For what? said Tom, haughtily, as he turned upon them,
for his mother had released him as the door opened.
For murder! replied the officer, for murdering your
uncle.
O, my son! my son! shrieked his mother, and fell, as
though she were dead upon the floor.
For the first time the financier was thrown off his guard.
The announcement was so unexpected that it fell upon him
like a stunning blow. He staggered; his eyes glared wildly;
his face turned ashy pale; his tongue was stiff with fright
and he gasped for breath.
The officer, accustomed to distinguish between the
evidences
of innocence and crime, which, to the unobserving,
often appear the same, saw with an unfailing instinct that he
was guilty, and fearing some violence on his part,
immediately
secured him. Where is your brother? demanded the
officer.
Am I my brother's keeper? replied the financier, helped
no doubt to this little scrap of scripture by the enemy of
men's souls, who has the reputation of making apt quotations
when they can be done to serve his purpose.
But it was not necessary to repeat the question, for the
reply was hardly uttered when the door of the clothes-press
flew open and Fred Tuck rolled out upon the floor; he had
fainted; but a dash of cold water soon restored him and
the brothers were taken to prison, while their mother lay
insensible
in the arms of the servants who were striving to
revive her.
Tom preserved a haughty, stern demeanor, and conducted
himself with great dignity and propriety; but Fred set up a
most dismal howling and behaved in a manner altogether
different from what one would have supposed a gentleman
of his elegant tastes and fondness for aesthetics would have
done.
CHAPTER IX.
THE CONCLUSION.
HAVING no ambition to furnish a history for Lawyers to
quote from, or to help establish precedents for the bad
practices of criminal prosecutors, we shall refrain from giving
a report of the trial of Mr. Jacobs and the brothers Tuck.
The verdicts alone must satisfy our readers. The brothers
were both found guilty. Not that the evidence against them
was by any means strong, or the prosecution conducted with
unusual ability; for one was exceedingly slight, and the other
remiss and gentle, and in ordinary cases would have failed to
procure a verdict of guilty; but there had been three or four
acquittals of murderers during the year, in cases where the
evidence was of such a nature that the juries could not have
failed to convict without perjuring themselves; and the
public
had manifested such a spirit of resentment that the jury who
sat upon the Tucks, rather consulted the wishes of the public
(like good republicans as they were) than their obligations as
jurors, and returned a verdict accordingly, after being absent
from the jury box but a very few minutes. They were
sustained
by the public sentiment, and highly complimented for
their moral courage by the press, and even clergymen thanked
God in their pulpits that there was some virtue yet left in the
community. Demonstrations like these must have been
infinitely
more gratifiying to good citizens, than the approval
of so inconsiderable a monitor as conscience. A man's
conscience
having no vote, and being without any political
influence
whatever, can never be a safe tribunal for an
American
citizen to appeal to.
It was midnight when the brothers were brought into court
to hear the verdict; and as soon as it was pronounced, the
judge and jurors, hurried home to their wives and little
ones, the prisoners were hurried back to their cells, and
officers
and lawyers, and all the denizens of filthy court rooms
and hideous prisons,human vultures that love to pray on
human suffering and crimethe whole brood of unclean
creatures that gorge themselves with such pickings as may
be found in the precints of the gallows, threw aside their
wooden badges of authority, their red tape documents, and
bundles of worthless papers, and hurried home to their places
of rest like the spectators of a melo-drama when the last scene
is ended. The judge and the jurors, the crier and the
counsel
,
the attornies and the turn-keys, had all earned their fees
and lay down to sleep with the consciousness of having done
their duty to their country. They had succeeded in
condemning
two fellow beings to death, and then put up their
prayers for pleasant dreams and long life to themselves. Of
the whole brood, perhaps not one thought more of the
wretched
men whose sufferings had been the subject of their
gratification
,
than the crow does of the once noble racer whose
carcass has afforded him a meal.
The next morning Tom Tuck was found hanging by the
neck from a beam which crossed his cell. It having
appeared
in the course of the trial that he was the sole originator of
the crime for which himself and his brother were condemned,
the Governor was induced to pardon Fred, and the public
was cheated of all the agreeable incidents of a hanging, for
Mr. Jacobs got clear of the gallows by turning State's
evidence
,
although he was found guilty of uttering counterfeit
notes, for which he was sentenced to the state-prison, where
he had the satisfaction of being joined in a short time by
every one of his old associates.
48
There being not the slightest evidence to criminate
Jeremiah
,
he was released from confinement the day after his
committal, and during the whole trial of the Tucks he
labored
incessantly in their behalf, and exerted himself to the
utmost
of his ability to solace and comfort their mother, making
many sacrifices for her sake, and sending her money when
he supposed her to be in want.
The estate of the firm was put into the hands of receivers
appointed by the Chancellor, who employed Jeremiah for
their chief assistant at the same salary that he had been
receiving
as correspondent clerk. The coffee speculation
turned
out as profitable as the financier had anticipated, and
fully
justified the high character as a merchant which his friends
had given him. The year before had been one of unusual
depression in the mercantile world; everybody felt poor,
without
any particular cause, however, and it was universally
admitted
by business men and politicians that the country was
on the verge of bankruptcy and ruin; now, a change had
taken place and prices of everything were advancing, and
everybody felt rich with as little cause as they had before for
feeling poor. The consequence was that the estate of
Tremlett
& Tuck, to the astonishment of everybody, paid all its
debts, including even the fradulent notes of Fred, which had
been sold to the brothers Mildmen, and there being a balance
of a few hundred dollars left, the Receiver presented it to
Jeremiah, as a reward for his industry and honesty. But
Jeremiah
did not consider himself privileged to keep it, and made
a present of it to Fred Tuck, who was thereby enabled to
establish
a shop in the Bowery for the sale of segars and
cheap novels, from the profits of which he supported himself
and his mother quite genteelly, although in a style so far
removed
from their former magnificence, that it will admit of no
comparison with it. After a few months he removed from
the Bowery into Broadway, where he enlarged his stock and
made a very manifest change in his manner of living, which
caused many ill stories to be circulated in regard to him, for it
was supposed that he had not become honestly possessed of
his means. But lest the reader should entertain any such ill
thoughts, we will explain the cause of his sudden
advancement
.
As soon as Mr. Loudon heard the melancholy news of the
breaking up of the firm of Tremlett & Tucks, by the death
of the senior partner and the arrest of the others, he forwarded
on to Jeremiah the will that John had deposited with him for
safe keeping, before leaving Charleston. It had been lying
in a pigeon-hole of his iron chest, quite forgotten. The
testator
had bequeathed his entire property to be divided
equally
between Jeremiah and Fidelia, but Jeremiah refused to
receive
anything for his own portion excepting a gold pencil
case that had been a new year's present from old Mr.
Tremlett
to his son the year before he died; the remainder of the
personal property, consisting of a small collection of books, a
few good pictures, a gold watch and his wearing apparel, he
insisted that Fidelia should receive; and she was too happy
to receive anything that had once belonged to her affianced
husband to refuse them. The Staten Island cottage had to
be sold. Jeremiah would have bought it, but it was
infinitely
beyond his reach; he could not hope ever to be rich
enough to buy it; but still he could not endure the thought
that anybody should inhabit it but Fidelia, for he knew that
it was built expressly for her, and he modestly requested the
purchaser of it, Mr. Haverstraw, a dry goods jobber, not to sell
it without first giving him the refusal of it.
When Fred Tuck heard that John's will had been found,
it occurred to him immediately that the legatees might
recover
the whole amount of Mr. Tremlett's property, which
had been taken possession of by the State, upon their
producing
the will of the latter, which had been secreted by his
mother
;
and having consulted with his lawyer and found that
he was right in his conjecture, he determined to bring the
matter to a profitable account for himself. He therefore
called
upon Jeremiah, and after obtaining a promise of secresy
from him, told him that he could put him in possession of
Mr. Tremlett's lost will by which he could recover one half
of the old merchant's estate. At first Jeremiah was
incredulous
,
but Fred told him if he would give a conditional bond
for ten thousand dollars, to be paid when he got possession of
the estate, the will should be placed in his hands in less than
an hour. With these conditions Jeremiah complied, and the
will was brought to him within the stipulated time. At sight
of this once eagerly souglit document he was quite overcome
and unable to speak for a long time; not that he exulted in
this sudden and altogether unlooked for good fortune to
himself
.
Very far from it. He thought not of his own interests
in the matter at all, but of his dear friend whose life had been
sacrificed, and of all the suffering and distress that had been
endured by others for want of the worthless parchment
which he held in his hand. He retired to his chamber and
wept, and prayed Heaven not to desert him in the day of
prosperity which now seemed dawning upon him.
Having given vent to his feelings in tears and fortified
himself
against temptation by prayer, he hastened to Fidelia and
imparted the strange news to her; but he cautioned her
against indulging in too lively hopes for as they could only
gain possession of the property by a suit at law, if they gained
it at all, he could not allow himself to entertain any
anticipations
of success. Mr Polesworthy had assured him that there
could be no doubt of his recovering the property, but he had
seen enough of legal tribunals to know that of all uncertain
things the law is the most uncertain.
In process of time, after being harrassed, and perplexed and
put to as much expense, as the law in its most liberal
construction
would allow its ministers to inflict, the money was
recovered, amounting to a trifle more than four hundred
thousand dollars.
The first investment that Jeremiah made, was in the
purchase
of the Staten Island cottage, for which he was
compelled
to pay about three times its original cost; for Mr.
Haverstraw
,
the owner, perceiving that he had got hold of a
customer
who was determined to purchase, demanded a sum
which brought a blush into his own face when he named it.
But Jeremiah gave his check for it, without hesitation, as he
would have done had it been three times as much, and then
tendered the cottage to Fidelia. She accepted of it, for she
well knew that he would be grieved if she either refused it,
or offered to pay for it. Fred Tuck received his reward, but
we regret to be compelled to record the fact that he relapsed
into his former extravagant habits, got deeply in debt and at
last was obliged to abscond to escape imprisonment for some
offence, the exact nature of which we never ascertained. His
mother being left in complete destitution, Jeremiah took it
upon himself to see that her wants were duly supplied,
although
he never could prevail upon himself to see her, and at
her death, which happened in a few months after her son,
deserted
her, defrayed the expenses of her funeral, and caused a
plain white stone with the simple record of her death, to be
placed above her remains.
While the suit for the recovery of Mr. Tremlett's property
was in progress, Jeremiah and Fidelia were, of necessity, often
brought together; but apart from this cause a community of
grief made the society of each other at first a solace and at last
a delight. How it happened we know not; indeed, the parties
scarce knew themselves, but when Fidelia went down to
Staten Island in the flowery month of June to take possession
of her cottage, Jeremiah accompanied her as her husband.
Thither her grand parents and the old drab parrot were
removed
,
and a flaunting brick store with square granite
columns soon supplanted the modest little yellow house which
they vacated. The old bird seemed at first a little discontented
by her change of residence, but seeing the same faces about
her and hearing the same voices, and above all, inhaling the
same fumes from the old sailor's pipe, she soon grew
reconciled
to her new abode and behaved with unexceptionable
propriety for a whole year, when, one morning at breakfast
she threw the whole family into ecstasies of delight by
striving
to imitate the piping tones of a new born child. But to
the day of her death, which did not happen until many such
little episodes had occurred, she never failed, at the prescribed
evening hour, to ejaculate, in her hoarse voice, the always
welcome sound
LET US PRAY.Charleston
My dear Young Friend,
It is with emotions of peculiar gratification to
our Heavenly Father, and his son, the Lord Jesus, that I take up my
pen to address you a few lines; as, but for his merciful interposition
in answer to the prayers of his servant, his unworthy servant, there is
but too much cause to believe that you would now be lying in the dark
prison house of death, where, by his inscrutable Providence, she that
should have been the sharer of your troubles and the promoter of your
pleasures now lies. Blessed be her spirit. But it is my office to heal
and not to open up afresh the wounds of my people. I bless God that
you arrived safely at home, and I trust my very dear young friend, that
your thoughts will be directed to the church, that you may be inclosed
in its broad fold, and that you may be made free by its bondage. For
the blessed privilege that we enjoy in this land, where there is none to
make us afraid, and where we have liberty in Christ, in his church and
ourselves, always excepting the slavery of sin, let us be ever grateful
and magnify his name.
My object in troubling you with these lines will not, I sincerely hope,
be unpleasing to you. I am now well stricken in years, and my
children
are many (thirteen) and the estate that I can leave them, will be
small; therefore I have made it my practice for some years past
whenever
I could spare a sufficient sum from my more immediate wants, to
make an investment, for the benefit of each of my children, that I may
not leave them destitute, by purchasing for each of them a likely young
negro; they are now, blessed be the giver of all good things, all
supplied
except my youngest boy for whom I am in treaty with one of my
vestry men for a likely wench, about sixteen years old. As the
liberality
of your brother-in-law and yourself will enable me, through the
Providence of God, to make this purchase, my family and myself are
desirous to pay you the tribute of calling the wench by your deceased
lady's name, but we would not venture to do so without the
permission
of that good gentleman, her brother, and yourself.
If it should be agreeable to you to gratity us in this particular, it will
be an additional pleasure to us to learn your acquiescence from your
own hand.
With many good wishes,
Your sincere friend,
Fabian Esyman
.City Prison
,
10 o'clock.
My Dear Sir:
Will you have the goodness to call and see me at the earliest
moment possible? I have something to communicate of great
importance
to yourself and others in whom you are interested. Do
not fail to call.
Your unfortunate friend,
To Mr. J. Tremlett.
J. JERNIGAN.